Mississippi, session 2026, HB203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43-6-171, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-6-171.  (1)  The Legislature recognizes that language used in reference to individuals with disabilities shapes and reflects society's attitudes towards people with disabilities.  Many of the terms currently used diminish the humanity and natural condition of having a disability.  Certain terms are demeaning and create an invisible barrier to inclusion as equal community members.  The Legislature finds it necessary to clarify preferred language for * * *new and revised all laws and rules by requiring the use of terminology that puts the person before the disability. (2)  The legislative drafting offices of the House and Senate are directed to avoid all references to the terms "disabled," "developmentally disabled," "mentally disabled," "mentally ill," "mentally retarded," "handicapped," "cripple" and "crippled," in any new statute, memorial or resolution, and to change those references in any existing statute, memorial or resolution * * *as sections including those references are otherwise amended by law.  The drafting offices are directed to replace the terms referenced above as appropriate with the following revised terminology:  "persons with disabilities," "persons with developmental disabilities," "persons with mental illness" and "persons with intellectual or cognitive disabilities." (3)  No statute, memorial or resolution is invalid because it does not comply with this section. (4)  All state agency orders * * *creating new rules, or amending existing rules, shall be formulated in accordance with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section regarding the use of respectful language. (5)  No agency rule is invalid because it does not comply with this section. SECTION 2.  Section 13-1-305, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 13-1-305.  If the judge, or any other person charged under the provisions of Sections 13-1-301 through 13-1-315 with providing an interpreter, believes that a person claiming to be entitled to an interpreter may not actually be deaf or hearing impaired, unable to communicate verbally because of his hearing disability, or otherwise not entitled to such services, the judge may, on good cause shown, hold a hearing to determine the extent of the person's * * *handicap or disability and the bona fide need for interpreting services.  If it is determined that the person is not entitled to such services, an interpreter shall not be provided.  Except in a preliminary hearing in a criminal case, every deaf person whose appearance before a proceeding entitles him to an interpreter shall notify the appointing authority of his disability not less than five (5) days prior to any appearance and shall request at such time the services of an interpreter.  When a deaf person reasonably expects to need an interpreter for more than a single day, he shall so notify the appointing authority, and such notification shall be sufficient for the duration of his participation in the proceedings.  When a deaf person receives notification of an appearance less than five (5) days before such appearance, he shall provide his notification and request for an interpreter as soon thereafter as practicable. SECTION 3.  Section 19-5-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 19-5-45.  Any county within the State of Mississippi wherein the railroads known as the Illinois Central and the Mississippi Central intersect, and any county with a population of not less than twenty-one thousand (21,000) nor more than twenty-one thousand five hundred (21,500) and with an assessed valuation in excess of Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00), and in which State Highway 35 and State Highway 12 intersect, is * * *  hereby authorized and empowered to issue the negotiable bonds or certificates of indebtedness of * * *said the county for the purpose of constructing an industrial building to be used as a sheltered workshop for the employment of * * *handicapped people persons with disabilities, and * * *said the county is * * * hereby authorized to retain two (2) mills of the state ad valorem tax levy for a period not in excess of five (5) years for the purpose of assisting in the retirement of * * * said the bonds and interest thereon. The board of supervisors of any county coming within the provisions of this section shall be authorized to levy, at the time and in the prescribed manner other county tax levies are made, an ad valorem tax of one-fourth (¼) mill for each mill retained levied against all of the taxable property of such county, and such levy shall be made a condition precedent to the operation of this section. The amount of bonds or certificates of indebtedness issued for this purpose shall not exceed the sum of One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) and the two (2) mill state ad valorem tax levy herein authorized to be retained for the retirement of * * * said the bonds may be pledged, together with the full faith and credit of the county, for the payment of * * * said the bonds at maturity and the interest thereon. In issuing the bonds herein authorized, it shall only be necessary for the board of supervisors of * * * said the county to adopt a resolution providing for the sale and issuance of * * * said the bonds as now provided by law. SECTION 4.  Section 21-37-6, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 21-37-6.  Every municipality shall install ramps at crosswalks, in both business and residential areas, when making new installations of sidewalks, curbs or gutters, or improving or replacing existing sidewalks, curbs or gutters, so as to make the transition from street to sidewalk easily negotiable for * * *physically handicapped persons with physical disabilities in wheelchairs and for other persons who may have difficulty in making the required step up or down from curb level to street level. The term "ramps" as used herein means a sloping asphalt or concrete surface, from the level of the sidewalk or curb to the level of the street at curbside, extending outward and downward from the curb to the street for such a distance, at such an angle, and at such a width as will facilitate the movement up and down such ramps of persons in wheelchairs or persons who have difficulty in stepping up or down between curb level and street level. SECTION 5.  Section 25-9-149, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-9-149.  It is the intent of the Legislature that no person seeking employment in state service, as defined in Section 25-9-107, * * *Mississippi Code of 1972, or employed in state service, as defined in Section 25-9-107, * * *Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age or * * * handicap disability. SECTION 6.  Section 25-15-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-15-3.  For the purposes of this article, the words and phrases used herein shall have the following meanings: (a)  "Employee" means a person who works full time for the State of Mississippi and receives his compensation in a direct payment from a department, agency or institution of the state government and any person who works full time for any school district, community/junior college, public library or university-based program authorized under Section 37-23-31 for children who are deaf * * *, or aphasic * * *and emotionally disturbed or children with emotional disturbances or any regular nonstudent bus driver.  This shall include legislators, employees of the legislative branch and the judicial branch of the state and "employees" shall include full-time salaried judges and full-time district attorneys and their staff and full-time compulsory school attendance officers.  For the purposes of this article, any "employee" making contributions to the State of Mississippi retirement plan shall be considered a full-time employee.  For purposes of this article, "employee" shall not mean contract personnel. (b)  "Department" means the Department of Finance and Administration. (c)  "Plan" means the State and School Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan created under this article. (d)  "Fund" means the State and School Employees Insurance Fund set up under this article. (e)  "Retiree" means any employee retired under the Mississippi retirement plan. (f)  "Board" means the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board created under Section 25-15-303. SECTION 7.  Section 25-15-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-15-9.  (1)  (a)  The board shall design a plan of health insurance for state employees that provides benefits for semiprivate rooms in addition to other incidental coverages that the board deems necessary.  The amount of the coverages shall be in such reasonable amount as may be determined by the board to be adequate, after due consideration of current health costs in Mississippi.  The plan shall also include major medical benefits in such amounts as the board determines.  The plan shall provide for coverage for telemedicine services as provided in Section 83-9-351.  The board is also authorized to accept bids for such alternate coverage and optional benefits as the board deems proper.  The board is authorized to accept bids for surgical services that include assistance in locating a surgeon, setting up initial consultation, travel, a negotiated single case rate bundle and payment for orthopedic, spine, bariatric, cardiovascular and general surgeries.  The surgical services may only utilize surgeons and facilities located in the State of Mississippi unless otherwise provided by the board.  Any contract for alternative coverage and optional benefits shall be awarded by the board after it has carefully studied and evaluated the bids and selected the best and most cost-effective bid.  The board may reject all of the bids; however, the board shall notify all bidders of the rejection and shall actively solicit new bids if all bids are rejected. The board may employ or contract for such consulting or actuarial services as may be necessary to formulate the plan, and to assist the board in the preparation of specifications and in the process of advertising for the bids for the plan.  Those contracts shall be solicited and entered into in accordance with Section 25-15-5.  The board shall keep a record of all persons, agents and corporations who contract with or assist the board in preparing and developing the plan.  The board in a timely manner shall provide copies of this record to the members of the advisory council created in this section and those legislators, or their designees, who may attend meetings of the advisory council.  The board shall provide copies of this record in the solicitation of bids for the administration or servicing of the self-insured program.  Each person, agent or corporation that, during the previous fiscal year, has assisted in the development of the plan or employed or compensated any person who assisted in the development of the plan, and that bids on the administration or servicing of the plan, shall submit to the board a statement accompanying the bid explaining in detail its participation with the development of the plan.  This statement shall include the amount of compensation paid by the bidder to any such employee during the previous fiscal year.  The board shall make all such information available to the members of the advisory council and those legislators, or their designees, who may attend meetings of the advisory council before any action is taken by the board on the bids submitted.  The failure of any bidder to fully and accurately comply with this paragraph shall result in the rejection of any bid submitted by that bidder or the cancellation of any contract executed when the failure is discovered after the acceptance of that bid.  The board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this subsection. The board shall develop plans for the insurance plan authorized by this section in accordance with the provisions of Section 25-15-5. Any corporation, association, company or individual that contracts with the board for the third-party claims administration of the self-insured plan shall prepare and keep on file an explanation of benefits for each claim processed.  The explanation of benefits shall contain such information relative to each processed claim that the board deems necessary, and, at a minimum, each explanation shall provide the claimant's name, claim number, provider number, provider name, service dates, type of services, amount of charges, amount allowed to the claimant and reason codes.  The information contained in the explanation of benefits shall be available for inspection upon request by the board.  The board shall have access to all claims information utilized in the issuance of payments to employees and providers. (b)  There is created an advisory council to advise the board in the formulation of the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan.  The council shall be composed of the State Insurance Commissioner, or his designee, an employee-representative of the institutions of higher learning appointed by the board of trustees thereof, an employee-representative of the Department of Transportation appointed by the director thereof, an employee-representative of the Department of Revenue appointed by the Commissioner of Revenue, an employee-representative of the Mississippi Department of Health appointed by the State Health Officer, an employee-representative of the Mississippi Department of Corrections appointed by the Commissioner of Corrections, and an employee-representative of the Department of Human Services appointed by the Executive Director of Human Services, two (2) certificated public school administrators appointed by the State Board of Education, two (2) certificated classroom teachers appointed by the State Board of Education, a noncertificated school employee appointed by the State Board of Education and a community/junior college employee appointed by the Mississippi Community College Board. The Lieutenant Governor may designate the Secretary of the Senate, the Chairman of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the Chairman of the Senate Education Committee and the Chairman of the Senate Insurance Committee, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives may designate the Clerk of the House, the Chairman of the House Appropriations Committee, the Chairman of the House Education Committee and the Chairman of the House Insurance Committee, to attend any meeting of the State and School Employees Insurance Advisory Council.  The appointing authorities may designate an alternate member from their respective houses to serve when the regular designee is unable to attend the meetings of the council.  Those designees shall have no jurisdiction or vote on any matter within the jurisdiction of the council.  For attending meetings of the council, the legislators shall receive per diem and expenses, which shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem and expenses for attending meetings of the council will be paid while the Legislature is in session.  No per diem and expenses will be paid except for attending meetings of the council without prior approval of the proper committee in their respective houses. (c)  No change in the terms of the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan may be made effective unless the board, or its designee, has provided notice to the State and School Employees Health Insurance Advisory Council and has called a meeting of the council at least fifteen (15) days before the effective date of the change.  If the State and School Employees Health Insurance Advisory Council does not meet to advise the board on the proposed changes, the changes to the plan shall become effective at such time as the board has informed the council that the changes shall become effective. (d)  Medical benefits for retired employees and dependents under age sixty-five (65) years and not eligible for Medicare benefits.  For employees who retire before July 1, 2005, and for employees retiring due to work-related disability under the Public Employees' Retirement System, the same health insurance coverage as for all other active employees and their dependents shall be available to retired employees and all dependents under age sixty-five (65) years who are not eligible for Medicare benefits, the level of benefits to be the same level as for all other active participants.  For employees who retire on or after July 1, 2005, and not retiring due to work-related disability under the Public Employees' Retirement System, the same health insurance coverage as for all other active employees and their dependents shall be available to those retiring employees and all dependents under age sixty-five (65) years who are not eligible for Medicare benefits only if the retiring employees were participants in the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan for four (4) years or more before their retirement, the level of benefits to be the same level as for all other active participants.  This section will apply to those employees who retire due to one hundred percent (100%) medical disability as well as those employees electing early retirement. (e)  Medical benefits for retired employees and dependents over age sixty-five (65) years or otherwise eligible for Medicare benefits.  For employees who retire before July 1, 2005, and for employees retiring due to work-related disability under the Public Employees' Retirement System, the health insurance coverage available to retired employees over age sixty-five (65) years or otherwise eligible for Medicare benefits, and all dependents over age sixty-five (65) years or otherwise eligible for Medicare benefits, shall be the major medical coverage.  For employees retiring on or after July 1, 2005, and not retiring due to work-related disability under the Public Employees' Retirement System, the health insurance coverage described in this paragraph (e) shall be available to those retiring employees only if they were participants in the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan for four (4) years or more and are over age sixty-five (65) years or otherwise eligible for Medicare benefits, and to all dependents over age sixty-five (65) years or otherwise eligible for Medicare benefits.  Benefits shall be reduced by Medicare benefits as though the Medicare benefits were the base plan. All covered individuals shall be assumed to have full Medicare coverage, Parts A and B; and any Medicare payments under both Parts A and B shall be computed to reduce benefits payable under this plan. (f)  Lifetime maximum: The lifetime maximum amount of benefits payable under the health insurance plan for each participant is Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00). (2)  Nonduplication of benefits  reduction of benefits by Title XIX benefits:  When benefits would be payable under more than one (1) group plan, benefits under those plans will be coordinated to the extent that the total benefits under all plans will not exceed the total expenses incurred. Benefits for hospital or surgical or medical benefits shall be reduced by any similar benefits payable in accordance with Title XIX of the Social Security Act or under any amendments thereto, or any implementing legislation. Benefits for hospital or surgical or medical benefits shall be reduced by any similar benefits payable by workers' compensation. No health care benefits under the state plan shall restrict coverage for medically appropriate treatment prescribed by a physician and agreed to by a fully informed insured, or if the insured lacks legal capacity to consent by a person who has legal authority to consent on his or her behalf, based on an insured's diagnosis with a terminal condition.  As used in this paragraph, "terminal condition" means any aggressive malignancy, chronic end-stage cardiovascular or cerebral vascular disease, or any other disease, illness or condition which physician diagnoses as terminal. Not later than January 1, 2016, the state health plan shall not require a higher co-payment, deductible or coinsurance amount for patient-administered anti-cancer medications, including, but not limited to, those orally administered or self-injected, than it requires for anti-cancer medications that are injected or intravenously administered by a health care provider, regardless of the formulation or benefit category determination by the plan.  For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "anti-cancer medications" has the meaning as defined in Section 83-9-24. (3)  (a)  Schedule of life insurance benefits  group term:  The amount of term life insurance for each active employee of a department, agency or institution of the state government shall not be in excess of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), or twice the amount of the employee's annual wage to the next highest One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), whichever may be less, but in no case less than Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00), with a like amount for accidental death and dismemberment on a twenty-four-hour basis.  The plan will further contain a premium waiver provision if a covered employee becomes totally and permanently disabled before age sixty-five (65) years.  Employees retiring after June 30, 1999, shall be eligible to continue life insurance coverage in an amount of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) into retirement. (b)  Effective October 1, 1999, schedule of life insurance benefits  group term:  The amount of term life insurance for each active employee of any school district, community/junior college, public library or university-based program authorized under Section 37-23-31 for children who are deaf * * *, or aphasic * * *and emotionally disturbed  or children with emotional disturbances or any regular nonstudent bus driver shall not be in excess of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), or twice the amount of the employee's annual wage to the next highest One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), whichever may be less, but in no case less than Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00), with a like amount for accidental death and dismemberment on a twenty-four-hour basis.  The plan will further contain a premium waiver provision if a covered employee of any school district, community/junior college, public library or university-based program authorized under Section 37-23-31 for children who are deaf * * *, or aphasic * * *and emotionally disturbed  or children with emotional disturbances or any regular nonstudent bus driver becomes totally and permanently disabled before age sixty-five (65) years.  Employees of any school district, community/junior college, public library or university-based program authorized under Section 37-23-31 for children who are deaf * * *, or aphasic * * *and emotionally disturbed or children with emotional disturbances or any regular nonstudent bus driver retiring after September 30, 1999, shall be eligible to continue life insurance coverage in an amount of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) into retirement. (4)  Any eligible employee who on March 1, 1971, was participating in a group life insurance program that has provisions different from those included in this article and for which the State of Mississippi was paying a part of the premium may, at his discretion, continue to participate in that plan.  The employee shall pay in full all additional costs, if any, above the minimum program established by this article.  Under no circumstances shall any individual who begins employment with the state after March 1, 1971, be eligible for the provisions of this subsection. (5)  The board may offer medical savings accounts as defined in Section 71-9-3 as a plan option. (6)  Any premium differentials, differences in coverages, discounts determined by risk or by any other factors shall be uniformly applied to all active employees participating in the insurance plan.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the state contribution to the plan be the same for each employee throughout the state. (7)  On October 1, 1999, any school district, community/junior college district or public library may elect to remain with an existing policy or policies of group life insurance with an insurance company approved by the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board, in lieu of participation in the State and School Life Insurance Plan.  On or after July 1, 2004, until October 1, 2004, any school district, community/junior college district or public library may elect to choose a policy or policies of group life insurance existing on October 1, 1999, with an insurance company approved by the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board in lieu of participation in the State and School Life Insurance Plan.  The state's contribution of up to fifty percent (50%) of the active employee's premium under the State and School Life Insurance Plan may be applied toward the cost of coverage for full-time employees participating in the approved life insurance company group plan.  For purposes of this subsection (7), "life insurance company group plan" means a plan administered or sold by a private insurance company.  After October 1, 1999, the board may assess charges in addition to the existing State and School Life Insurance Plan rates to such employees as a condition of enrollment in the State and School Life Insurance Plan.  In order for any life insurance company group plan to be approved by the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board under this subsection (7), it shall meet the following criteria: (a)  The insurance company offering the group life insurance plan shall be rated "A-" or better by A.M. Best state insurance rating service and be licensed as an admitted carrier in the State of Mississippi by the Mississippi Department of Insurance. (b)  The insurance company group life insurance plan shall provide the same life insurance, accidental death and dismemberment insurance and waiver of premium benefits as provided in the State and School Life Insurance Plan. (c)  The insurance company group life insurance plan shall be fully insured, and no form of self-funding life insurance by the company shall be approved. (d)  The insurance company group life insurance plan shall have one (1) composite rate per One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) of coverage for active employees regardless of age and one (1) composite rate per One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) of coverage for all retirees regardless of age or type of retiree. (e)  The insurance company and its group life insurance plan shall comply with any administrative requirements of the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board.  If any insurance company providing group life insurance benefits to employees under this subsection (7) fails to comply with any requirements specified in this subsection or any administrative requirements of the board, the state shall discontinue providing funding for the cost of that insurance. SECTION 8.  Section 27-19-56, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-56.  (1)  (a)  Upon application by any legal resident of the State of Mississippi with a disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk, or by the owner of a motor vehicle who has a child, parent or spouse with a disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk and the child, parent or spouse is living with the applicant, the Department of Revenue shall prepare and issue through the county tax collectors a special license plate bearing the International Symbol of Access adopted by Rehabilitation International in 1969 at its Eleventh World Congress on Rehabilitation of the Disabled for not more than two (2) vehicles that are registered in the applicant's name.  The initial application shall be accompanied by the certification of a licensed physician that (i) the applicant or the applicant's child, parent or spouse meets the definition of persons with disabilities which limit or impair the ability to walk; and (ii) that the physician has determined that the applicant or the applicant's child, parent or spouse will have the disability for at least five (5) years.  The Department of Revenue shall prepare and issue to the tax collectors of the various counties, decals for placement on the special license plates.  The decals shall bear thereon the month in which the license plate was issued and the year in which the special license plate will expire.  The special license plate issued under this section is valid for the period of time that the license tag attached upon a motor vehicle is issued pursuant to Section 27-19-31(1).  A person to whom the special license plate is issued may retain the special license plate and may renew it by submitting to the county tax collector, on or before its expiration, the certification of a licensed physician that the physician has determined (i) that the applicant or the applicant's child, parent or spouse meets the definition of a person with a disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk; and (ii) that the applicant or the applicant's child, parent or spouse will have the disability for at least five (5) years.  If an applicant fails to renew the special license plate before its date of expiration, then he or she shall surrender the special license plate to the county tax collector and the tax collector shall issue to such person a regular license plate to replace the special license plate. (b)  Upon application by any legal resident of the State of Mississippi who has a disabled American veteran plate or tag issued under Section 27-19-53 properly displayed on his vehicle and a disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk, the Department of Revenue shall prepare and issue through the county tax collectors a special decal bearing the International Symbol of Access adopted by Rehabilitation International in 1969 at its Eleventh World Congress on Rehabilitation of the Disabled for not more than two (2) vehicles that are registered in the applicant's name and properly display the plate or tag issued under Section 27-19-53.  The decal shall be affixed to the plate or tag issued under Section 27-19-53.  The initial application shall be accompanied by the certification of a licensed physician that (i) the applicant meets the definition of persons with disabilities which limit or impair the ability to walk; and (ii) that the physician has determined that the applicant will have the disability for at least five (5) years.  The Department of Revenue shall prepare and issue to the tax collectors of the various counties, decals for placement on the plate or tag issued under Section 27-19-53.  The decals shall bear thereon the month in which the license plate or tag was issued and the year in which the plate or tag will expire.  The special decal is valid for the period of time that the license tag attached upon a motor vehicle is issued pursuant to Section 27-19-53.  A person to whom the special decal is issued may retain the decal and may renew it by submitting to the county tax collector, on or before its expiration, the certification of a licensed physician that the physician has determined (i) that the applicant meets the definition of a person with a disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk; and (ii) that the applicant will have the disability for at least five (5) years.  If an applicant fails to renew the special license plate decal before its date of expiration, then he shall surrender the decal to the county tax collector. (c)  Upon application by any legal resident of the State of Mississippi who has a license tag issued under Section 27-19-56.14 properly displayed on his vehicle and has a disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk or has a child, parent or spouse with a disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk and the child, parent or spouse is living with the applicant, the Department of Revenue shall prepare and issue through the county tax collectors a special decal bearing the International Symbol of Access adopted by Rehabilitation International in 1969 at its Eleventh World Congress on Rehabilitation of the Disabled for not more than two (2) vehicles that are registered in the applicant's name and properly display a tag issued under Section 27-19-56.14. The decal shall be affixed to the tag issued under Section 27-19-56.14.  The initial application shall be accompanied by the certification of a licensed physician that (i) the applicant or the applicant's child, parent or spouse meets the definition of persons with disabilities which limit or impair the ability to walk; and (ii) that the physician has determined that the applicant or the applicant's child, parent or spouse will have the disability for at least five (5) years.  The special decal is valid for the period of time that the license tag attached upon a motor vehicle is issued pursuant to Section 27-19-56.14. A person to whom the special decal is issued may retain the decal and may renew it by submitting to the county tax collector, on or before its expiration, the certification of a licensed physician that the physician has determined (i) that the applicant or the applicant's child, parent or spouse meets the definition of a person with a disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk; and (ii) that the applicant or the applicant's child, parent or spouse will have the disability for at least five (5) years.  If an applicant fails to renew the special decal before its date of expiration, then he shall surrender the decal to the county tax collector. (d)  (i)  The terms "vehicle" and "motor vehicle," as used in this section, include motorcycles. (ii)  The term "persons with disabilities which limit or impair the ability to walk," when used in this section, means those persons who, as determined by a licensed physician: 1.  Cannot walk two hundred (200) feet without stopping to rest; or 2.  Cannot walk without the use of, or assistance from, a brace, cane, crutch, another person, prosthetic device, wheelchair, or other assistive device; or 3.  Are restricted by lung disease to such an extent that the person's forced (respiratory) expiratory volume for one (1) second, when measured by spirometry, is less than one (1) liter, or the arterial oxygen tension is less than sixty (60) mm/hg on room air at rest; or 4.  Use portable oxygen; or 5.  Have a cardiac condition to the extent that the person's functional limitations are classified in severity as Class III or Class IV according to standards set by the American Heart Association; or 6.  Are severely limited in their ability to walk due to an arthritic, neurological or orthopedic condition. (e)  An applicant for a special license plate or decal bearing the International Symbol of Access shall not be required to pay any fee or charge for the issuance of such license plate or decal separate from or in addition to the road and bridge privilege taxes, ad valorem taxes and registration fees otherwise required by law to be paid for the issuance of a regular license plate for such vehicle. (2)  The Department of Revenue shall prepare removable windshield placards and such placards shall be issued and periodically renewed upon the applications of persons with disabilities which limit or impair the ability to walk, or upon the applications of owners of motor vehicles who have a child, parent or spouse with a disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk and the child, parent or spouse is living with the owner of the motor vehicle.  The placards shall be issued, free of charge, to applicants through the offices of the tax collectors of the counties.  The initial application shall be accompanied by the certification of a licensed physician that the applicant or the applicant's child, parent or spouse meets the definition of persons with disabilities which limit or impair the ability to walk.  These placards shall be valid for the period of time that the license tag attached upon a motor vehicle is issued pursuant to Section 27-19-31(1) and may be renewed in the same manner as provided for the renewal of the special license plates or decals under subsection (1) of this section.  The removable windshield placard must be displayed on the left side of the vehicle dashboard or by hanging it on the rearview mirror of the vehicle.  The Department of Revenue shall prescribe the placement for motorcycles. (3)  The Department of Revenue shall provide for the issuance of a temporary removable windshield placard, upon the application of a person with a disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk, or upon the application of the owner of a motor vehicle who has a child, parent or spouse with a disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk and the child, parent or spouse is living with the owner of the motor vehicle.  Temporary removable windshield placards authorized by this subsection shall be prepared by the Department of Revenue and shall be issued, free of charge, to applicants through the offices of the tax collectors of the counties.  Application for a temporary removable windshield placard must be accompanied by the certification of a licensed physician that the applicant or the applicant's child, parent or spouse meets the definition of persons with disabilities which limit or impair the ability to walk.  The certification shall also include the period of time that the physician determines the applicant or the applicant's child, parent or spouse will have the disability, not to exceed six (6) months.  The temporary removable windshield placard must be displayed on the left side of the vehicle dashboard or by hanging it on the rearview mirror of the vehicle.  The temporary removable windshield placard shall be valid for a period of time for which the physician has determined that the applicant will have the disability, not to exceed six (6) months from the date of issuance.  The Department of Revenue shall prescribe the placement for motorcycles. (4)  The removable windshield placard and the temporary removable windshield placard shall be two-sided and shall include: (a)  The International Symbol of Access, which is at least three (3) inches in height, centered on the placard (the color of the removable windshield placard shall be white on a blue shield; and the temporary removable windshield placard shall be white on a red shield); (b)  An identification number and, on the reverse side, the name of the individual to whom the placard is issued; (c)  A date of expiration; and (d)  The seal of the State of Mississippi. (5)  (a)  It shall be unlawful to park a motor vehicle in an area set aside for persons * * *who are disabled with a disability if the motor vehicle does not (i) have displayed the removable windshield placard authorized in this section with the date of expiration visible, (ii) have the special license plate issued under this section properly displayed upon the motor vehicle, (iii) have the disabled American veteran tag or plate issued under Section 27-19-53 properly displayed upon the motor vehicle, (iv) have the disabled Purple Heart Medal recipient tag or plate issued under Section 27-19-56.5 properly displayed upon the motor vehicle, (v) have the disabled Bronze Star recipient tag or plate issued under Section 27-19-56.62 properly displayed upon the motor vehicle, or (vi) have a license tag issued under Section 27-19-56.14 and bearing the special decal issued under subsection (1)(c) of this section properly displayed upon the motor vehicle.  Any person who unlawfully parks a motor vehicle in such areas, or who blocks such spaces or access thereto, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) for each such violation.  For the third and subsequent offenses under this section, the offender's driver's license shall be suspended for ninety (90) days by the Commissioner of Public Safety in accordance with Section 63-1-53 in addition to any fine imposed.  The court shall not suspend or reduce any fine required to be imposed under this subsection. (b)  A person who is charged with a violation of this section by parking a motor vehicle in an area set aside for persons * * *who are disabled with a disability and failing properly to display (i) a removable windshield placard on the dash of the vehicle or by hanging it on the rearview mirror of the vehicle, (ii) a special license plate issued under this section upon the vehicle, (iii) a disabled American veteran tag or plate issued under Section 27-19-53, (iv) * * *have the a disabled Purple Heart Medal recipient tag or plate issued under Section 27-19-56.5 * * *properly displayed upon the motor vehicle, (v) * * *have the a disabled Bronze Star recipient tag or plate issued under Section 27-19-56.62 * * *properly displayed upon the motor vehicle, or (vi) a license tag issued under Section 27-19-56.14 and bearing the special decal issued under subsection (1)(c) of this section * * *properly displayed upon the motor vehicle, shall not be convicted and shall have the charge dismissed upon presentation to the court of proof by means of sworn oral testimony or sworn affidavit that at the time of the charged violation, such person or a passenger in the vehicle possessed a valid removable windshield placard issued under this section. (6)  Any person who, for the purpose of obtaining a special license plate or windshield placard under this section, files with the county tax collector a physician's certification, knowing the certification to be false or to have been fraudulently obtained, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00). (7)  All law enforcement officers are authorized to enforce this section on public and private property.  Provision of spaces restricted to * * *handicapped disabled parking and proper marking of such spaces shall be considered as intent and permission to enforce such designated parking on private property.  Any owner of private property may tow away a vehicle that is parked on the owner's private property in violation of the disabled parking restrictions set forth in this section at the vehicle owner's expense.  In addition, the vehicle owner may be subject to any fines or other penalties provided in this section.  Only areas marked in accordance with the Americans with Disabilities Act Accessibility Guidelines or equivalent standards shall be enforced.  Spaces shall bear the International Symbol of Access. (8)  Motor vehicles displaying a special license plate, license plate decal, placard or parking certificate or permit bearing the International Symbol of Access issued to a person with a disability by any other state or district subject to the laws of the United States shall be allowed the special parking privileges under this section provided the license plate, decal, placard, permit or certificate bears the International Symbol of Access and is displayed in a prominent place on the vehicle. (9)  Parking in any area set aside for persons * * *who are disabled with disabilities is limited to vehicles which, immediately before or after the utilization of such an area, are used to transport a person with a disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk.  The identification required to park in such an area, except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, is as follows: (a)  For a vehicle used to transport a person with a permanent disability, that person's permanent windshield placard must be displayed or the vehicle must have a special license tag issued under this section or Section 27-19-53 properly displayed or the vehicle must have a license tag issued under Section 27-19-56.14 and bearing the special decal issued under subsection (1)(c) of this section properly displayed. (b)  For a vehicle being used by a person who has a temporary disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk, or which is being used to transport such a person, a temporary windshield placard must be displayed. Any person who parks in an area set aside for persons * * *who are disabled with disabilities in violation of this subsection shall be punished as provided for in subsection (5) of this section. (10)  Upon application by a nursing home, retirement home or other institution that transports * * *disabled persons with disabilities, the Department of Revenue may issue the special license plate authorized pursuant to this section for not more than one (1) vehicle that is registered in the applicant's name that is used to transport * * *disabled the institution's residents * * *of the institution with disabilities. Such institution shall comply with all other laws regarding the registration of such vehicle. SECTION 9.  Section 29-5-65, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 29-5-65.  At any time when the Legislature is in session, the * * *Office of General Services Department of Finance and Administration shall designate and reserve sufficient parking spaces around the New Capitol Building to accommodate the members of the Legislature, and, when such spaces have been so designated and reserved, they shall be identified and marked by means of numbers, one (1) of which shall be assigned to each member of the Legislature, and that space for which he or she holds that number shall be reserved for the exclusive use of the * * *said legislator.  The * * *Office of General Services department is authorized and directed to reserve and allocate, among those spaces, an individual parking space for use of any member of the Legislature who * * *is physically handicapped has a physical disability, so as to make his or her entrance to and exit from the New Capitol Building as convenient as is reasonably possible. SECTION 10.  Section 37-16-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-16-9.  (1)  The state board shall, after a public hearing and consideration, make provision for appropriate accommodations for testing instruments and procedures for students with identified * * *handicaps or disabilities in order to ensure that the results of the testing represent the student's achievement, rather than reflecting the student's impaired sensory, manual, speaking or psychological process skills, except when such skills are the factors the test purports to measure. (2)  The public hearing and consideration required hereunder shall not be construed to amend or nullify the requirements of security relating to the contents of examinations or assessment instruments and related materials or data. (3)  Children with disabilities shall be included in general statewide and district-wide assessments programs, with appropriate accommodations, where necessary.  As appropriate, the State Department of Education and the local educational agency shall: (a)  Develop policies and procedures for the participation of children with disabilities in alternate assessments for those children who cannot participate in statewide and district-wide assessment programs; and (b)  Develop and, beginning not later than July 1, 2000, conduct those alternate assessments. (4)  The State Department of Education shall make available to the public, and report to the public with the same frequency and in the same detail as it reports on the assessment of nondisabled children, the following: (a)  The number of children with disabilities participating in regular assessments; (b)  The number of children participating in alternate assessments; (c)  The performance of those children on regular assessments, beginning not later than July 1, 1998, and on alternate assessments, not later than July 1, 2000, if doing so would be statistically sound and would not result in the disclosure of performance results identifiable to individual children; and (d)  Data relating to the performance of children with disabilities shall be disaggregated for assessments conducted after July 1, 1998. SECTION 11.  Section 37-31-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-31-31.  The intention of Sections 37-31-31 through 37-31-41 is to enable the State of Mississippi, by and through the State Board of Education, to secure the benefits of the federal Social Security Act pertaining to services for * * *crippled children with physical disabilities, and * * * said those sections shall be liberally construed in order to effectuate such intention. SECTION 12.  Section 37-31-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-31-33.  For the purpose of enabling the State Board of Education to comply with the provisions of the federal Social Security Act and to continue to extend and improve as far as practicable the services now maintained by * * * said the state board for locating * * *crippled children with physical disabilities and for providing medical, surgical, corrective, and other services, care and treatment, and facilities for diagnosis, hospitalization, and after-care for children * * * who are crippled with physical disabilities or * * *who are suffering from conditions * * *which that lead to * * *crippling physical disabilities, any and all funds appropriated for physical restoration of * * *crippled children with physical disabilities for the above purposes may be used for the purposes set forth in this section. SECTION 13.  Section 37-31-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-31-35.  Sections 37-31-31 through 37-31-41, together with funds made available through that section of those sections of the federal Social Security Act * * *which that relates to * * *crippled children with physical disabilities, together with any and all available state and federal appropriations, shall be administered by the State Board of Education, and shall be used in the further development of the state's program of physical restoration of  * * *crippled children with physical disabilities. The State Board of Education is * * *hereby authorized to accept donations, gifts and bequests and to expend same on approval of the executive officer of the board, for purposes approved under regulations of the State Board of Education. SECTION 14.  Section 37-31-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-31-39.  The State Board of Education shall cooperate with medical, health, nursing and * * * welfare human services groups and organizations and with any other agencies in the state charged with administering state laws providing for vocational rehabilitation of * * * physically handicapped children with physical disabilities.  * * *Said The state board * * * is hereby authorized, empowered and directed to shall cooperate with the federal government in such manner as to obtain the benefits of the provisions of the federal Social Security Act pertaining to * * *crippled children with physical disabilities. SECTION 15.  Section 37-33-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-33-13.  As used in the Vocational Rehabilitation Law: (a)  "Competitive employment" means work in the competitive labor market that is performed on a full-time or part-time basis in an integrated setting and for which an individual is compensated at or above the minimum wage, but not less than the customary wage and level of benefits paid by the employer for the same or similar work performed by individuals who are not disabled; (b)  "Department" or "agency" means the State Department of Rehabilitation Services; (c)  "Director" means the Director of the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation; (d)  "Executive director" means the Executive Director of the State Department of Rehabilitation Services; (e)  "Employment outcome" means, with respect to an individual entering or retaining full-time or, if appropriate, part-time competitive employment in the integrated labor market to the greatest extent practicable; supported employment; or any other type of employment, including self-employment, telecommuting, or business ownership, that is consistent with an individual's strengths, resources, priorities, concerns, abilities, capabilities, interests, and informed choice; (f)  "Individual with a disability" means any individual who has a physical or mental impairment, whose impairment constitutes or results in a substantial impediment to employment, and who can benefit in terms of an employment outcome from the provision of vocational rehabilitation services; (g)  "Maintenance" means monetary support provided to an individual for expenses, such as food, shelter, and clothing, that are in excess of the normal expenses of the individual and that are necessitated by the individual's participation in an assessment for determining eligibility and vocational rehabilitation needs or the individual's receipt of vocational rehabilitation services under an individualized plan for employment; (h)  "Occupational license" means any license, permit or other written authority required by any governmental unit to be obtained in order to engage in an occupation; (i)  "Office" means the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation of the State Department of Rehabilitation Services; (j)  "Personal assistance services" means assistance in a range of services provided by one or more persons designed to assist an eligible individual with a disability to perform daily living activities on or off the job that the individual would typically perform without assistance.  The services must be designed to increase the individual's control in life and ability to perform every day activities on or off the job.  The services must be necessary to the achievement of an employment outcome and may be provided only while the individual is receiving other vocational rehabilitation services.  The services may include training in managing, supervising, and directing personal assistance services; (k)  "Physical restoration services" means (i) corrective surgery or therapeutic treatment that is likely, within a reasonable period of time, to correct or modify substantially a stable or slowly progressive physical or mental impairment that constitutes a substantial impediment to employment; (ii) diagnosis of and treatment for mental or emotional disorders by qualified personnel in accordance with state licensure laws; (iii) dentistry; (iv) nursing services; (v) necessary hospitalization (either inpatient or outpatient care) in connection with surgery or treatment and clinic services; (vi) drugs and supplies; (vii) prosthetic and orthotic devices; (viii) eyeglasses and visual services, including visual training, and the examination and services necessary for the prescription and provision of eyeglasses, contact lenses, microscopic lenses, telescopic lenses, and other special visual aids prescribed by personnel that are qualified in accordance with state licensure laws; (ix) podiatry; (x) physical therapy; (xi) occupational therapy; (xii) speech or hearing therapy; (xiii) mental health services; (xiv) treatment of either acute or chronic medical restoration services, or that are inherent in the condition under treatment; (xv) special services for the treatment of individuals with end-stage renal disease; and (xvi) other medical or medically-related rehabilitation services; (l)  "Prosthetic appliance" means any artificial device necessary to support, to take the place of a part of the body, or to increase the acuity of a sense organ; (m)  "Regulations" means regulations made by the executive director with the approval of the state board. (n)  "Rehabilitation engineering services" means the systematic application of engineering sciences to design, develop, adapt, test, evaluate, apply, and distribute technological solutions to problems confronted by individuals with disabilities in functional areas such as mobility, communications, hearing, vision, and cognition, and in activities associated with employment, independent living, education, and integration into the community; (o)  "Rehabilitation training" means all necessary training provided to an eligible individual with a disability to enable him or her to overcome his or her substantial impediment to employment * * * handicap, including, but not limited to, manual, preconditioning, prevocational, vocational and supplementary training and training provided for the purpose of developing occupational skills and capacities; (p)  "State board" means the State Board of Rehabilitation Services; (q)  "Substantial impediment to employment" means that a physical or mental impairment (in light of attendant medical, psychological, vocational, educational, communication, and other related factors) hinders an individual from preparing for, entering into, engaging in, or retaining employment consistent with the individual's abilities and capabilities; (r)  "Supported employment services" means ongoing support services and other appropriate services needed to support and maintain an individual with a most significant disability in supported employment that are provided by the designated state unit (i) for a period of time not to exceed eighteen (18) months, unless under special circumstances the eligible individual and the rehabilitation counselor jointly agree to extend the time to achieve the employment outcome identified in the individualized plan for employment; and (ii) following transition, as post-employment services that are unavailable from an extended services provider and that are necessary to maintain or regain the job placement or advance in employment; (s)  "Vocational rehabilitation" and "vocational rehabilitation services" mean, for an eligible individual with a disability, services as appropriate and required to assist in preparing for, securing, retaining, or regaining an employment outcome that is consistent with the individual's strengths, resources, priorities, concerns, abilities, capabilities, interests, and informed choice, including, but not limited to, services in accordance with definitions in the most current amendment of the Rehabilitation Act:  (i) assessment for determining eligibility and priority for services by qualified personnel, including, if appropriate, an assessment by personnel skilled in rehabilitation technology; (ii) assessment for determining vocational rehabilitation needs by qualified personnel, including, if appropriate, an assessment by personnel skilled in rehabilitation technology; (iii) vocational rehabilitation counseling and guidance, including information and support services to assist an individual in exercising informed choice; (iv) referral and other services necessary to assist applicants and eligible individuals to secure needed services from other agencies, including other components of the statewide workforce investment system and to advise those individuals about client assistance programs; (v) physical and mental restoration services, to the extent that financial support is not readily available from a source other than the State Department of Rehabilitation Services (such as through health insurance or a comparable service or benefit); (vi) vocational and other training services, including personal and vocational adjustment training, books, tools, and other training materials, except that no training or training services in an institution of higher learning (universities, colleges, community or junior colleges, vocational schools, technical institutes, or hospital schools of nursing) may be paid for with funds under this law unless maximum efforts have been made by the state unit and the individual to secure grant assistance in whole or in part from other sources to pay for that training; (vii) maintenance; (viii) transportation in connection with the rendering of any vocational rehabilitation service; (ix) vocational rehabilitation services to family members of an applicant or eligible individual if necessary to enable the applicant or eligible individual to achieve an employment outcome; (x) interpreter services, including sign language and oral interpreter services, for individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing and tactile interpreting services for individuals who are deaf-blind provided by qualified personnel; (xi) reader services, rehabilitation teaching services, and orientation and mobility services for individuals who are blind; (xii) job-related services, including job search and placement assistance, job retention services, follow-up services, and follow-along services; (xiii) supported employment services; (xiv) personal assistance services; (xv) post-employment services; (xvi) occupational licenses, tools, equipment, initial stocks, and supplies; (xvii) rehabilitation technology including vehicular modification, telecommunications, sensory, and other technological aids and devices; (xviii) transition services; (xix) technical assistance and other consultation services to conduct market analyses, develop business plans, and otherwise provide resources, to the extent those resources are authorized to be provided through the statewide workforce investment system, to eligible individuals who are pursuing self-employment or telecommuting or establishing a small business operation as an employment outcome; (xx) other goods and services determined necessary for the individual with a disability to achieve an employment outcome. SECTION 16.  Section 37-41-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-41-3.  Pupils of legal school age, which shall include kindergarten pupils, and in actual attendance in the public schools who live a distance of one (1) mile or more by the nearest traveled road from the school to which they are assigned by the school district in which they are enrolled shall be entitled to transportation within the meaning of this chapter.  Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to bar any child from such transportation where he or she lives less than one (1) mile and is on the regular route of travel of a school bus and space is available in such bus for such transportation.  No state funds shall be paid for the transportation of children living within one (1) mile of the school, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, and such children shall not be included in transportation reports.  In the development of route plans, economy shall be a prime consideration.  There shall be no duplication of routes except in circumstances where it is totally unavoidable.  The State Department of Education shall have authority to investigate school bus routing when there is reason to believe the provisions of this statute are being violated.  The State Board of Education shall have authority to withhold transportation funds when school districts fail to correct unnecessary route duplication.  * * *Provided further, that All school districts are * * *hereby authorized to lease or contract with any public or private individual, partnership, corporation, association, agency or other organization for the implementation of transportation of pupils as provided for in this section. The school boards may provide transportation to such * * * crippled and physically handicapped children with physical disabilities as may be designated by such boards, when the failure to do so would result in undue hardship, even though the children are not otherwise entitled to transportation under the provisions of this chapter.  The State Department of Education shall require all school districts * * *during the 1993‑1994 school year to equip school buses with properly designed seat belts to protect such * * *physically handicapped children with physical disabilities, and school districts are authorized to expend funds therefor from * * *nonminimum program or other sources other than Mississippi student funding formula funds. Where space is available, students attending public community or junior colleges shall be allowed transportation on established routes in district-owned buses.  However, no additional funds shall be allocated or expended for such purposes, and such persons shall not be included in transportation reports. Children enrolled in special or alternative programs approved by school boards may be provided transportation even though such children are not otherwise entitled to transportation under the provisions of this chapter.  No additional funds shall be allocated or expended for such purpose, and such children shall not be included in transportation reports. SECTION 17.  Section 41-3-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-3-15.  (1)  (a)  There shall be a State Department of Health. (b)  The State Board of Health shall have the following powers and duties: (i)  To formulate the policy of the State Department of Health regarding public health matters within the jurisdiction of the department; (ii)  To adopt, modify, repeal and promulgate, after due notice and hearing, and enforce rules and regulations implementing or effectuating the powers and duties of the department under any and all statutes within the department's jurisdiction, and as the board may deem necessary; (iii)  To apply for, receive, accept and expend any federal or state funds or contributions, gifts, trusts, devises, bequests, grants, endowments or funds from any other source or transfers of property of any kind; (iv)  To enter into, and to authorize the executive officer to execute contracts, grants and cooperative agreements with any federal or state agency or subdivision thereof, or any public or private institution located inside or outside the State of Mississippi, or any person, corporation or association in connection with carrying out the provisions of this chapter, if it finds those actions to be in the public interest and the contracts or agreements do not have a financial cost that exceeds the amounts appropriated for those purposes by the Legislature; (v)  To appoint, upon recommendation of the Executive Officer of the State Department of Health, a Director of Internal Audit who shall be either a Certified Public Accountant or Certified Internal Auditor, and whose employment shall be continued at the discretion of the board, and who shall report directly to the board, or its designee; and (vi)  To discharge such other duties, responsibilities and powers as are necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter. (c)  The Executive Officer of the State Department of Health shall have the following powers and duties: (i)  To administer the policies of the State Board of Health within the authority granted by the board; (ii)  To supervise and direct all administrative and technical activities of the department, except that the department's internal auditor shall be subject to the sole supervision and direction of the board; (iii)  To organize the administrative units of the department in accordance with the plan adopted by the board and, with board approval, alter the organizational plan and reassign responsibilities as he or she may deem necessary to carry out the policies of the board; (iv)  To coordinate the activities of the various offices of the department; (v)  To employ, subject to regulations of the State Personnel Board, qualified professional personnel in the subject matter or fields of each office, and such other technical and clerical staff as may be required for the operation of the department.  The executive officer shall be the appointing authority for the department, and shall have the power to delegate the authority to appoint or dismiss employees to appropriate subordinates, subject to the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board; (vi)  To recommend to the board such studies and investigations as he or she may deem appropriate, and to carry out the approved recommendations in conjunction with the various offices; (vii)  To prepare and deliver to the Legislature and the Governor on or before January 1 of each year, and at such other times as may be required by the Legislature or Governor, a full report of the work of the department and the offices thereof, including a detailed statement of expenditures of the department and any recommendations the board may have; (viii)  To prepare and deliver to the Chairmen of the Public Health and Welfare/Human Services Committees of the Senate and House on or before January 1 of each year, a plan for monitoring infant mortality in Mississippi and a full report of the work of the department on reducing Mississippi's infant mortality and morbidity rates and improving the status of maternal and infant health; and (ix)  To enter into contracts, grants and cooperative agreements with any federal or state agency or subdivision thereof, or any public or private institution located inside or outside the State of Mississippi, or any person, corporation or association in connection with carrying out the provisions of this chapter, if he or she finds those actions to be in the public interest and the contracts or agreements do not have a financial cost that exceeds the amounts appropriated for those purposes by the Legislature.  Each contract or agreement entered into by the executive officer shall be submitted to the board before its next meeting. (2)  The State Board of Health shall have the authority to establish an Office of Rural Health within the department.  The duties and responsibilities of this office shall include the following: (a)  To collect and evaluate data on rural health conditions and needs; (b)  To engage in policy analysis, policy development and economic impact studies with regard to rural health issues; (c)  To develop and implement plans and provide technical assistance to enable community health systems to respond to various changes in their circumstances; (d)  To plan and assist in professional recruitment and retention of medical professionals and assistants; and (e)  To establish information clearinghouses to improve access to and sharing of rural health care information. (3)  The State Board of Health shall have general supervision of the health interests of the people of the state and to exercise the rights, powers and duties of those acts which it is authorized by law to enforce. (4)  The State Board of Health shall have authority: (a)  To make investigations and inquiries with respect to the causes of disease and death, and to investigate the effect of environment, including conditions of employment and other conditions that may affect health, and to make such other investigations as it may deem necessary for the preservation and improvement of health. (b)  To make such sanitary investigations as it may, from time to time, deem necessary for the protection and improvement of health and to investigate nuisance questions that affect the security of life and health within the state. (c)  To direct and control sanitary and quarantine measures for dealing with all diseases within the state possible to suppress same and prevent their spread. (d)  To obtain, collect and preserve such information relative to mortality, morbidity, disease and health as may be useful in the discharge of its duties or may contribute to the prevention of disease or the promotion of health in this state. (e)  To charge and collect reasonable fees for health services, including immunizations, inspections and related activities, and the board shall charge fees for those services; however, if it is determined that a person receiving services is unable to pay the total fee, the board shall collect any amount that the person is able to pay.  Any increase in the fees charged by the board under this paragraph shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 41-3-65. (f)  (i)  To establish standards for, issue permits and exercise control over, any cafes, restaurants, food or drink stands, sandwich manufacturing establishments, and all other establishments, other than churches, church-related and private schools, and other nonprofit or charitable organizations, where food or drink is regularly prepared, handled and served for pay; and (ii)  To require that a permit be obtained from the Department of Health before those persons begin operation.  If any such person fails to obtain the permit required in this subparagraph (ii), the State Board of Health, after due notice and opportunity for a hearing, may impose a monetary penalty not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation.  However, the department is not authorized to impose a monetary penalty against any person whose gross annual prepared food sales are less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). Money collected by the board under this subparagraph (ii) shall be deposited to the credit of the State General Fund of the State Treasury. (g)  To promulgate rules and regulations and exercise control over the production and sale of milk pursuant to the provisions of Sections 75-31-41 through 75-31-49. (h)  On presentation of proper authority, to enter into and inspect any public place or building where the State Health Officer or his representative deems it necessary and proper to enter for the discovery and suppression of disease and for the enforcement of any health or sanitary laws and regulations in the state. (i)  To conduct investigations, inquiries and hearings, and to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and records at any hearing when authorized and required by statute to be conducted by the State Health Officer or the State Board of Health. (j)  To promulgate rules and regulations, and to collect data and information, on (i) the delivery of services through the practice of telemedicine; and (ii) the use of electronic records for the delivery of telemedicine services. (k)  To enforce and regulate domestic and imported fish as authorized under Section 69-7-601 et seq. (5)  (a)  The State Board of Health shall have the authority, in its discretion, to establish programs to promote the public health, to be administered by the State Department of Health. Specifically, those programs may include, but shall not be limited to, programs in the following areas: (i)  Maternal and child health; (ii)  Family planning; (iii)  Pediatric services; (iv)  Services to * * *crippled and disabled children with disabilities; (v)  Control of communicable and noncommunicable disease; (vi)  Chronic disease; (vii)  Accidental deaths and injuries; (viii)  Child care licensure; (ix)  Radiological health; (x)  Dental health; (xi)  Milk sanitation; (xii)  Occupational safety and health; (xiii)  Food, vector control and general sanitation; (xiv)  Protection of drinking water; (xv)  Sanitation in food handling establishments open to the public; (xvi)  Registration of births and deaths and other vital events; (xvii)  Such public health programs and services as may be assigned to the State Board of Health by the Legislature or by executive order; and (xviii)  Regulation of domestic and imported fish for human consumption. (b)  [Deleted] (c)  The State Department of Health may undertake such technical programs and activities as may be required for the support and operation of those programs, including maintaining physical, chemical, bacteriological and radiological laboratories, and may make such diagnostic tests for diseases and tests for the evaluation of health hazards as may be deemed necessary for the protection of the people of the state. (6)  (a)  The State Board of Health shall administer the local governments and rural water systems improvements loan program in accordance with the provisions of Section 41-3-16. (b)  The State Board of Health shall have authority: (i)  To enter into capitalization grant agreements with the United States Environmental Protection Agency, or any successor agency thereto; (ii)  To accept capitalization grant awards made under the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended; (iii)  To provide annual reports and audits to the United States Environmental Protection Agency, as may be required by federal capitalization grant agreements; and (iv)  To establish and collect fees to defray the reasonable costs of administering the revolving fund or emergency fund if the State Board of Health determines that those costs will exceed the limitations established in the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended.  The administration fees may be included in loan amounts to loan recipients for the purpose of facilitating payment to the board; however, those fees may not exceed five percent (5%) of the loan amount. (7)  [Deleted] (8)  Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, the State Department of Health shall have the following specific powers:  The State Department of Health is authorized to issue a license to an existing home health agency for the transfer of a county from that agency to another existing home health agency, and to charge a fee for reviewing and making a determination on the application for such transfer not to exceed one-half (1/2) of the authorized fee assessed for the original application for the home health agency, with the revenue to be deposited by the State Department of Health into the special fund created under Section 41-7-188. (9)  [Deleted] (10)  Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, the State Department of Health shall have the following specific powers:  The State Department of Health is authorized to extend and renew any certificate of need that has expired, and to charge a fee for reviewing and making a determination on the application for such action not to exceed one-half (1/2) of the authorized fee assessed for the original application for the certificate of need, with the revenue to be deposited by the State Department of Health into the special fund created under Section 41-7-188. (11)  Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, the State Department of Health shall have the following specific powers:  The State Department of Health is authorized and empowered, to revoke, immediately, the license and require closure of any institution for the aged or infirm, including any other remedy less than closure to protect the health and safety of the residents of * * *said the institution or the health and safety of the general public. (12)  Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, the State Department of Health shall have the following specific powers:  The State Department of Health is authorized and empowered, to require the temporary detainment of individuals for disease control purposes based upon violation of any order of the State Health Officer, as provided in Section 41-23-5.  For the purpose of enforcing such orders of the State Health Officer, persons employed by the department as investigators shall have general arrest powers.  All law enforcement officers are authorized and directed to assist in the enforcement of such orders of the State Health Officer. (13)  Additionally, the State Board of Health and the State Health Officer each are authorized and directed to study the status of health care, in its broadest sense, throughout the state.  The study should include challenges such as access to care; the cost of care; indigent care; providing health care to the incarcerated; the availability of health care workers, paraprofessionals, and professionals; the effects of unhealthy lifestyle choices; the consequences of health care facilities locating in affluent and urban areas to the detriment of less affluent areas, small towns, and rural areas; and negative trends which may cause ill effects if they continue.  The study shall also include opportunities to improve health care, such as greater coordination among state agencies, local governments, and other entities which provide various types of health care; methods of increasing the health care workforce; and methods to increase the location of health care facilities in distressed areas, rural areas, and small towns.  All state agencies, the Legislative Budget Office and the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) are directed to assist the department in developing this study.  This provision does not by itself grant any additional power to the State Board of Health or the State Health Officer to require any entity to operate differently.  It does, however, empower and direct them to obtain information and make recommendations, and it does require all entities to cooperate with the board and health officer as they seek information. SECTION 18.  Section 41-7-173, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-7-173.  For the purposes of Section 41-7-171 et seq., the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein, unless the context otherwise requires: (a)  "Affected person" means (i) the applicant; (ii) a person residing within the geographic area to be served by the applicant's proposal; (iii) a person who regularly uses health care facilities or HMOs located in the geographic area of the proposal which provide similar service to that which is proposed; (iv) health care facilities and HMOs which have, prior to receipt of the application under review, formally indicated an intention to provide service similar to that of the proposal being considered at a future date; (v) third-party payers who reimburse health care facilities located in the geographical area of the proposal; or (vi) any agency that establishes rates for health care services or HMOs located in the geographic area of the proposal. (b)  "Certificate of need" means a written order of the State Department of Health setting forth the affirmative finding that a proposal in prescribed application form, sufficiently satisfies the plans, standards and criteria prescribed for such service or other project by Section 41-7-171 et seq., and by rules and regulations promulgated thereunder by the State Department of Health. (c)  (i)  "Capital expenditure," when pertaining to defined major medical equipment, shall mean an expenditure which, under generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied, is not properly chargeable as an expense of operation and maintenance and which exceeds One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00). (ii)  "Capital expenditure," when pertaining to other than major medical equipment, shall mean any expenditure which under generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied is not properly chargeable as an expense of operation and maintenance and which exceeds, for clinical health services, as defined in paragraph (k) below, Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00), adjusted for inflation as published by the State Department of Health or which exceeds, for nonclinical health services, as defined in paragraph (k) below, Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00), adjusted for inflation as published by the State Department of Health. (iii)  A "capital expenditure" shall include the acquisition, whether by lease, sufferance, gift, devise, legacy, settlement of a trust or other means, of any facility or part thereof, or equipment for a facility, the expenditure for which would have been considered a capital expenditure if acquired by purchase.  Transactions which are separated in time but are planned to be undertaken within twelve (12) months of each other and are components of an overall plan for meeting patient care objectives shall, for purposes of this definition, be viewed in their entirety without regard to their timing. (iv)  In those instances where a health care facility or other provider of health services proposes to provide a service in which the capital expenditure for major medical equipment or other than major medical equipment or a combination of the two (2) may have been split between separate parties, the total capital expenditure required to provide the proposed service shall be considered in determining the necessity of certificate of need review and in determining the appropriate certificate of need review fee to be paid.  The capital expenditure associated with facilities and equipment to provide services in Mississippi shall be considered regardless of where the capital expenditure was made, in state or out of state, and regardless of the domicile of the party making the capital expenditure, in state or out of state. (d)  "Change of ownership" includes, but is not limited to, inter vivos gifts, purchases, transfers, lease arrangements, cash and/or stock transactions or other comparable arrangements whenever any person or entity acquires or controls a majority interest of an existing health care facility, and/or the change of ownership of major medical equipment, a health service, or an institutional health service.  Changes of ownership from partnerships, single proprietorships or corporations to another form of ownership are specifically included. However, "change of ownership" shall not include any inherited interest acquired as a result of a testamentary instrument or under the laws of descent and distribution of the State of Mississippi. (e)  "Commencement of construction" means that all of the following have been completed with respect to a proposal or project proposing construction, renovating, remodeling or alteration: (i)  A legally binding written contract has been consummated by the proponent and a lawfully licensed contractor to construct and/or complete the intent of the proposal within a specified period of time in accordance with final architectural plans which have been approved by the licensing authority of the State Department of Health; (ii)  Any and all permits and/or approvals deemed lawfully necessary by all authorities with responsibility for such have been secured; and (iii)  Actual bona fide undertaking of the subject proposal has commenced, and a progress payment of at least one percent (1%) of the total cost price of the contract has been paid to the contractor by the proponent, and the requirements of this paragraph (e) have been certified to in writing by the State Department of Health. Force account expenditures, such as deposits, securities, bonds, et cetera, may, in the discretion of the State Department of Health, be excluded from any or all of the provisions of defined commencement of construction. (f)  "Consumer" means an individual who is not a provider of health care as defined in paragraph (q) of this section. (g)  "Develop," when used in connection with health services, means to undertake those activities which, on their completion, will result in the offering of a new institutional health service or the incurring of a financial obligation as defined under applicable state law in relation to the offering of such services. (h)  "Health care facility" includes hospitals, psychiatric hospitals, chemical dependency hospitals, skilled nursing facilities, end-stage renal disease (ESRD) facilities, including freestanding hemodialysis units, intermediate care facilities, ambulatory surgical facilities, intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities, home health agencies, psychiatric residential treatment facilities, pediatric skilled nursing facilities, long-term care hospitals, comprehensive medical rehabilitation facilities, including facilities owned or operated by the state or a political subdivision or instrumentality of the state, but does not include Christian Science sanatoriums operated or listed and certified by the First Church of Christ, Scientist, Boston, Massachusetts.  This definition shall not apply to facilities for the private practice, either independently or by incorporated medical groups, of physicians, dentists or health care professionals except where such facilities are an integral part of an institutional health service. The various health care facilities listed in this paragraph shall be defined as follows: (i)  "Hospital" means an institution which is primarily engaged in providing to inpatients, by or under the supervision of physicians, diagnostic services and therapeutic services for medical diagnosis, treatment and care of injured, disabled or sick persons, or rehabilitation services for the rehabilitation of injured, disabled or sick persons.  Such term does not include psychiatric hospitals. (ii)  "Psychiatric hospital" means an institution which is primarily engaged in providing to inpatients, by or under the supervision of a physician, psychiatric services for the diagnosis and treatment of persons with mental illness. (iii)  "Chemical dependency hospital" means an institution which is primarily engaged in providing to inpatients, by or under the supervision of a physician, medical and related services for the diagnosis and treatment of chemical dependency such as alcohol and drug abuse. (iv)  "Skilled nursing facility" means an institution or a distinct part of an institution which is primarily engaged in providing to inpatients skilled nursing care and related services for patients who require medical or nursing care or rehabilitation services for the rehabilitation of injured, disabled or sick persons. (v)  "End-stage renal disease (ESRD) facilities" means kidney disease treatment centers, which includes freestanding hemodialysis units and limited care facilities. The term "limited care facility" generally refers to an off-hospital-premises facility, regardless of whether it is provider or nonprovider operated, which is engaged primarily in furnishing maintenance hemodialysis services to stabilized patients. (vi)  "Intermediate care facility" means an institution which provides, on a regular basis, health-related care and services to individuals who do not require the degree of care and treatment which a hospital or skilled nursing facility is designed to provide, but who, because of their mental or physical condition, require health-related care and services (above the level of room and board). (vii)  "Ambulatory surgical facility" means a facility primarily organized or established for the purpose of performing surgery for outpatients and is a separate identifiable legal entity from any other health care facility.  Such term does not include the offices of private physicians or dentists, whether for individual or group practice, and does not include any abortion facility as defined in Section 41-75-1(f). (viii)  "Intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities" means an intermediate care facility that provides health or rehabilitative services in a planned program of activities to persons with an intellectual disability, also including, but not limited to, cerebral palsy and other conditions covered by the Federal Developmentally Disabled Assistance and Bill of Rights Act, Public Law 94-103. (ix)  "Home health agency" means a public or privately owned agency or organization, or a subdivision of such an agency or organization, properly authorized to conduct business in Mississippi, which is primarily engaged in providing to individuals at the written direction of a licensed physician, in the individual's place of residence, skilled nursing services provided by or under the supervision of a registered nurse licensed to practice in Mississippi, and one or more of the following services or items: 1.  Physical, occupational or speech therapy; 2.  Medical social services; 3.  Part-time or intermittent services of a home health aide; 4.  Other services as approved by the licensing agency for home health agencies; 5.  Medical supplies, other than drugs and biologicals, and the use of medical appliances; or 6.  Medical services provided by an intern or resident-in-training at a hospital under a teaching program of such hospital. Further, all skilled nursing services and those services listed in items 1 through 4 of this subparagraph (ix) must be provided directly by the licensed home health agency.  For purposes of this subparagraph, "directly" means either through an agency employee or by an arrangement with another individual not defined as a health care facility. This subparagraph (ix) shall not apply to health care facilities which had contracts for the above services with a home health agency on January 1, 1990. (x)  "Psychiatric residential treatment facility" means any nonhospital establishment with permanent licensed facilities which provides a twenty-four-hour program of care by qualified therapists, including, but not limited to, duly licensed mental health professionals, psychiatrists, psychologists, psychotherapists and licensed certified social workers, for * * *emotionally disturbed children and adolescents with emotional disturbances who are referred to such facility by a court, local school district or by the Department of Human Services, who are not in an acute phase of illness requiring the services of a psychiatric hospital, and are in need of such restorative treatment services.  For purposes of this subparagraph, the term " * * *emotionally disturbed emotional disturbance" means a condition exhibiting one or more of the following characteristics over a long period of time and to a marked degree, which adversely affects educational performance: 1.  An inability to learn which cannot be explained by intellectual, sensory or health factors; 2.  An inability to build or maintain satisfactory relationships with peers and teachers; 3. Inappropriate types of behavior or feelings under normal circumstances; 4.  A general pervasive mood of unhappiness or depression; or 5.  A tendency to develop physical symptoms or fears associated with personal or school problems.  An establishment furnishing primarily domiciliary care is not within this definition. (xi)  "Pediatric skilled nursing facility" means an institution or a distinct part of an institution that is primarily engaged in providing to inpatients skilled nursing care and related services for persons under twenty-one (21) years of age who require medical or nursing care or rehabilitation services for the rehabilitation of injured, disabled or sick persons. (xii)  "Long-term care hospital" means a freestanding, Medicare-certified hospital that has an average length of inpatient stay greater than twenty-five (25) days, which is primarily engaged in providing chronic or long-term medical care to patients who do not require more than three (3) hours of rehabilitation or comprehensive rehabilitation per day, and has a transfer agreement with an acute care medical center and a comprehensive medical rehabilitation facility.  Long-term care hospitals shall not use rehabilitation, comprehensive medical rehabilitation, medical rehabilitation, sub-acute rehabilitation, nursing home, skilled nursing facility or sub-acute care facility in association with its name. (xiii)  "Comprehensive medical rehabilitation facility" means a hospital or hospital unit that is licensed and/or certified as a comprehensive medical rehabilitation facility which provides specialized programs that are accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation Facilities and supervised by a physician board certified or board eligible in physiatry or other doctor of medicine or osteopathy with at least two (2) years of training in the medical direction of a comprehensive rehabilitation program that: 1.  Includes evaluation and treatment of individuals with physical disabilities; 2.  Emphasizes education and training of individuals with disabilities; 3. Incorporates at least the following core disciplines: a. Physical Therapy; b. Occupational Therapy; c. Speech and Language Therapy; d. Rehabilitation Nursing; and 4. Incorporates at least three (3) of the following disciplines: a. Psychology; b. Audiology; c. Respiratory Therapy; d. Therapeutic Recreation; e. Orthotics; f. Prosthetics; g. Special Education; h. Vocational Rehabilitation; i. Psychotherapy; j. Social Work; k. Rehabilitation Engineering. These specialized programs include, but are not limited to:  spinal cord injury programs, head injury programs and infant and early childhood development programs. (i)  "Health maintenance organization" or "HMO" means a public or private organization organized under the laws of this state or the federal government which: (i)  Provides or otherwise makes available to enrolled participants health care services, including substantially the following basic health care services:  usual physician services, hospitalization, laboratory, x-ray, emergency and preventive services, and out-of-area coverage; (ii)  Is compensated (except for copayments) for the provision of the basic health care services listed in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph to enrolled participants on a predetermined basis; and (iii)  Provides physician services primarily: 1.  Directly through physicians who are either employees or partners of such organization; or 2.  Through arrangements with individual physicians or one or more groups of physicians (organized on a group practice or individual practice basis). (j)  "Health service area" means a geographic area of the state designated in the State Health Plan as the area to be used in planning for specified health facilities and services and to be used when considering certificate of need applications to provide health facilities and services. (k)  "Health services" means clinically related (i.e., diagnostic, treatment or rehabilitative) services and includes alcohol, drug abuse, mental health and home health care services.  "Clinical health services" shall only include those activities which contemplate any change in the existing bed complement of any health care facility through the addition or conversion of any beds, under Section 41-7-191(1)(c) or propose to offer any health services if those services have not been provided on a regular basis by the proposed provider of such services within the period of twelve (12) months prior to the time such services would be offered, under Section 41-7-191(1)(d).  "Nonclinical health services" shall be all other services which do not involve any change in the existing bed complement or offering health services as described above. (l)  "Institutional health services" shall mean health services provided in or through health care facilities and shall include the entities in or through which such services are provided. (m)  "Major medical equipment" means medical equipment designed for providing medical or any health-related service which costs in excess of One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00).  However, this definition shall not be applicable to clinical laboratories if they are determined by the State Department of Health to be independent of any physician's office, hospital or other health care facility or otherwise not so defined by federal or state law, or rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. (n)  "State Department of Health" or "department" shall mean the state agency created under Section 41-3-15, which shall be considered to be the State Health Planning and Development Agency, as defined in paragraph (u) of this section. (o)  "Offer," when used in connection with health services, means that it has been determined by the State Department of Health that the health care facility is capable of providing specified health services. (p)  "Person" means an individual, a trust or estate, partnership, corporation (including associations, joint-stock companies and insurance companies), the state or a political subdivision or instrumentality of the state. (q)  "Provider" shall mean any person who is a provider or representative of a provider of health care services requiring a certificate of need under Section 41-7-171 et seq., or who has any financial or indirect interest in any provider of services. (r)  "Radiation therapy services" means the treatment of cancer and other diseases using ionizing radiation of either high energy photons (x-rays or gamma rays) or charged particles (electrons, protons or heavy nuclei).  However, for purposes of a certificate of need, radiation therapy services shall not include low energy, superficial, external beam x-ray treatment of superficial skin lesions. (s)  "Secretary" means the Secretary of Health and Human Services, and any officer or employee of the Department of Health and Human Services to whom the authority involved has been delegated. (t)  "State Health Plan" means the sole and official statewide health plan for Mississippi which identifies priority state health needs and establishes standards and criteria for health-related activities which require certificate of need review in compliance with Section 41-7-191. (u)  "State Health Planning and Development Agency" means the agency of state government designated to perform health planning and resource development programs for the State of Mississippi. SECTION 19.  Section 41-11-102, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-11-102.  The administration, supervision, duties and all aspects of the Children's Rehabilitation Center shall be transferred to the University of Mississippi Medical Center in a division to be called Division of Children's Rehabilitation.  It is the intent that there shall be cooperation between the center, the Blake Center and the Department of Health, Children's Services. The University of Mississippi Medical Center is authorized and empowered to minister to the educational, medical and total needs of those affected by cerebral palsy and other * * *crippling disabling conditions which are amenable to such treatment.  The center shall be used to the greatest extent possible for such treatment. SECTION 20.  Section 41-11-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-11-105.  The * * *State Building Commission Department of Finance and Administration is * * *hereby authorized and empowered to erect, construct, and equip the Mississippi Children's Rehabilitation Center, which shall have as its purpose the treatment and education of persons afflicted with cerebral palsy and other * * *crippling disabling conditions which are amenable to such treatment.  The cost of constructing, erecting, and equipping such hospital may be paid from such funds as may be appropriated, or may heretofore have been appropriated, for such purpose by the Legislature; and funds which are available to the * * *State Building Commission Department of Finance and Administration or which have been set aside and earmarked for the construction, erection, and equipping of the "Crippled Children's Hospital" under the provisions of Chapter 291, Laws of 1954, or the "Mississippi Hospital School for Cerebral Palsy," under the provisions of Chapter 308, Laws of 1956, are * * *hereby designated and shall be applied to the constructing, erecting and equipping of the Mississippi Children's Rehabilitation Center. SECTION 21.  Section 41-11-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-11-109.  When the Mississippi Children's Rehabilitation Center has been completed and made ready for occupancy, the buildings and land on which they are located, together with any and all equipment therefor, shall be conveyed and transferred by the * * *State Building Commission Department of Finance and Administration to the University of Mississippi Medical Center for the use and benefit of the State of Mississippi in accordance with the provisions of Sections 41-11-101 through 41-11-113.  Title to all land, buildings and equipment held by the board of trustees of the Mississippi Hospital School for Cerebral Palsy shall be conveyed to the University of Mississippi Medical Center for the use and benefit of the state in accordance with the provisions of such sections. The University of Mississippi Medical Center may contract for and obtain the services of the State Board of Education for the purpose of conducting educational programs for children in the Mississippi Children's Rehabilitation Center, and all institutions and agencies of the state government are requested and directed to participate and cooperate to the fullest extent authorized by law in rendering assistance towards the rehabilitation and restoration of such cerebral palsy patients and patients with other * * * crippling  disabling conditions which are amenable to such treatment. No member of the family of any member of the board of trustees shall be eligible for treatment in the center.  * * * Crippled Children with physical disabilities shall be admitted to the center insofar as practicable in proportion to the number of such children in the counties of the State of Mississippi, so that all such * * *crippled children with physical disabilities shall have equal opportunity for admission to the center. SECTION 22.  Section 41-11-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-11-111.  The University of Mississippi Medical Center is authorized to accept any and all grants, donations or matching funds from private, public or federal sources in order to add to, improve and enlarge the physical facilities and equipment of the Mississippi Children's Rehabilitation Center.  The State Department of Health and the * * *Crippled Disabled Children's Service are * * *hereby specifically authorized and empowered to provide crutches, braces and any and all other mechanical devices available and designed for the assistance of those persons afflicted with cerebral palsy and other * * *crippling disabling conditions which are amenable to such treatment. SECTION 23.  Section 41-11-113, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-11-113.  It is the intent of Sections 41-11-101 through 41-11-113 to change the name of the "Mississippi Crippled Children's Treatment and Training Center" to the Mississippi Children's Rehabilitation Center and to place it under the supervision and control of the University of Mississippi Medical Center.  Sections 41-11-100 through 41-11-113 should be construed liberally in order to accomplish the broad objectives in aiding persons afflicted with cerebral palsy and other * * *crippling disabling conditions which are amenable to such treatment, in any and every manner possible by the use of new techniques as they are developed and become known, and by use of the combination of education and medical services for the rehabilitation of such persons. SECTION 24.  Section 41-13-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-13-35.  (1)  The board of trustees of any community hospital shall have full authority to appoint an administrator, who shall not be a member of the board of trustees, and to delegate reasonable authority to such administrator for the operation and maintenance of such hospital and all property and facilities otherwise appertaining thereto. (2)  The board of trustees shall have full authority to select from its members, officers and committees and, by resolution or through the board bylaws, to delegate to such officers and committees reasonable authority to carry out and enforce the powers and duties of the board of trustees during the interim periods between regular meetings of the board of trustees; * * *provided, however, * * *that any such action taken by an officer or committee shall be subject to review by the board, and actions may be withdrawn or nullified at the next subsequent meeting of the board of trustees if the action is in excess of delegated authority. (3)  The board of trustees shall be responsible for governing the community hospital under its control and shall make and enforce staff and hospital bylaws and/or rules and regulations necessary for the administration, government, maintenance and/or expansion of such hospitals.  The board of trustees shall keep minutes of its official business and shall comply with Section 41-9-68. (4)  The decisions of the board of trustees of the community hospital shall be valid and binding unless expressly prohibited by applicable statutory or constitutional provisions. (5)  The powers and duties of the board of trustees shall specifically include, but not be limited to, the following: (a)  To deposit and invest funds of the community hospital in accordance with Section 27-105-365; (b)  To establish such equitable wage and salary programs and other employment benefits as may be deemed expedient or proper, and in so doing, to expend reasonable funds for such employee salary and benefits.  Allowable employee programs shall specifically include, but not be limited to, medical benefit, life, accidental death and dismemberment, disability, retirement and other employee coverage plans.  The hospital may offer and fund such programs directly or by contract with any third party and shall be authorized to take all actions necessary to implement, administer and operate such plans, including payroll deductions for such plans; (c)  To authorize employees to attend and to pay actual expenses incurred by employees while engaged in hospital business or in attending recognized educational or professional meetings; (d)  To enter into loan or scholarship agreements with employees or students to provide educational assistance where such student or employee agrees to work for a stipulated period of time for the hospital; (e)  To devise and implement employee incentive programs; (f)  To recruit and financially assist physicians and other health care practitioners in establishing, or relocating practices within the service area of the community hospital including, without limitation, direct and indirect financial assistance, loan agreements, agreements guaranteeing minimum incomes for a stipulated period from opening of the practice and providing free office space or reduced rental rates for office space where such recruitment would directly benefit the community hospital and/or the health and welfare of the citizens of the service area; (g)  To contract by way of lease, lease-purchase or otherwise, with any agency, department or other office of government or any individual, partnership, corporation, owner, other board of trustees, or other health care facility, for the providing of property, equipment or services by or to the community hospital or other entity or regarding any facet of the construction, management, funding or operation of the community hospital or any division or department thereof, or any related activity, including, without limitation, shared management expertise or employee insurance and retirement programs, and to terminate those contracts when deemed in the best interests of the community hospital; (h)  To file suit on behalf of the community hospital to enforce any right or claims accruing to the hospital and to defend and/or settle claims against the community hospital and/or its board of trustees; (i)  To sell or otherwise dispose of any chattel property of the community hospital by any method deemed appropriate by the board where such disposition is consistent with the hospital purposes or where such property is deemed by the board to be surplus or otherwise unneeded; (j)  To let contracts for the construction, remodeling, expansion or acquisition, by lease or purchase, of hospital or health care facilities, including real property, within the service area for community hospital purposes where such may be done with operational funds without encumbrancing the general funds of the county or municipality, provided that any contract for the purchase or lease of real property must have the prior approval of the owner; (k)  To borrow money and enter other financing arrangements for community hospital and related purposes and to grant security interests in hospital equipment and other hospital assets and to pledge a percentage of hospital revenues as security for such financings where needed; provided that the owner shall specify by resolution the maximum borrowing authority and maximum percent of revenue that may be pledged by the board of trustees during any given fiscal year; (l)  To expend hospital funds for public relations or advertising programs; (m)  To offer the following inpatient and outpatient services, after complying with applicable health planning, licensure statutes and regulations, whether or not heretofore offered by such hospital or other similar hospitals in this state and whether or not heretofore authorized to be offered, long-term care, extended care, home care, after-hours clinic services, ambulatory surgical clinic services, preventative health care services including wellness services, health education, rehabilitation and diagnostic and treatment services; to promote, develop, operate and maintain a center providing care or residential facilities for * * *the persons who are aged, convalescent or * * *handicapped disabled; and to promote, develop and institute any other services having an appropriate place in the operation of a hospital offering complete community health care; (n)  To promote, develop, acquire, operate and maintain on a nonprofit basis, or on a profit basis if the community hospital's share of profits is used solely for community hospital and related purposes in accordance with this chapter, either separately or jointly with one or more other hospitals or health-related organizations, facilities and equipment for providing goods, services and programs for hospitals, other health care providers, and other persons or entities in need of such goods, services and programs and, in doing so, to provide for contracts of employment or contracts for services and ownership of property on terms that will protect the public interest; (o)  To establish and operate medical offices, child care centers, wellness or fitness centers and other facilities and programs which the board determines are appropriate in the operation of a community hospital for the benefit of its employees, personnel and/or medical staff which shall be operated as an integral part of the hospital and which may, in the direction of the board of trustees, be offered to the general public.  If such programs are not established in existing facilities or constructed on real estate previously acquired by the owners, the board of trustees shall also have authority to acquire, by lease or purchase, such facilities and real property within the service area, whether or not adjacent to existing facilities, provided that any contract for the purchase of real property shall be ratified by the owner.  The trustees shall lease any such medical offices to members of the medical staff at rates deemed appropriate and may, in its discretion, establish rates to be paid for the use of other facilities or programs by its employees or personnel or members of the public whom the trustees may determine may properly use such other facilities or programs; (p)  Provide, at its discretion, ambulance service and/or to contract with any third party, public or private, for the providing of such service; (q)  Establish a fair and equitable system for the billing of patients for care or users of services received through the community hospital, which in the exercise of the board of trustees' prudent fiscal discretion, may allow for rates to be classified according to the potential usage by an identified group or groups of patients of the community hospital's services and may allow for standard discounts where the discount is designed to reduce the operating costs or increase the revenues of the community hospital.  Such billing system may also allow for the payment of charges by means of a credit card or similar device and allow for payment of administrative fees as may be regularly imposed by a banking institution or other credit service organization for the use of such cards; (r)  To establish as an organizational part of the hospital or to aid in establishing as a separate entity from the hospital, hospital auxiliaries designed to aid the hospital, its patients, and/or families and visitors of patients, and when the auxiliary is established as a separate entity from the hospital, the board of trustees may cooperate with the auxiliary in its operations as the board of trustees deems appropriate; (s)  To make any agreements or contracts with the federal government or any agency thereof, the State of Mississippi or any agency thereof, and any county, city, town, supervisors district or election district within this state, jointly or separately, for the maintenance of charity facilities; (t)  To acquire hospitals, health care facilities and other health care-related operations and assets, through direct purchase, merger, consolidation, lease or other means; (u)  To enter into joint ventures, joint-operating agreements or similar arrangements with other public or private health care-related organizations, or with for-profit or nonprofit corporations, for-profit or nonprofit limited liability companies or other similar organizations, either directly or through a nonprofit corporation formed or owned by the community hospital, for the joint operation of all or part of the community hospital, or the joint operation of any health care facilities or health care services, and in doing so, to convey the community hospital's assets, service lines or facilities to the joint venture or to any other organization or entity for fair market value, and to provide for contracts of employment or contracts for services and ownership of property that will protect the public interest; (v)  To form, establish, fund and operate nonprofit corporations, nonprofit limited liability companies, state-sponsored entities or other similar organizations, either directly or through a nonprofit corporation formed by the community hospital, which are jointly owned with other public or private hospitals, for-profit or nonprofit corporations, or other health care-related organizations, for the purpose of conducting activities within or outside of the community hospital's service area for the benefit of the community hospital, including, but not limited to, joint hospital acquisitions, group purchasing, clinically integrated networks, payor contracting, and joint requests for federal and state grants and funding; (w)  To make capital contributions, loans, debt or equity financing to or for any joint venture or similar arrangement in which the community hospital, or any nonprofit corporation formed, leased or owned by the community hospital, has or acquires an ownership interest, and to guarantee loans and any other obligations for such purposes; (x)  To establish arrangements for the community hospital to participate in financial integration and/or clinical integration or clinically integrated networks with a joint venture, with other public or private or nonprofit health-related organizations, or through a joint-operating agreement; (y)  To have an ownership interest in, make capital contributions to, and assume financial risk under, accountable care organizations or similar organizations; (z)  To enter into any contract for a term of any length, regardless of whether the length or term of the contract exceeds the term of the board of trustees of the community hospital; (aa)  To elect some, any or all of the members of the board of directors of any nonprofit corporation of which the community hospital is a member; (bb)  To create, establish, acquire, operate or support subsidiaries and affiliates, either for-profit or nonprofit or other similar entity, to assist the community hospital in fulfilling its purposes; (cc)  To create, establish or support nonaffiliated for-profit or nonprofit corporations or other similar lawful business organizations that operate and have as their purposes the furtherance of the community hospital's purposes; (dd)  Without limiting the generality of any provisions of this section, to accomplish and facilitate the creation, establishment, acquisition, operation or support of any such subsidiary, affiliate, nonaffiliated corporation or other lawful business organization, by means of loans of funds, acquisition or transfer of assets, leases of real or personal property, gifts and grants of funds or guarantees of indebtedness of such subsidiaries, affiliates and nonaffiliated corporations; (ee)  To exercise all powers granted under this section in such a manner as the community hospital, through its board of trustees, may determine to be consistent with the purposes of this chapter, including the state action immunity provided by this section from state and federal antitrust laws to the fullest extent possible, notwithstanding that as a consequence of such exercise of such powers it engages in activities that may be deemed "anticompetitive" or which displace competition within the meaning or contemplation of the antitrust laws of this state or of the United States; and (ff)  The board of trustees shall not sell, purchase, convey, lease, or enter into agreements that have the effect of selling, purchasing, conveying, or leasing any real property or enter into management agreements, merger agreements, joint ventures, joint-operating agreements or similar arrangements that transfer control of any real property or the operations of a community hospital described in this subsection without the prior approval of the owners of the real property. (6)  No board of trustees of any community hospital may accept any grant of money or other thing of value from any not-for-profit or for-profit organization established for the purpose of supporting health care in the area served by the facility unless two-thirds (2/3) of the trustees vote to accept the grant. (7)  No board of trustees, individual trustee or any other person who is an agent or servant of the trustees of any community hospital shall have any personal financial interest in any not-for-profit or for-profit organization which, regardless of its stated purpose of incorporation, provides assistance in the form of grants of money or property to community hospitals or provides services to community hospitals in the form of performance of functions normally associated with the operations of a hospital. (8)  The Legislature finds and declares as follows: (a)  The needs of the residents of Mississippi can best be served by community hospitals having the legal, financial and operational flexibility to take full advantage of opportunities and challenges presented by the evolving health care environment and to take whatever actions are necessary to enable the community hospitals' continuation as health care systems that provide the finest possible quality of care consistent with reasonable costs. (b)  In this environment, the community hospitals must have the ability to respond to changing conditions by having the power to develop efficient and cost-effective methods and structures to provide for health care needs, while maintaining a public mission and character.  In addition, community hospitals in Mississippi are political subdivisions of the state.  Accordingly, the Legislature finds that there is a compelling interest in establishing a structure and process for a community hospital to adapt to this dynamic environment, to operate efficiently, to offer competitive health care services, to respond more effectively to new developments and regulatory changes in the health care area, and to continue to serve and promote the health, wellness and welfare of the citizens of Mississippi.  The acquisition, operation and financing of hospitals and other health care facilities by the community hospitals are declared to be for a public and governmental purpose and a matter of public necessity. (c)  The geographic areas served by community hospitals include rural populations and other groups that experience significant health disparities.  Health disparities are differences in health status when compared to the population overall, often characterized by indicators such as higher incidence of disease and/or disability, increased mortality rates, and lower life expectancies.  Rural risk factors for health disparities include geographic isolation, lower socioeconomic status, higher rates of health risk behaviors and limited access to health care specialists and subspecialists.  As a result of these health disparities, the residents of areas served by community hospitals have high rates of mortality and morbidity, heart disease, cancer, diabetes and other illnesses.  The areas also include a high percentage of uninsured individuals and Medicaid patients, which are medically underserved groups.  Community hospitals have demonstrated their ability to provide high-quality health care and to improve health conditions and outcomes as well as access to care.  This section will significantly strengthen the ability of community hospitals to serve the health care needs of the residents of their service areas. (d)  The community hospitals' investment of significant public assets and their efforts to provide high quality health care services to medically underserved populations are jeopardized by potential limits on the ability of community hospitals to collaborate and consolidate with other public, private, for-profit and nonprofit health care facilities and providers.  The Legislature expressly finds that the benefits of collaboration and consolidation by the community hospitals outweigh any adverse impact on competition.  The benefits of the community hospitals' efforts to collaborate and consolidate include, but are not limited to, preserving and expanding needed health care services in its service area; consolidating unneeded or duplicative health care services; enhancing the quality of, and expanding access to, health care delivered to medically underserved and rural populations; and lowering costs and improving the efficiency of the health care services it delivers.  Based on the findings contained in this section, the Legislature affirmatively expresses a policy to allow community hospitals to consolidate with other public, private, for-profit or nonprofit hospitals, health care facilities and providers and to engage in collaborative activities consistent with their health care purposes, notwithstanding that those consolidations and collaborations may have the effect of displacing competition in the provision of hospital or other health care-related services.  In engaging in such consolidations and collaborations with other public, private, for-profit or nonprofit hospitals, health care facilities and providers, the community hospital shall be considered to be acting pursuant to clearly articulated state policy as established in this section and shall not be subject to federal or state antitrust laws while so acting. With respect to the consolidations, collaborative activities and other activities contemplated in this section, the community hospital and the public, private, for-profit or nonprofit entities with which it consolidates, collaborates, or enters into any of the transactions set forth in this section, shall be immune from liability under the federal and state antitrust laws and those activities are provided with state action immunity from federal and state antitrust laws to the fullest extent possible. SECTION 25.  Section 41-19-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-19-33.  (1)  Each region so designated or established under Section 41-19-31 shall establish a regional commission to be composed of members appointed by the boards of supervisors of the various counties in the region.  Each regional commission shall employ or contract with an accountant for the purpose of managing the finances of the commission.  The accountant shall provide an annual audit to the commission in addition to his or her other duties.  It shall be the duty of such regional commission to administer mental health/intellectual disability programs certified and required by the State Board of Mental Health and as specified in Section 41-4-1(2).  In addition, once designated and established as provided hereinabove, a regional commission shall have the following authority and shall pursue and promote the following general purposes: (a)  To establish, own, lease, acquire, construct, build, operate and maintain mental illness, mental health, intellectual disability, alcoholism and general rehabilitative facilities and services designed to serve the needs of the people of the region so designated, provided that the services supplied by the regional commissions shall include those services determined by the Department of Mental Health to be necessary and may include, in addition to the above, services for persons with developmental and learning disabilities; for persons suffering from narcotic addiction and problems of drug abuse and drug dependence; and for the aging as designated and certified by the Department of Mental Health.  Such regional mental health and intellectual disability commissions and other community service providers shall, on or before July 1 of each year, submit an annual operational plan to the Department of Mental Health for approval or disapproval based on the minimum standards and minimum required services established by the department for certification and itemize the services as specified in Section 41-4-1(2), including financial statements.  As part of the annual operation plan required by Section 41-4-7(h) submitted by any regional community mental health center or by any other reasonable certification deemed acceptable by the department, the community mental health center shall state those services specified in Section 41-4-1(2) that it will provide and also those services that it will not provide.  If the department finds deficiencies in the plan of any regional commission or community service provider based on the minimum standards and minimum required services established for certification, the department shall give the regional commission or community service provider a six-month probationary period to bring its standards and services up to the established minimum standards and minimum required services.  The regional commission or community service provider shall develop a sustainability business plan within thirty (30) days of being placed on probation, which shall be signed by all commissioners and shall include policies to address one or more of the following:  the deficiencies in programmatic services, clinical service staff expectations, timely and appropriate billing, processes to obtain credentialing for staff, monthly reporting processes, third-party financial reporting and any other required documentation as determined by the department.  After the six-month probationary period, if the department determines that the regional commission or community service provider still does not meet the minimum standards and minimum required services established for certification, the department may remove the certification of the commission or provider, and from and after July 1, 2011, the commission or provider shall be ineligible for state funds from Medicaid reimbursement or other funding sources for those services.  After the six-month probationary period, the Department of Mental Health may identify an appropriate community service provider to provide any core services in that county that are not provided by a community mental health center.  However, the department shall not offer reimbursement or other accommodations to a community service provider of core services that were not offered to the decertified community mental health center for the same or similar services. (b)  To provide facilities and services for the prevention of mental illness, mental disorders, developmental and learning disabilities, alcoholism, narcotic addiction, drug abuse, drug dependence and other related * * *handicaps disabilities or problems (including the problems of the aging) among the people of the region so designated, and for the rehabilitation of persons suffering from such illnesses, disorders, * * *handicaps disabilities or problems as designated and certified by the Department of Mental Health. (c)  To promote increased understanding of the problems of mental illness, intellectual disabilities, alcoholism, developmental and learning disabilities, narcotic addiction, drug abuse and drug dependence and other related disabilities or problems (including the problems of the aging) by the people of the region, and also to promote increased understanding of the purposes and methods of the rehabilitation of persons suffering from such illnesses, disorders, * * *handicaps disabilities or problems as designated and certified by the Department of Mental Health. (d)  To enter into contracts and to make such other arrangements as may be necessary, from time to time, with the United States government, the government of the State of Mississippi and such other agencies or governmental bodies as may be approved by and acceptable to the regional commission for the purpose of establishing, funding, constructing, operating and maintaining facilities and services for the care, treatment and rehabilitation of persons suffering from mental illness, an intellectual disability, alcoholism, developmental and learning disabilities, narcotic addiction, drug abuse, drug dependence and other illnesses, disorders, * * *handicaps disabilities and problems (including the problems of the aging) as designated and certified by the Department of Mental Health. (e)  To enter into contracts and make such other arrangements as may be necessary with any and all private businesses, corporations, partnerships, proprietorships or other private agencies, whether organized for profit or otherwise, as may be approved by and acceptable to the regional commission for the purpose of establishing, funding, constructing, operating and maintaining facilities and services for the care, treatment and rehabilitation of persons suffering from mental illness, an intellectual disability, alcoholism, developmental and learning disabilities, narcotic addiction, drug abuse, drug dependence and other illnesses, disorders, * * *handicaps disabilities and problems (including the problems of the aging) relating to minimum services established by the Department of Mental Health. (f)  To promote the general mental health of the people of the region. (g)  To pay the administrative costs of the operation of the regional commissions, including per diem for the members of the commission and its employees, attorney's fees, if and when such are required in the opinion of the commission, and such other expenses of the commission as may be necessary.  The Department of Mental Health standards and audit rules shall determine what administrative cost figures shall consist of for the purposes of this paragraph.  Each regional commission shall submit a cost report annually to the Department of Mental Health in accordance with guidelines promulgated by the department. (h)  To employ and compensate any personnel that may be necessary to effectively carry out the programs and services established under the provisions of the aforesaid act, provided such person meets the standards established by the Department of Mental Health. (i)  To acquire whatever hazard, casualty or workers' compensation insurance that may be necessary for any property, real or personal, owned, leased or rented by the commissions, or any employees or personnel hired by the commissions. (j)  To acquire professional liability insurance on all employees as may be deemed necessary and proper by the commission, and to pay, out of the funds of the commission, all premiums due and payable on account thereof. (k)  To provide and finance within their own facilities, or through agreements or contracts with other local, state or federal agencies or institutions, nonprofit corporations, or political subdivisions or representatives thereof, programs and services for persons with mental illness, including treatment for alcoholics, and promulgating and administering of programs to combat drug abuse and programs for services for persons with an intellectual disability. (l)  To borrow money from private lending institutions in order to promote any of the foregoing purposes.  A commission may pledge collateral, including real estate, to secure the repayment of money borrowed under the authority of this paragraph.  Any such borrowing undertaken by a commission shall be on terms and conditions that are prudent in the sound judgment of the members of the commission, and the interest on any such loan shall not exceed the amount specified in Section 75-17-105. Any money borrowed, debts incurred or other obligations undertaken by a commission, regardless of whether borrowed, incurred or undertaken before or after March 15, 1995, shall be valid, binding and enforceable if it or they are borrowed, incurred or undertaken for any purpose specified in this section and otherwise conform to the requirements of this paragraph. (m)  To acquire, own and dispose of real and personal property.  Any real and personal property paid for with state and/or county appropriated funds must have the written approval of the Department of Mental Health and/or the county board of supervisors, depending on the original source of funding, before being disposed of under this paragraph. (n)  To enter into managed care contracts and make such other arrangements as may be deemed necessary or appropriate by the regional commission in order to participate in any managed care program.  Any such contract or arrangement affecting more than one (1) region must have prior written approval of the Department of Mental Health before being initiated and annually thereafter. (o)  To provide facilities and services on a discounted or capitated basis.  Any such action when affecting more than one (1) region must have prior written approval of the Department of Mental Health before being initiated and annually thereafter. (p)  To enter into contracts, agreements or other arrangements with any person, payor, provider or other entity, under which the regional commission assumes financial risk for the provision or delivery of any services, when deemed to be necessary or appropriate by the regional commission.  Any action under this paragraph affecting more than one (1) region must have prior written approval of the Department of Mental Health before being initiated and annually thereafter. (q)  To provide direct or indirect funding, grants, financial support and assistance for any health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization or other managed care entity or contractor, where such organization, entity or contractor is operated on a nonprofit basis.  Any action under this paragraph affecting more than one (1) region must have prior written approval of the Department of Mental Health before being initiated and annually thereafter. (r)  To form, establish, operate, and/or be a member of or participant in, either individually or with one or more other regional commissions, any managed care entity as defined in Section 83-41-403(c).  Any action under this paragraph affecting more than one (1) region must have prior written approval of the Department of Mental Health before being initiated and annually thereafter. (s)  To meet at least annually with the board of supervisors of each county in its region for the purpose of presenting its total annual budget and total mental health/intellectual disability services system.  The commission shall submit an annual report on the adult mental health services, children mental health services and intellectual disability services required by the State Board of Mental Health. (t)  To provide alternative living arrangements for persons with serious mental illness, including, but not limited to, group homes for persons with chronic mental illness. (u)  To make purchases and enter into contracts for purchasing in compliance with the public purchasing law, Sections 31-7-12 and 31-7-13, with compliance with the public purchasing law subject to audit by the State Department of Audit. (v)  To ensure that all available funds are used for the benefit of persons with mental illness, persons with an intellectual disability, substance abusers and persons with developmental disabilities with maximum efficiency and minimum administrative cost.  At any time a regional commission, and/or other related organization whatever it may be, accumulates surplus funds in excess of one-half (1/2) of its annual operating budget, the entity must submit a plan to the Department of Mental Health stating the capital improvements or other projects that require such surplus accumulation.  If the required plan is not submitted within forty-five (45) days of the end of the applicable fiscal year, the Department of Mental Health shall withhold all state appropriated funds from such regional commission until such time as the capital improvement plan is submitted.  If the submitted capital improvement plan is not accepted by the department, the surplus funds shall be expended by the regional commission in the local mental health region on group homes for persons with mental illness, persons with an intellectual disability, substance abusers, children or other mental health/intellectual disability services approved by the Department of Mental Health. (w)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, to fingerprint and perform a criminal history record check on every employee or volunteer.  Every employee or volunteer shall provide a valid current social security number and/or driver's license number that will be furnished to conduct the criminal history record check.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. (x)  Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, each regional commission shall have the authority to create and operate a primary care health clinic to treat (i) its patients; and (ii) its patients' family members related within the third degree; and (iii) its patients' household members or caregivers, subject to the following requirements: (i)  The regional commission may employ and compensate any personnel necessary and must satisfy applicable state and federal laws and regulations regarding the administration and operation of a primary care health clinic. (ii)  A Mississippi licensed physician must be employed or under agreement with the regional commission to provide medical direction and/or to carry out the physician responsibilities as described under applicable state and/or federal law and regulations. (iii)  The physician providing medical direction for the primary care clinic shall not be certified solely in psychiatry. (iv)  A sliding fee scale may be used by the regional commission when no other payer source is identified. (v)  The regional commission must ensure services will be available and accessible promptly and in a manner that preserves human dignity and assures continuity of care. (vi)  The regional commission must provide a semiannual report to the Chairmen of the Public Health Committees in both the House of Representatives and Senate.  At a minimum, for each reporting period, these reports shall describe the number of patients provided primary care services, the types of services provided, and the payer source for the patients.  Except for patient information and any other information that may be exempt from disclosure under the Health Information Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) and the Mississippi Public Records Act, the reports shall be considered public records. (vii)  The regional commission must employ or contract with a core clinical staff that is multidisciplinary and culturally and linguistically competent. (viii)  The regional commission must ensure that its physician as described in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph (x) has admitting privileges at one or more local hospitals or has an agreement with a physician who has admitting privileges at one or more local hospitals to ensure continuity of care. (ix)  The regional commission must provide an independent financial audit report to the State Department of Mental Health and, except for patient information and any other information that may be exempt from disclosure under HIPAA and the Mississippi Public Records Act, the audit report shall be considered a public record. For the purposes of this paragraph (x), the term "caregiver" means an individual who has the principal and primary responsibility for caring for a child or dependent adult, especially in the home setting. (y)  In general to take any action which will promote, either directly or indirectly, any and all of the foregoing purposes. (z)  All regional commissioners shall receive new orientation training and annual training with continuing education regarding the Mississippi mental health system and services as developed by the State Department of Mental Health.  Training shall be provided at the expense of the department except for travel expenses which shall be paid by the regional commission. (aa)  To establish a community mental health center to provide mental health services in its region. (2)  The types of services established by the State Department of Mental Health that must be provided by the regional mental health/intellectual disability centers for certification by the department, and the minimum levels and standards for those services established by the department, shall be provided by the regional mental health/intellectual disability centers to children when such services are appropriate for children, in the determination of the department. (3)  Each regional commission shall compile quarterly financial statements and status reports from each individual community health center.  The compiled reports shall be submitted to the coordinator quarterly.  The reports shall contain a: (a)  Balance sheet; (b)  Statement of operations; (c)  Statement of cash flows; and (d)  Description of the status of individual community health center's actions taken to increase access to and availability of community mental health services. (4)  (a)  The community mental health center shall submit a written quarterly report to the board of supervisors of each county in its region.  The report shall be prepared on a standard form developed and provided to the community mental health centers by the State Department of Mental Health.  The report shall include the following information for the prior quarter: (i)  The number of occupancy percentages reported by the crisis stabilization unit in the region; (ii)  The number of individuals held in jail after the commitment process has been initiated and the number of individuals the community mental health center provided treatment to while they were in jail, as required by Section 41-21-67; (iii)  The number of pre-affidavit screenings conducted; (iv)  The number of individuals diverted to a lesser restrictive alternative from commitment; (v)  The number of crisis stabilization unit denials and the reason for denial; (vi)  Summary report of Medicaid claims, including denials; and (vii)  Cash balance as of the date of the end of the quarter. (b)  The community mental health center shall provide the Department of Mental Health, local sheriffs and chancery court judges with a copy of the community mental health center's report each quarter. (5)  (a)  In order to improve quality, access, and innovation in the provision of mental health and substance use services to individuals treated at Community Mental Health Centers, regional commissions, as established in Section 41-19-33, are authorized to provide services through enhanced certification as a Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic (CCBHC).  CCBHCs shall provide comprehensive, holistic services, respond to local needs, incorporate evidence-based practices, and establish care coordination as a center for service delivery, including effective community partnerships with law enforcement, schools, hospitals, primary care providers, veterans' groups and other organizations to improve care, reduce recidivism, and address health disparities. (b)  The Department of Mental Health and the Division of Medicaid are authorized and directed to submit an application to the federal Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration (SAMHSA) to join the Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic (CCBHC) Demonstration Grant at the next available application period. (c)  The CCBHC system shall be consistent with the demonstration program established by Section 223 of the Protecting Access to Medicare Act (PAMA) of 2014 and other applicable federal laws governing the CCBHC model.  The Department of Mental Health shall be the entity charged with certifying and monitoring compliance of CCBHC clinics, and the Division of Medicaid shall be responsible for establishing a prospective payment system (PPS) to fund the CCBHC program. SECTION 26.  Section 41-19-205, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-19-205.  A person may be deemed eligible for admission to the center if: (a)  His parents or guardian or person in loco parentis has resided in the state not less than one (1) year prior to the date of admission; and (b)  He is at least five (5) years of age and has such an intellectual disability that he is incapable of managing himself or his affairs, or he has an intellectual disability to the extent that special care, training and education provided at the center will enable him to better function in society; or (c)  He is committed to the center by the chancery court in the manner hereinafter provided; or (d)  He is under five (5) years of age and is approved for admission by the board of mental health, upon the recommendation of the director, because of having an exceptional * * *handicap disability. SECTION 27.  Section 41-19-237, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-19-237.  A person may be deemed eligible for admission to the center if: (a)  His parents or guardian or person in loco parentis has resided in the state not less than one (1) year before the date of admission; and (b)  He is at least five (5) years of age and has such an intellectual disability that he is incapable of managing himself or his affairs, or he has an intellectual disability to the extent that special care, training and education provided at the center will enable him to better function in society; or (c)  He is committed to the center by the chancery court in the manner hereinafter provided; or (d)  He is under five (5) years of age and is approved for admission by the Board of Mental Health, upon the recommendation of the director, because of having an exceptional * * *handicap disability. SECTION 28.  Section 41-19-257, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-19-257.  Persons who have attained the age of eighteen (18) years, who have been determined to be a * * *mentally ill person with mental illness as defined in Section 41-21-61 and who have been committed for treatment by the chancery court pursuant to Section 41-21-61 et seq. shall be eligible for acute treatment at the facilities. SECTION 29.  Section 41-19-261, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-19-261.  Any person who (a) under the provisions of Section 41-19-251 et seq. knowingly and unlawfully or improperly causes a person to be adjudged * * *mentally ill to have a mental illness, (b) procures the escape of a legally committed patient or knowingly conceals an escaped legally committed resident of the facility, or (c) unlawfully brings any firearm, deadly weapon or explosive into the facility or its grounds, or passes any thereof to patient, employee or officer of the facility, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), imprisonment for not less than six (6) months nor more than one (1) year, or both. SECTION 30.  Section 41-19-291, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-19-291.  (1)  The Specialized Treatment Facility for the Emotionally Disturbed, located in Harrison County, Mississippi, is recognized as now existing and shall be for the care and treatment of persons with mental illness.  The facility shall have the power to receive and hold property, real, personal, and mixed, as a body corporate.  The facility shall be under the direction and control of the State Board of Mental Health. (2)  Admissions shall be limited to * * *mentally or emotionally disturbed adolescents with mental or emotional disturbances who have been committed to the facility by a youth court judge or chancellor as provided in Section 41-21-109, or who are voluntarily admitted to the facility. (3)  With funds provided by the Legislature, by direct appropriation or authorized bond issue, with federal matching funds, or with any other available funds, the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management may construct and equip the necessary residential and service buildings and other facilities to care for the residents of the Specialized Treatment Facility for the Emotionally Disturbed. The general design of the facility and all construction plans shall be approved and recommended by the State Department of Mental Health. (4)  The Specialized Treatment Facility for the Emotionally Disturbed shall be administered by the State Board of Mental Health.  Provisions relating to the admission and care of residents at the facility shall be promulgated by the board. (5)  The Specialized Treatment Facility for the Emotionally Disturbed is authorized to establish and operate a school to meet the educational needs of its patients. (6)  Persons admitted to the Specialized Treatment Facility for the Emotionally Disturbed shall be assessed support and maintenance costs in accordance with the provisions of the state reimbursement laws as they apply to other state institutions. (7)  Any person who (a) knowingly and unlawfully or improperly causes a person to be adjudged * * *mentally ill to have a mental illness, (b) procures the escape of a legally committed patient or knowingly conceals an escaped legally committed patient of the facility or (c) unlawfully brings any firearm, deadly weapon or explosive into the facility or its grounds, or passes any thereof to a resident, employee or officer of the school, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00), or more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), imprisonment for not less than six (6) months, or both. (8)  The Specialized Treatment Facility for the Emotionally Disturbed is designated as a state agency for carrying out the purposes of any act of the Congress of the United States, now existing or at any time hereafter enacted, pertaining to mental illness. (9)  If no funding for the Specialized Treatment Facility for the Emotionally Disturbed is provided by state appropriation, the Department of Mental Health may lease the facility to carry out the purposes of the facility as provided in this section and Section 41-21-109.  Before the facility may be leased, the department, in conjunction with the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration, shall publicly issue requests for proposals, advertised in the same manner as provided in Section 31-7-13 for seeking competitive sealed bids.  The requests for proposals shall contain terms and conditions relating to submission of proposals, evaluation and selection of proposals, financial terms, legal responsibilities, and any other matters as the department and bureau determine to be appropriate for inclusion.  Upon receiving responses to the request for proposals, the department and bureau shall select the most qualified proposal or proposals on the basis of experience and qualifications of the proposers, the technical approach, the financial arrangements, the best value and overall benefits to the state, and any other relevant factors determined to be appropriate, and from those proposals, shall negotiate and enter a contract or contracts for the lease of the facility with one or more of the persons or firms submitting proposals.  However, if the department and bureau deem none of the proposals to be qualified or otherwise acceptable, the request for proposals process may be reinitiated. (10)  If the Specialized Treatment Facility for the Emotionally Disturbed is leased under subsection (9) of this section, the lessee of the facility must give first priority in hiring employees for the facility to the current employees at the facility.  This condition must be included as one (1) of the specifications in the request for proposals for leasing the facility. SECTION 31.  Section 41-21-131, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-21-131.  As used in Sections 41-21-131 through 41-21-143, the following terms shall have the meanings as defined in this section: (a)  "Crisis Intervention Team" means a community partnership among a law enforcement agency, a community mental health center, a hospital, other mental health providers, consumers and family members of consumers. (b)  "Participating partner" means a law enforcement agency, a community mental health center or a hospital that has each entered into collaborative agreements needed to implement a Crisis Intervention Team. (c)  "Catchment area" means a geographical area in which a Crisis Intervention Team operates and is defined by the jurisdictional boundaries of the law enforcement agency that is the participating partner. (d)  "Crisis Intervention Team officer" or "CIT officer" means a law enforcement officer who is authorized to make arrests under Section 99-3-1 and who is trained and certified in crisis intervention and who is working for a law enforcement agency that is a participating partner in a Crisis Intervention Team. (e)  "Substantial likelihood of bodily harm" means that: (i)  The person has threatened or attempted suicide or to inflict serious bodily harm to himself; or (ii)  The person has threatened or attempted homicide or other violent behavior; or (iii)  The person has placed others in reasonable fear of violent behavior and serious physical harm to them; or (iv)  The person is unable to avoid severe impairment or injury from specific risks; and (v)  There is substantial likelihood that serious harm will occur unless the person is placed under emergency treatment. (f)  "Single point of entry" means a specific hospital that is the participating partner in a Crisis Intervention Team and that has agreed to provide psychiatric emergency services and triage and referral services. (g)  "Psychiatric emergency services" means services designed to reduce the acute psychiatric symptoms of a person who * * *is mentally ill has a mental illness or a person who has an impairment caused by drugs or alcohol and, when possible, to stabilize that person so that continuing treatment can be provided in the local community. (h)  "Triage and referral services" means services designed to provide evaluation of a person with mental illness or a person who has an impairment caused by drugs or alcohol in order to direct that person to a mental health facility or other mental health provider that can provide appropriate treatment. (i)  "Comprehensive psychiatric emergency service" means a specialized psychiatric service operated by the single point of entry and located in or near the hospital emergency department that can provide psychiatric emergency services for a period of time greater than can be provided in the hospital emergency department. (j)  "Extended observation bed" means a hospital bed that is used by a comprehensive psychiatric emergency service and is licensed by the State Department of Health for that purpose. (k)  "Psychiatric nurse practitioner" means a registered nurse who has completed the educational requirements specified by the State Board of Nursing, has successfully passed either the adult or family psychiatric nurse practitioner examination and is licensed by the State Board of Nursing to work under the supervision of a physician at a single point of entry following protocols approved by the State Board of Nursing. (l)  "Psychiatric physician assistant" means a physician assistant who has completed the educational requirements and passed the certification examination as specified in Section 73-26-3, is licensed by the State Board of Medical Licensure, has had at least one (1) year of practice as a physician assistant employed by a community mental health center, and is working under the supervision of a physician at a single point of entry. SECTION 32.  Section 41-21-139, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-21-139.  (1)  If a CIT officer determines that a person is with substantial likelihood of bodily harm, that officer may take the person into custody for the purpose of transporting the person to the designated single point of entry serving the catchment area in which the officer works.  The CIT officer shall certify in writing the reasons for taking the person into custody. (2)  A CIT officer shall have no further legal responsibility or other obligations once a person taken into custody has been transported and received at the single point of entry. (3)  A CIT officer acting in good faith in connection with the detention of a person believed to be with substantial likelihood of bodily harm shall incur no liability, civil or criminal, for those acts. (4)  Only CIT officers authorized to operate within a catchment area may bring persons in custody to the single point of entry for that catchment area.  Law enforcement officers working outside the designated catchment area are not authorized to transport any person into the catchment area for the purpose of bringing that person to the single point of entry. (5)  Any person transported by a CIT officer to the single point of entry or any person referred by the community mental health center following guidelines of the collaborative agreements shall be examined by a physician, psychiatric nurse practitioner or psychiatric physician assistant.  If the person does not consent to voluntary evaluation and treatment, and the examiner determines that the person is a * * *mentally ill person with mental illness, as defined in Section 41-21-61(e), the examiner shall then determine if that person can be held under the provisions of Section 41-21-67(5).  All other provisions of Section 41-21-67(5) shall apply and be extended to include licensed psychiatric nurse practitioners and psychiatric physician assistants employed by the single point of entry, including protection from liability, as provided in this section, when acting in good faith.  If the examiner determines that the person is with substantial likelihood of bodily harm because of impairment caused by drugs or alcohol and determines that there is no reasonable, less-restrictive alternative, the person may be held at the single point of entry until the impairment has resolved and the person is no longer with substantial likelihood of bodily harm.  Persons acting in good faith in connection with the detention of a person with impairment caused by drugs or alcohol shall incur no liability, civil or criminal, for those acts. SECTION 33.  Section 41-31-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-31-15.  The provisions of the law with respect to the costs of commitment and the cost of support, including the prohibition in Section 41-21-65 regarding the charging of extra fees and expenses to persons initiating commitment proceedings, methods of determination of persons liable therefor, and methods of determination of financial ability, and all provisions of law enabling the state to secure reimbursement of any such items of cost, applicable to the commitment to and support of * * * the mentally ill persons with mental illness in state hospitals, shall apply with equal force in respect to each item of expense incurred by the state in connection with the commitment, care, custody, treatment, and rehabilitation of any person committed to the state hospitals and maintained in any institution or hospital operated by the State of Mississippi under the provisions of this chapter. SECTION 34.  Section 41-41-403, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-41-403.  Legislative findings and purpose.  (1)  The Legislature finds: (a)  The United States Supreme Court has been "zealous in vindicating the rights of people even potentially subjected to race, sex, and disability discrimination."  Box v. Planned Parenthood of Indiana and Kentucky, 139 S.Ct. 1780, 1792 (2019) (Thomas J., concurring) (citing Pena-Rodriguez v. Colorado, 580 U.S. ___, ___ (2017) (slip op., at 15) (condemning "discrimination on the basis of race" as "'odious in all aspects'"); United States v. Virginia, 518 U.S. 515, 532 (1996) (denouncing any "law or official policy [that] denies to women, simply because they are women...equal opportunity to aspire, achieve, participate in and contribute to society based on their individual talents and capacities"); Tennessee v. Lane, 541 U.S. 509, 522 (2004) (condemning "irrational disability discrimination")). (b)  The inherent right against discrimination on the basis of race, sex, or genetic abnormality is protected in federal and state laws.  For example, the 1964 Civil Rights Act (42 U.S.C. 2000e et seq.) and the laws of every state protect against discrimination on the basis of race or sex.  The Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. 701), the Americans With Disabilities Amendments Act of 2010 (42 U.S.C. 12101, et seq.), and numerous state laws prohibit discrimination against individuals on the basis of a real or perceived physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activities. (c)  Notwithstanding these protections, unborn human beings are often discriminated against and deprived of life. (d)  As Supreme Court Justice Clarence Thomas has noted, "Each of the immutable characteristics protected by this law can be known relatively early in a pregnancy, and this law prevents them from becoming the sole criterion for deciding whether the child will live or die."  Box v. Planned Parenthood of Indiana and Kentucky, 139 S.Ct. 1780, 1783 (2019) (Thomas, J., concurring). (e)  "Abortion is an act rife with the potential for eugenic manipulation."  Id. at 1787. (f)  The State of Mississippi maintains a "compelling interest in preventing abortion from becoming a tool of modern-day eugenics."  Id. (g)  Sex-selection abortions are used to prevent the birth of a human being of the undesired sex. Its victims are overwhelming female. (h)  Despite equality under the law being guaranteed to all women in the United States and most of the developed world, sex-selection abortions continue to occur in the United States. (i)  Abortions predicated on the presence or presumed presence of genetic abnormalities continue to occur despite the increasingly favorable post-natal outcomes for human beings perceived as * * *handicapped or disabled having a disability.  Pharmaceutical treatments, gene therapies, and prosthetic advances have given human beings who formerly * * *handicapped and disabled human beings had a disability much greater opportunities for survival and success than ever before.  Importantly, surgical intervention now includes the availability of intrauterine surgery. (2)  Therefore, it is the intent of the Mississippi Legislature, through Sections 41-41-401 through 41-41-419 and any regulations and policies promulgated hereunder, to prohibit the practice of nontherapeutic or elective abortion for the purpose of terminating the life of an unborn human being because of that human being's race, sex, or the presence or presumed presence of a genetic abnormality. SECTION 35.  Section 41-79-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-79-5.  (1)  There is * * *hereby established within the State Department of Health a school nurse intervention program, available to all public school districts in the state. (2)  * * *By the school year 1998‑1999, Each public school district shall * * *have employed employ a school nurse, to be known as a Health Service Coordinator, pursuant to the school nurse intervention program prescribed under this section.  The school nurse intervention program shall offer any of the following specific preventive services, and other additional services appropriate to each grade level and the age and maturity of the pupils: (a)  Reproductive health education and referral to prevent teen pregnancy and sexually transmitted diseases, which education shall include abstinence; (b)  Child abuse and neglect identification; (c)  Hearing and vision screening to detect problems which can lead to serious sensory losses and behavioral and academic problems; (d)  Alcohol, tobacco and drug abuse education to reduce abuse of these substances; (e)  Scoliosis screening to detect this condition so that costly and painful surgery and lifelong disability can be prevented; (f)  Coordination of services for * * *handicapped children with physical disabilities to ensure that these children receive appropriate medical assistance and are able to remain in public school; (g)  Nutrition education and counseling to prevent obesity and/or other eating disorders which may lead to life-threatening conditions, for example, hypertension; (h)  Early detection and treatment of head lice to prevent the spread of the parasite and to reduce absenteeism; (i)  Emergency treatment of injury and illness to include controlling bleeding, managing fractures, bruises or contusions and cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR); (j)  Applying appropriate theory as the basis for decision making in nursing practice; (k)  Establishing and maintaining a comprehensive school health program; (l)  Developing individualized health plans; (m)  Assessing, planning, implementing and evaluating programs and other school health activities, in collaboration with other professionals; (n)  Providing health education to assist students, families and groups to achieve optimal levels of wellness; (o)  Participating in peer review and other means of evaluation to assure quality of nursing care provided for students and assuming responsibility for continuing education and professional development for self while contributing to the professional growth of others; (p)  Participating with other key members of the community responsible for assessing, planning, implementing and evaluating school health services and community services that include the broad continuum or promotion of primary, secondary and tertiary prevention; and (q)  Contributing to nursing and school health through innovations in theory and practice and participation in research. (3)  Public school nurses shall be specifically prohibited from providing abortion counseling to any student or referring any student to abortion counseling or abortion clinics. Any violation of this subsection shall disqualify the school district employing such public school nurse from receiving any state administered funds under this section. (4)  [Repealed]. (5)  Beginning with the 1997-1998 school year, to the extent that federal or state funds are available therefor and pursuant to appropriation therefor by the Legislature, in addition to the school nurse intervention program funds administered under subsection (4), the State Department of Health shall establish and implement a Prevention of Teen Pregnancy Pilot Program to be located in the public school districts with the highest numbers of teen pregnancies.  The Teen Pregnancy Pilot Program shall provide the following education services directly through public school nurses in the pilot school districts:  health education sessions in local schools, where contracted for or invited to provide, which target issues including reproductive health, teen pregnancy prevention and sexually transmitted diseases, including syphilis, HIV and AIDS.  When these services are provided by a school nurse, training and counseling on abstinence shall be included. (6)  In addition to the school nurse intervention program funds administered under subsection (4) and the Teen Pregnancy Pilot Program funds administered under subsection (5), to the extent that federal or state funds are available therefor and pursuant to appropriation therefor by the Legislature, the State Department of Health shall establish and implement an Abstinence Education Pilot Program to provide abstinence education, mentoring, counseling and adult supervision to promote abstinence from sexual activity, with a focus on those groups which are most likely to bear children out of wedlock.  Such abstinence education services shall be provided by the State Department of Health through its clinics, public health nurses, school nurses and through contracts with rural and community health centers in order to reach a larger number of targeted clients.  For purposes of this subsection, the term "abstinence education" means an educational or motivational program which: (a)  Has as its exclusive purpose, teaching the social, psychological and health gains to be realized by abstaining from sexual activity; (b)  Teaches abstinence from sexual activity outside marriage as the expected standard for all school-age children; (c)  Teaches that abstinence from sexual activity is the only certain way to avoid out-of-wedlock pregnancy, sexually transmitted diseases and other associated health problems; (d)  Teaches that a mutually faithful monogamous relationship in context of marriage is the expected standard of human sexual activity; (e)  Teaches that sexual activity outside of the context of marriage is likely to have harmful psychological and physical effects; (f)  Teaches that bearing children out of wedlock is likely to have harmful consequences for the child, the child's parents and society; (g)  Teaches young people how to reject sexual advances and how alcohol and drug use increase vulnerability to sexual advances; and (h)  Teaches the importance of attaining self-sufficiency before engaging in sexual activity. (7)  Pursuant to appropriation therefor by the Legislature, in addition to funds allotted under the total funding formula provided in Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215, each school district shall be allotted an amount for the purpose of employing qualified public school nurses in such school district, which in no event shall be less than one (1) nurse per school district, for such purpose.  In the event the Legislature provides less funds than the total state funds needed for the public school nurse allotment, those school districts with fewer nurses per the number of students in net enrollment shall be the first funded for such purpose, to the extent of funds available. (8)  Prior to the 1998-1999 school year, nursing staff assigned to the program shall be employed through the local county health department and shall be subject to the supervision of the State Department of Health with input from local school officials.  Local county health departments may contract with any comprehensive private primary health care facilities within their county to employ and utilize additional nursing staff.  Beginning with the 1998-1999 school year, nursing staff assigned to the program shall be employed by the local school district and shall be designated as "health service coordinators," and shall be required to possess a bachelor's degree in nursing as a minimum qualification. (9)  Upon each student's enrollment, the parent or guardian shall be provided with information regarding the scope of the school nurse intervention program.  The parent or guardian may provide the school administration with a written statement refusing all or any part of the nursing service.  No child shall be required to undergo hearing and vision or scoliosis screening or any other physical examination or tests whose parent objects thereto on the grounds such screening, physical examination or tests are contrary to his sincerely held religious beliefs. (10)  A consent form for reproductive health education shall be sent to the parent or guardian of each student upon his enrollment.  If a response from the parent or guardian is not received within seven (7) days after the consent form is sent, the school shall send a letter to the student's home notifying the parent or guardian of the consent form.  If the parent or guardian fails to respond to the letter within ten (10) days after it is sent, then the school principal shall be authorized to allow the student to receive reproductive health education.  Reproductive health education shall include the teaching of total abstinence from premarital sex and, wherever practicable, reproductive health education should be taught in classes divided according to gender.  All materials used in the reproductive health education program shall be placed in a convenient and easily accessible location for parental inspection.  School nurses shall not dispense birth control pills or contraceptive devices in the school.  Dispensing of such shall be the responsibility of the State Department of Health on a referral basis only. (11)  No provision of this section shall be construed as prohibiting local school districts from accepting financial assistance of any type from the State of Mississippi or any other governmental entity, or any contribution, donation, gift, decree or bequest from any source which may be utilized for the maintenance or implementation of a school nurse intervention program in a public school system of this state. SECTION 36.  Section 43-6-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-6-1.  As used in this article, "blind," "totally blind," "visually * * *handicapped impaired," and "partially blind" mean having central visual acuity not to exceed 20/200 in the better eye, with corrected lenses as measured by the Snellen test, or having visual acuity greater than 20/200, but with a limitation in the field of vision such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle not greater than twenty (20) degrees. As used in this article, "deaf person" means a person who cannot readily understand spoken language through hearing alone with or without a hearing aid, and who may also have a speech defect which renders his speech unintelligible to most people with normal hearing. SECTION 37.  Section 43-6-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-6-3.  Blind persons, visually * * *handicapped impaired persons, deaf persons and * * *other physically disabled persons with other physical disabilities shall have the same right as the able-bodied to the full and free use of the streets, highways, sidewalks, walkways, public buildings, public facilities, and other public places. SECTION 38.  Section 43-6-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-6-5.  Blind persons, visually * * *handicapped impaired persons, deaf persons and * * *other physically disabled persons with other physical disabilities shall be entitled to full and equal access, as are other members of the general public, to accommodations, advantages, facilities and privileges of all common carriers, airplanes, motor vehicles, railroad trains, motorbuses, streetcars, boats or any other public conveyances or modes of transportation, hotels, lodging places, places of public accommodation, amusement or resort, and other places to which the general public is invited, subject only to the conditions and limitations established by law, or state or federal regulation, and applicable alike to all persons. SECTION 39.  Section 43-6-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-6-13.  Each year the Governor shall publicly proclaim October 15 as White Cane Safety Day.  He shall issue a proclamation in which: (a)  Comments shall be made upon the significance of this article. (b)  Citizens of the state are called upon to observe the provisions of this article and to take precautions necessary to the safety of * * *disabled persons with disabilities. (c)  Citizens of the state are reminded of the policies with respect to * * *disabled persons with disabilities which are declared in this article and be urged to cooperate in giving effect to them. (d)  Emphasis shall be made on the need of the citizenry to be aware of the presence of * * *disabled persons with disabilities in the community and to keep safe and functional for * * *the disabled those persons the streets, highways, sidewalks, walkways, public buildings, public facilities, other public places, places of public accommodation, amusement and resort, and other places to which the public is invited, and to offer assistance to * * *disabled persons with disabilities upon appropriate occasions. (e)  It is the policy of this state to encourage and enable blind persons, visually * * *handicapped impaired persons, and * * *other physically disabled persons with other physical disabilities to participate fully in the social and economic life of the state and to engage in remunerative employment. SECTION 40.  Section 43-6-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-6-15.  No person shall be refused employment in state services, the service of political subdivisions of the state, in public schools, or any other employment supported, in whole or in part, by public funds, by reason of his being blind, visually * * *handicapped impaired, deaf, or otherwise physically * * *handicapped disabled, unless such disability * * * shall materially affects the performance of the work required by the job for which such person applies. SECTION 41.  Section 43-6-113, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-6-113.  (1)  An appropriate number of toilet rooms shall be accessible to, and usable by, * * *the physically handicapped persons with physical disabilities and shall have space to allow traffic of individuals in wheelchairs. (2)  Toilet rooms for each sex shall have at least one (1) toilet stall that:  (a) is three * * * (3ꞌ) feet (3ꞌ) wide; (b) is at least four * * * (4ꞌ) feet (4ꞌ) eight * * * (8") inches (8"), preferably five * * * (5') feet (5') deep; (c) has a door (where doors are used) that is thirty-two * * * (32") inches (32") wide and swings out; (d) has handrails on each side, thirty-three * * * (33") inches (33") high and parallel to the floor, one and one-half * * * (1½") inches (1½") in outside diameter, with one and one-half * * * (1½) inches (1½") clearance between rail and wall, and fastened securely at ends and center; and (e) has a water closet with the seat twenty * * * (20") inches (20") from the floor. (3)  Such toilet rooms shall have at least one (1) lavatory with a narrow apron, which when mounted at standard height is usable by individuals in wheelchairs, or shall have lavatories mounted higher, when particular designs demand, so that they are usable by individuals in wheelchairs. (4)  Mirrors and shelves shall be provided above such lavatory at a height as low as practicable and no higher than forty * * * (40") inches (40") above the floor, measured from the top of the shelf and the bottom of the mirror. (5)  Toilet rooms for men which have wall-mounted urinals shall have an appropriate number of such urinals with the opening of the basin nineteen * * * (19") inches (19") from the floor, or shall have floor-mounted urinals that are on level with the main floor of the toilet room. (6)  Toilet rooms shall have an appropriate number of towel racks, towel dispensers, and other dispensers and disposal units mounted with openings of dispensers or receptacles no higher than forty * * * (40") inches (40") from the floor. SECTION 42.  Section 43-6-125, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-6-125.  All public buildings constructed or remodeled in accordance with the standards and requirements of Sections 43-6-101 through 43-6-123, or containing facilities that are in compliance therewith, shall display a symbol which is white on a blue background.  The specifications for this symbol shall be furnished by the State Board of Health indicating the location of such facilities designed for * * * the physically handicapped persons with physical disabilities.  When a building contains an entrance other than the main entrance which is ramped or level for use by * * * the physically handicapped persons with physical disabilities, a sign showing its location shall be posted at or near the main entrance which shall be visible from the adjacent public sidewalk or way. SECTION 43.  Section 43-11-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-11-1.  When used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meaning: (a)  "Institutions for the aged or infirm" means a place either governmental or private that provides group living arrangements for four (4) or more persons who are unrelated to the operator and who are being provided food, shelter and personal care, whether any such place is organized or operated for profit or not.  The term "institution for the aged or infirm" includes nursing homes, pediatric skilled nursing facilities, psychiatric residential treatment facilities, convalescent homes, homes for the aged, adult foster care facilities and special care facilities for paroled inmates, provided that these institutions fall within the scope of the definitions set forth above.  The term "institution for the aged or infirm" does not include hospitals, clinics or mental institutions devoted primarily to providing medical service, and does not include any private residence in which the owner of the residence is providing personal care services to disabled or homeless veterans under an agreement with, and in compliance with the standards prescribed by, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, if the owner of the residence also provided personal care services to disabled or homeless veterans at any time during calendar year 2008. (b)  "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association or joint-stock association, or any licensee herein or the legal successor thereof. (c)  "Personal care" means assistance rendered by personnel of the home to aged or infirm residents in performing one or more of the activities of daily living, which includes, but is not limited to, the bathing, walking, excretory functions, feeding, personal grooming and dressing of such residents. (d)  "Psychiatric residential treatment facility" means any nonhospital establishment with permanent facilities which provides a twenty-four-hour program of care by qualified therapists, including, but not limited to, duly licensed mental health professionals, psychiatrists, psychologists, psychotherapists and licensed certified social workers, for * * *emotionally disturbed children and adolescents with emotional disturbances referred to such facility by a court, local school district or by the Department of Human Services, who are not in an acute phase of illness requiring the services of a psychiatric hospital, and are in need of such restorative treatment services.  For purposes of this paragraph, the term " * * *emotionally disturbed emotional disturbance" means a condition exhibiting one or more of the following characteristics over a long period of time and to a marked degree, which adversely affects educational performance: 1.  An inability to learn which cannot be explained by intellectual, sensory or health factors; 2.  An inability to build or maintain satisfactory relationships with peers and teachers; 3.  Inappropriate types of behavior or feelings under normal circumstances; 4.  A general pervasive mood of unhappiness or depression; or 5.  A tendency to develop physical symptoms or fears associated with personal or school problems.  An establishment furnishing primarily domiciliary care is not within this definition. (e)  "Pediatric skilled nursing facility" means an institution or a distinct part of an institution that is primarily engaged in providing to inpatients skilled nursing care and related services for persons under twenty-one (21) years of age who require medical or nursing care or rehabilitation services for the rehabilitation of injured, disabled or sick persons. (f)  "Licensing agency" means the State Department of Health. (g)  "Medical records" mean, without restriction, those medical histories, records, reports, summaries, diagnoses and prognoses, records of treatment and medication ordered and given, notes, entries, x-rays and other written or graphic data prepared, kept, made or maintained in institutions for the aged or infirm that pertain to residency in, or services rendered to residents of, an institution for the aged or infirm. (h)  "Adult foster care facility" means a home setting for vulnerable adults in the community who are unable to live independently due to physical, emotional, developmental or mental impairments, or in need of emergency and continuing protective social services for purposes of preventing further abuse or neglect and for safeguarding and enhancing the welfare of the abused or neglected vulnerable adult.  Adult foster care programs shall be designed to meet the needs of vulnerable adults with impairments through individual plans of care, which provide a variety of health, social and related support services in a protective setting, enabling participants to live in the community.  Adult foster care programs may be (i) traditional, where the foster care provider lives in the residence and is the primary caregiver to clients in the home; (ii) corporate, where the foster care home is operated by a corporation with shift staff delivering services to clients; or (iii) shelter, where the foster care home accepts clients on an emergency short-term basis for up to thirty (30) days. (i)  "Special care facilities for paroled inmates" means long-term care and skilled nursing facilities licensed as special care facilities for medically frail paroled inmates, formed to ease the burden of prison overcrowding and provide compassionate release and medical parole initiatives while impacting economic outcomes for the Mississippi prison system.  The facilities shall meet all Mississippi Department of Health and federal Center for Medicaid Services (CMS) requirements and shall be regulated by both agencies; provided, however, such regulations shall not be as restrictive as those required for personal care homes and other institutions devoted primarily to providing medical services. The facilities will offer physical, occupational and speech therapy, nursing services, wound care, a dedicated COVID services unit, individualized patient centered plans of care, social services, spiritual services, physical activities, transportation, medication, durable medical equipment, personalized meal plans by a licensed dietician and security services.  There may be up to three (3) facilities located in each Supreme Court district, to be designated by the Chairman of the State Parole Board or his designee. SECTION 44.  Section 43-13-117, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-13-117.  (A)  Medicaid as authorized by this article shall include payment of part or all of the costs, at the discretion of the division, with approval of the Governor and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, of the following types of care and services rendered to eligible applicants who have been determined to be eligible for that care and services, within the limits of state appropriations and federal matching funds: (1)  Inpatient hospital services. (a)  The division is authorized to implement an All Patient Refined Diagnosis Related Groups (APR-DRG) reimbursement methodology for inpatient hospital services. (b)  No service benefits or reimbursement limitations in this subsection (A)(1) shall apply to payments under an APR-DRG or Ambulatory Payment Classification (APC) model or a managed care program or similar model described in subsection (H) of this section unless specifically authorized by the division. (2)  Outpatient hospital services. (a)  Emergency services. (b)  Other outpatient hospital services.  The division shall allow benefits for other medically necessary outpatient hospital services (such as chemotherapy, radiation, surgery and therapy), including outpatient services in a clinic or other facility that is not located inside the hospital, but that has been designated as an outpatient facility by the hospital, and that was in operation or under construction on July 1, 2009, provided that the costs and charges associated with the operation of the hospital clinic are included in the hospital's cost report.  In addition, the Medicare thirty-five-mile rule will apply to those hospital clinics not located inside the hospital that are constructed after July 1, 2009.  Where the same services are reimbursed as clinic services, the division may revise the rate or methodology of outpatient reimbursement to maintain consistency, efficiency, economy and quality of care. (c)  The division is authorized to implement an Ambulatory Payment Classification (APC) methodology for outpatient hospital services.  The division shall give rural hospitals that have fifty (50) or fewer licensed beds the option to not be reimbursed for outpatient hospital services using the APC methodology, but reimbursement for outpatient hospital services provided by those hospitals shall be based on one hundred one percent (101%) of the rate established under Medicare for outpatient hospital services.  Those hospitals choosing to not be reimbursed under the APC methodology shall remain under cost-based reimbursement for a two-year period. (d)  No service benefits or reimbursement limitations in this subsection (A)(2) shall apply to payments under an APR-DRG or APC model or a managed care program or similar model described in subsection (H) of this section unless specifically authorized by the division. (3)  Laboratory and x-ray services. (4)  Nursing facility services. (a)  The division shall make full payment to nursing facilities for each day, not exceeding forty-two (42) days per year, that a patient is absent from the facility on home leave. Payment may be made for the following home leave days in addition to the forty-two-day limitation:  Christmas, the day before Christmas, the day after Christmas, Thanksgiving, the day before Thanksgiving and the day after Thanksgiving. (b)  From and after July 1, 1997, the division shall implement the integrated case-mix payment and quality monitoring system, which includes the fair rental system for property costs and in which recapture of depreciation is eliminated.  The division may reduce the payment for hospital leave and therapeutic home leave days to the lower of the case-mix category as computed for the resident on leave using the assessment being utilized for payment at that point in time, or a case-mix score of 1.000 for nursing facilities, and shall compute case-mix scores of residents so that only services provided at the nursing facility are considered in calculating a facility's per diem. (c)  From and after July 1, 1997, all state-owned nursing facilities shall be reimbursed on a full reasonable cost basis. (d)  On or after January 1, 2015, the division shall update the case-mix payment system resource utilization grouper and classifications and fair rental reimbursement system. The division shall develop and implement a payment add-on to reimburse nursing facilities for ventilator-dependent resident services. (e)  The division shall develop and implement, not later than January 1, 2001, a case-mix payment add-on determined by time studies and other valid statistical data that will reimburse a nursing facility for the additional cost of caring for a resident who has a diagnosis of Alzheimer's or other related dementia and exhibits symptoms that require special care.  Any such case-mix add-on payment shall be supported by a determination of additional cost.  The division shall also develop and implement as part of the fair rental reimbursement system for nursing facility beds, an Alzheimer's resident bed depreciation enhanced reimbursement system that will provide an incentive to encourage nursing facilities to convert or construct beds for residents with Alzheimer's or other related dementia. (f)  The division shall develop and implement an assessment process for long-term care services. The division may provide the assessment and related functions directly or through contract with the area agencies on aging. The division shall apply for necessary federal waivers to assure that additional services providing alternatives to nursing facility care are made available to applicants for nursing facility care. (5)  Periodic screening and diagnostic services for individuals under age twenty-one (21) years as are needed to identify physical and mental defects and to provide health care treatment and other measures designed to correct or ameliorate defects and physical and mental illness and conditions discovered by the screening services, regardless of whether these services are included in the state plan. The division may include in its periodic screening and diagnostic program those discretionary services authorized under the federal regulations adopted to implement Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, as amended.  The division, in obtaining physical therapy services, occupational therapy services, and services for individuals with speech, hearing and language disorders, may enter into a cooperative agreement with the State Department of Education for the provision of those services to * * *handicapped students with disabilities by public school districts using state funds that are provided from the appropriation to the Department of Education to obtain federal matching funds through the division.  The division, in obtaining medical and mental health assessments, treatment, care and services for children who are in, or at risk of being put in, the custody of the Mississippi Department of Human Services may enter into a cooperative agreement with the Mississippi Department of Human Services for the provision of those services using state funds that are provided from the appropriation to the Department of Human Services to obtain federal matching funds through the division. (6)  Physician services.  Fees for physician's services that are covered only by Medicaid shall be reimbursed at ninety percent (90%) of the rate established on January 1, 2018, and as may be adjusted each July thereafter, under Medicare.  The division may provide for a reimbursement rate for physician's services of up to one hundred percent (100%) of the rate established under Medicare for physician's services that are provided after the normal working hours of the physician, as determined in accordance with regulations of the division.  The division may reimburse eligible providers, as determined by the division, for certain primary care services at one hundred percent (100%) of the rate established under Medicare.  The division shall reimburse obstetricians and gynecologists for certain primary care services as defined by the division at one hundred percent (100%) of the rate established under Medicare. (7)  (a)  Home health services for eligible persons, not to exceed in cost the prevailing cost of nursing facility services.  All home health visits must be precertified as required by the division.  In addition to physicians, certified registered nurse practitioners, physician assistants and clinical nurse specialists are authorized to prescribe or order home health services and plans of care, sign home health plans of care, certify and recertify eligibility for home health services and conduct the required initial face-to-face visit with the recipient of the services. (b)  [Repealed] (8)  Emergency medical transportation services as determined by the division. (9)  Prescription drugs and other covered drugs and services as determined by the division. The division shall establish a mandatory preferred drug list.  Drugs not on the mandatory preferred drug list shall be made available by utilizing prior authorization procedures established by the division. The division may seek to establish relationships with other states in order to lower acquisition costs of prescription drugs to include single-source and innovator multiple-source drugs or generic drugs.  In addition, if allowed by federal law or regulation, the division may seek to establish relationships with and negotiate with other countries to facilitate the acquisition of prescription drugs to include single-source and innovator multiple-source drugs or generic drugs, if that will lower the acquisition costs of those prescription drugs. The division may allow for a combination of prescriptions for single-source and innovator multiple-source drugs and generic drugs to meet the needs of the beneficiaries. The executive director may approve specific maintenance drugs for beneficiaries with certain medical conditions, which may be prescribed and dispensed in three-month supply increments. Drugs prescribed for a resident of a psychiatric residential treatment facility must be provided in true unit doses when available.  The division may require that drugs not covered by Medicare Part D for a resident of a long-term care facility be provided in true unit doses when available.  Those drugs that were originally billed to the division but are not used by a resident in any of those facilities shall be returned to the billing pharmacy for credit to the division, in accordance with the guidelines of the State Board of Pharmacy and any requirements of federal law and regulation.  Drugs shall be dispensed to a recipient and only one (1) dispensing fee per month may be charged.  The division shall develop a methodology for reimbursing for restocked drugs, which shall include a restock fee as determined by the division not exceeding Seven Dollars and Eighty-two Cents ($7.82). Except for those specific maintenance drugs approved by the executive director, the division shall not reimburse for any portion of a prescription that exceeds a thirty-one-day supply of the drug based on the daily dosage. The division is authorized to develop and implement a program of payment for additional pharmacist services as determined by the division. All claims for drugs for dually eligible Medicare/Medicaid beneficiaries that are paid for by Medicare must be submitted to Medicare for payment before they may be processed by the division's online payment system. The division shall develop a pharmacy policy in which drugs in tamper-resistant packaging that are prescribed for a resident of a nursing facility but are not dispensed to the resident shall be returned to the pharmacy and not billed to Medicaid, in accordance with guidelines of the State Board of Pharmacy. The division shall develop and implement a method or methods by which the division will provide on a regular basis to Medicaid providers who are authorized to prescribe drugs, information about the costs to the Medicaid program of single-source drugs and innovator multiple-source drugs, and information about other drugs that may be prescribed as alternatives to those single-source drugs and innovator multiple-source drugs and the costs to the Medicaid program of those alternative drugs. Notwithstanding any law or regulation, information obtained or maintained by the division regarding the prescription drug program, including trade secrets and manufacturer or labeler pricing, is confidential and not subject to disclosure except to other state agencies. The dispensing fee for each new or refill prescription, including nonlegend or over-the-counter drugs covered by the division, shall be not less than Three Dollars and Ninety-one Cents ($3.91), as determined by the division. The division shall not reimburse for single-source or innovator multiple-source drugs if there are equally effective generic equivalents available and if the generic equivalents are the least expensive. It is the intent of the Legislature that the pharmacists providers be reimbursed for the reasonable costs of filling and dispensing prescriptions for Medicaid beneficiaries. The division shall allow certain drugs, including physician-administered drugs, and implantable drug system devices, and medical supplies, with limited distribution or limited access for beneficiaries and administered in an appropriate clinical setting, to be reimbursed as either a medical claim or pharmacy claim, as determined by the division. It is the intent of the Legislature that the division and any managed care entity described in subsection (H) of this section encourage the use of Alpha-Hydroxyprogesterone Caproate (17P) to prevent recurrent preterm birth. (10)  Dental and orthodontic services to be determined by the division. The division shall increase the amount of the reimbursement rate for diagnostic and preventative dental services for each of the fiscal years 2022, 2023 and 2024 by five percent (5%) above the amount of the reimbursement rate for the previous fiscal year.  The division shall increase the amount of the reimbursement rate for restorative dental services for each of the fiscal years 2023, 2024 and 2025 by five percent (5%) above the amount of the reimbursement rate for the previous fiscal year.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the reimbursement rate revision for preventative dental services will be an incentive to increase the number of dentists who actively provide Medicaid services.  This dental services reimbursement rate revision shall be known as the "James Russell Dumas Medicaid Dental Services Incentive Program." The Medical Care Advisory Committee, assisted by the Division of Medicaid, shall annually determine the effect of this incentive by evaluating the number of dentists who are Medicaid providers, the number who and the degree to which they are actively billing Medicaid, the geographic trends of where dentists are offering what types of Medicaid services and other statistics pertinent to the goals of this legislative intent.  This data shall annually be presented to the Chair of the Senate Medicaid Committee and the Chair of the House Medicaid Committee. The division shall include dental services as a necessary component of overall health services provided to children who are eligible for services. (11)  Eyeglasses for all Medicaid beneficiaries who have (a) had surgery on the eyeball or ocular muscle that results in a vision change for which eyeglasses or a change in eyeglasses is medically indicated within six (6) months of the surgery and is in accordance with policies established by the division, or (b) one (1) pair every five (5) years and in accordance with policies established by the division.  In either instance, the eyeglasses must be prescribed by a physician skilled in diseases of the eye or an optometrist, whichever the beneficiary may select. (12)  Intermediate care facility services. (a)  The division shall make full payment to all intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities for each day, not exceeding sixty-three (63) days per year, that a patient is absent from the facility on home leave. Payment may be made for the following home leave days in addition to the sixty-three-day limitation:  Christmas, the day before Christmas, the day after Christmas, Thanksgiving, the day before Thanksgiving and the day after Thanksgiving. (b)  All state-owned intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities shall be reimbursed on a full reasonable cost basis. (c)  Effective January 1, 2015, the division shall update the fair rental reimbursement system for intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities. (13)  Family planning services, including drugs, supplies and devices, when those services are under the supervision of a physician or nurse practitioner. (14)  Clinic services. Preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative or palliative services that are furnished by a facility that is not part of a hospital but is organized and operated to provide medical care to outpatients.  Clinic services include, but are not limited to: (a)  Services provided by ambulatory surgical centers (ASCs) as defined in Section 41-75-1(a); and (b)  Dialysis center services. (15)  Home- and community-based services for the elderly and disabled, as provided under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, under waivers, subject to the availability of funds specifically appropriated for that purpose by the Legislature. (16)  Mental health services. Certain services provided by a psychiatrist shall be reimbursed at up to one hundred percent (100%) of the Medicare rate.  Approved therapeutic and case management services (a) provided by an approved regional mental health/intellectual disability center established under Sections 41-19-31 through 41-19-39, or by another community mental health service provider meeting the requirements of the Department of Mental Health to be an approved mental health/intellectual disability center if determined necessary by the Department of Mental Health, using state funds that are provided in the appropriation to the division to match federal funds, or (b) provided by a facility that is certified by the State Department of Mental Health to provide therapeutic and case management services, to be reimbursed on a fee for service basis, or (c) provided in the community by a facility or program operated by the Department of Mental Health.  Any such services provided by a facility described in subparagraph (b) must have the prior approval of the division to be reimbursable under this section. (17)  Durable medical equipment services and medical supplies.  Precertification of durable medical equipment and medical supplies must be obtained as required by the division.  The Division of Medicaid may require durable medical equipment providers to obtain a surety bond in the amount and to the specifications as established by the Balanced Budget Act of 1997.  A maximum dollar amount of reimbursement for noninvasive ventilators or ventilation treatments properly ordered and being used in an appropriate care setting shall not be set by any health maintenance organization, coordinated care organization, provider-sponsored health plan, or other organization paid for services on a capitated basis by the division under any managed care program or coordinated care program implemented by the division under this section.  Reimbursement by these organizations to durable medical equipment suppliers for home use of noninvasive and invasive ventilators shall be on a continuous monthly payment basis for the duration of medical need throughout a patient's valid prescription period. (18)  (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, as provided in the Medicaid state plan amendment or amendments as defined in Section 43-13-145(10), the division shall make additional reimbursement to hospitals that serve a disproportionate share of low-income patients and that meet the federal requirements for those payments as provided in Section 1923 of the federal Social Security Act and any applicable regulations.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the division shall draw down all available federal funds allotted to the state for disproportionate share hospitals. However, from and after January 1, 1999, public hospitals participating in the Medicaid disproportionate share program may be required to participate in an intergovernmental transfer program as provided in Section 1903 of the federal Social Security Act and any applicable regulations. (b)  (i)  1.  The division may establish a Medicare Upper Payment Limits Program, as defined in Section 1902(a)(30) of the federal Social Security Act and any applicable federal regulations, or an allowable delivery system or provider payment initiative authorized under 42 CFR 438.6(c), for hospitals, nursing facilities and physicians employed or contracted by hospitals. 2.  The division shall establish a Medicaid Supplemental Payment Program, as permitted by the federal Social Security Act and a comparable allowable delivery system or provider payment initiative authorized under 42 CFR 438.6(c), for emergency ambulance transportation providers in accordance with this subsection (A)(18)(b). (ii)  The division shall assess each hospital, nursing facility, and emergency ambulance transportation provider for the sole purpose of financing the state portion of the Medicare Upper Payment Limits Program or other program(s) authorized under this subsection (A)(18)(b).  The hospital assessment shall be as provided in Section 43-13-145(4)(a), and the nursing facility and the emergency ambulance transportation assessments, if established, shall be based on Medicaid utilization or other appropriate method, as determined by the division, consistent with federal regulations.  The assessments will remain in effect as long as the state participates in the Medicare Upper Payment Limits Program or other program(s) authorized under this subsection (A)(18)(b).  In addition to the hospital assessment provided in Section 43-13-145(4)(a), hospitals with physicians participating in the Medicare Upper Payment Limits Program or other program(s) authorized under this subsection (A)(18)(b) shall be required to participate in an intergovernmental transfer or assessment, as determined by the division, for the purpose of financing the state portion of the physician UPL payments or other payment(s) authorized under this subsection (A)(18)(b). (iii)  Subject to approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) and the provisions of this subsection (A)(18)(b), the division shall make additional reimbursement to hospitals, nursing facilities, and emergency ambulance transportation providers for the Medicare Upper Payment Limits Program or other program(s) authorized under this subsection (A)(18)(b), and, if the program is established for physicians, shall make additional reimbursement for physicians, as defined in Section 1902(a)(30) of the federal Social Security Act and any applicable federal regulations, provided the assessment in this subsection (A)(18)(b) is in effect. (iv) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, effective upon implementation of the Mississippi Hospital Access Program (MHAP) provided in subparagraph (c)(i) below, the hospital portion of the inpatient Upper Payment Limits Program shall transition into and be replaced by the MHAP program.  However, the division is authorized to develop and implement an alternative fee-for-service Upper Payment Limits model in accordance with federal laws and regulations if necessary to preserve supplemental funding. Further, the division, in consultation with the hospital industry shall develop alternative models for distribution of medical claims and supplemental payments for inpatient and outpatient hospital services, and such models may include, but shall not be limited to the following:  increasing rates for inpatient and outpatient services; creating a low-income utilization pool of funds to reimburse hospitals for the costs of uncompensated care, charity care and bad debts as permitted and approved pursuant to federal regulations and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services; supplemental payments based upon Medicaid utilization, quality, service lines and/or costs of providing such services to Medicaid beneficiaries and to uninsured patients.  The goals of such payment models shall be to ensure access to inpatient and outpatient care and to maximize any federal funds that are available to reimburse hospitals for services provided.  Any such documents required to achieve the goals described in this paragraph shall be submitted to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, with a proposed effective date of July 1, 2019, to the extent possible, but in no event shall the effective date of such payment models be later than July 1, 2020.  The Chairmen of the Senate and House Medicaid Committees shall be provided a copy of the proposed payment model(s) prior to submission.  Effective July 1, 2018, and until such time as any payment model(s) as described above become effective, the division, in consultation with the hospital industry, is authorized to implement a transitional program for inpatient and outpatient payments and/or supplemental payments (including, but not limited to, MHAP and directed payments), to redistribute available supplemental funds among hospital providers, provided that when compared to a hospital's prior year supplemental payments, supplemental payments made pursuant to any such transitional program shall not result in a decrease of more than five percent (5%) and shall not increase by more than the amount needed to maximize the distribution of the available funds. (v)  1.  To preserve and improve access to ambulance transportation provider services, the division shall seek CMS approval to make ambulance service access payments as set forth in this subsection (A)(18)(b) for all covered emergency ambulance services rendered on or after July 1, 2022, and shall make such ambulance service access payments for all covered services rendered on or after the effective date of CMS approval. 2.  The division shall calculate the ambulance service access payment amount as the balance of the portion of the Medical Care Fund related to ambulance transportation service provider assessments plus any federal matching funds earned on the balance, up to, but not to exceed, the upper payment limit gap for all emergency ambulance service providers. 3.  a. Except for ambulance services exempt from the assessment provided in this paragraph (18)(b), all ambulance transportation service providers shall be eligible for ambulance service access payments each state fiscal year as set forth in this paragraph (18)(b). b. In addition to any other funds paid to ambulance transportation service providers for emergency medical services provided to Medicaid beneficiaries, each eligible ambulance transportation service provider shall receive ambulance service access payments each state fiscal year equal to the ambulance transportation service provider's upper payment limit gap.  Subject to approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, ambulance service access payments shall be made no less than on a quarterly basis. c. As used in this paragraph (18)(b)(v), the term "upper payment limit gap" means the difference between the total amount that the ambulance transportation service provider received from Medicaid and the average amount that the ambulance transportation service provider would have received from commercial insurers for those services reimbursed by Medicaid. 4.  An ambulance service access payment shall not be used to offset any other payment by the division for emergency or nonemergency services to Medicaid beneficiaries. (c)  (i)  Not later than December l, 2015, the division shall, subject to approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS), establish, implement and operate a Mississippi Hospital Access Program (MHAP) for the purpose of protecting patient access to hospital care through hospital inpatient reimbursement programs provided in this section designed to maintain total hospital reimbursement for inpatient services rendered by in-state hospitals and the out-of-state hospital that is authorized by federal law to submit intergovernmental transfers (IGTs) to the State of Mississippi and is classified as Level I trauma center located in a county contiguous to the state line at the maximum levels permissible under applicable federal statutes and regulations, at which time the current inpatient Medicare Upper Payment Limits (UPL) Program for hospital inpatient services shall transition to the MHAP. (ii)  Subject to approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS), the MHAP shall provide increased inpatient capitation (PMPM) payments to managed care entities contracting with the division pursuant to subsection (H) of this section to support availability of hospital services or such other payments permissible under federal law necessary to accomplish the intent of this subsection. (iii)  The intent of this subparagraph (c) is that effective for all inpatient hospital Medicaid services during state fiscal year 2016, and so long as this provision shall remain in effect hereafter, the division shall to the fullest extent feasible replace the additional reimbursement for hospital inpatient services under the inpatient Medicare Upper Payment Limits (UPL) Program with additional reimbursement under the MHAP and other payment programs for inpatient and/or outpatient payments which may be developed under the authority of this paragraph. (iv)  The division shall assess each hospital as provided in Section 43-13-145(4)(a) for the purpose of financing the state portion of the MHAP, supplemental payments and such other purposes as specified in Section 43-13-145.  The assessment will remain in effect as long as the MHAP and supplemental payments are in effect. (19)  (a)  Perinatal risk management services.  The division shall promulgate regulations to be effective from and after October 1, 1988, to establish a comprehensive perinatal system for risk assessment of all pregnant and infant Medicaid recipients and for management, education and follow-up for those who are determined to be at risk.  Services to be performed include case management, nutrition assessment/counseling, psychosocial assessment/counseling and health education.  The division shall contract with the State Department of Health to provide services within this paragraph (Perinatal High Risk Management/Infant Services System (PHRM/ISS)).  The State Department of Health shall be reimbursed on a full reasonable cost basis for services provided under this subparagraph (a). (b)  Early intervention system services.  The division shall cooperate with the State Department of Health, acting as lead agency, in the development and implementation of a statewide system of delivery of early intervention services, under Part C of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA).  The State Department of Health shall certify annually in writing to the executive director of the division the dollar amount of state early intervention funds available that will be utilized as a certified match for Medicaid matching funds.  Those funds then shall be used to provide expanded targeted case management services for Medicaid eligible children with special needs who are eligible for the state's early intervention system. Qualifications for persons providing service coordination shall be determined by the State Department of Health and the Division of Medicaid. (20)  Home- and community-based services for physically disabled approved services as allowed by a waiver from the United States Department of Health and Human Services for home- and community-based services for physically disabled people using state funds that are provided from the appropriation to the State Department of Rehabilitation Services and used to match federal funds under a cooperative agreement between the division and the department, provided that funds for these services are specifically appropriated to the Department of Rehabilitation Services. (21)  Nurse practitioner services.  Services furnished by a registered nurse who is licensed and certified by the Mississippi Board of Nursing as a nurse practitioner, including, but not limited to, nurse anesthetists, nurse midwives, family nurse practitioners, family planning nurse practitioners, pediatric nurse practitioners, obstetrics-gynecology nurse practitioners and neonatal nurse practitioners, under regulations adopted by the division. Reimbursement for those services shall not exceed ninety percent (90%) of the reimbursement rate for comparable services rendered by a physician.  The division may provide for a reimbursement rate for nurse practitioner services of up to one hundred percent (100%) of the reimbursement rate for comparable services rendered by a physician for nurse practitioner services that are provided after the normal working hours of the nurse practitioner, as determined in accordance with regulations of the division. (22)  Ambulatory services delivered in federally qualified health centers, rural health centers and clinics of the local health departments of the State Department of Health for individuals eligible for Medicaid under this article based on reasonable costs as determined by the division.  Federally qualified health centers shall be reimbursed by the Medicaid prospective payment system as approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.  The division shall recognize federally qualified health centers (FQHCs), rural health clinics (RHCs) and community mental health centers (CMHCs) as both an originating and distant site provider for the purposes of telehealth reimbursement.  The division is further authorized and directed to reimburse FQHCs, RHCs and CMHCs for both distant site and originating site services when such services are appropriately provided by the same organization. (23)  Inpatient psychiatric services. (a)  Inpatient psychiatric services to be determined by the division for recipients under age twenty-one (21) that are provided under the direction of a physician in an inpatient program in a licensed acute care psychiatric facility or in a licensed psychiatric residential treatment facility, before the recipient reaches age twenty-one (21) or, if the recipient was receiving the services immediately before he or she reached age twenty-one (21), before the earlier of the date he or she no longer requires the services or the date he or she reaches age twenty-two (22), as provided by federal regulations.  From and after January 1, 2015, the division shall update the fair rental reimbursement system for psychiatric residential treatment facilities.  Precertification of inpatient days and residential treatment days must be obtained as required by the division.  From and after July 1, 2009, all state-owned and state-operated facilities that provide inpatient psychiatric services to persons under age twenty-one (21) who are eligible for Medicaid reimbursement shall be reimbursed for those services on a full reasonable cost basis. (b)  The division may reimburse for services provided by a licensed freestanding psychiatric hospital to Medicaid recipients over the age of twenty-one (21) in a method and manner consistent with the provisions of Section 43-13-117.5. (24)  [Deleted] (25)  [Deleted] (26)  Hospice care.  As used in this paragraph, the term "hospice care" means a coordinated program of active professional medical attention within the home and outpatient and inpatient care that treats the terminally ill patient and family as a unit, employing a medically directed interdisciplinary team.  The program provides relief of severe pain or other physical symptoms and supportive care to meet the special needs arising out of physical, psychological, spiritual, social and economic stresses that are experienced during the final stages of illness and during dying and bereavement and meets the Medicare requirements for participation as a hospice as provided in federal regulations. (27)  Group health plan premiums and cost-sharing if it is cost-effective as defined by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services. (28)  Other health insurance premiums that are cost-effective as defined by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services.  Medicare eligible must have Medicare Part B before other insurance premiums can be paid. (29)  The Division of Medicaid may apply for a waiver from the United States Department of Health and Human Services for home- and community-based services for developmentally disabled people using state funds that are provided from the appropriation to the State Department of Mental Health and/or funds transferred to the department by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the state and used to match federal funds under a cooperative agreement between the division and the department, provided that funds for these services are specifically appropriated to the Department of Mental Health and/or transferred to the department by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the state. (30)  Pediatric skilled nursing services as determined by the division and in a manner consistent with regulations promulgated by the Mississippi State Department of Health. (31)  Targeted case management services for children with special needs, under waivers from the United States Department of Health and Human Services, using state funds that are provided from the appropriation to the Mississippi Department of Human Services and used to match federal funds under a cooperative agreement between the division and the department. (32)  Care and services provided in Christian Science Sanatoria listed and certified by the Commission for Accreditation of Christian Science Nursing Organizations/Facilities, Inc., rendered in connection with treatment by prayer or spiritual means to the extent that those services are subject to reimbursement under Section 1903 of the federal Social Security Act. (33)  Podiatrist services. (34)  Assisted living services as provided through  home- and community-based services under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, subject to the availability of funds specifically appropriated for that purpose by the Legislature. (35)  Services and activities authorized in Sections 43-27-101 and 43-27-103, using state funds that are provided from the appropriation to the Mississippi Department of Human Services and used to match federal funds under a cooperative agreement between the division and the department. (36)  Nonemergency transportation services for Medicaid-eligible persons as determined by the division.  The PEER Committee shall conduct a performance evaluation of the nonemergency transportation program to evaluate the administration of the program and the providers of transportation services to determine the most cost-effective ways of providing nonemergency transportation services to the patients served under the program.  The performance evaluation shall be completed and provided to the members of the Senate Medicaid Committee and the House Medicaid Committee not later than January 1, 2019, and every two (2) years thereafter. (37)  [Deleted] (38)  Chiropractic services.  A chiropractor's manual manipulation of the spine to correct a subluxation, if x-ray demonstrates that a subluxation exists and if the subluxation has resulted in a neuromusculoskeletal condition for which manipulation is appropriate treatment, and related spinal x-rays performed to document these conditions.  Reimbursement for chiropractic services shall not exceed Seven Hundred Dollars ($700.00) per year per beneficiary. (39)  Dually eligible Medicare/Medicaid beneficiaries.  The division shall pay the Medicare deductible and coinsurance amounts for services available under Medicare, as determined by the division.  From and after July 1, 2009, the division shall reimburse crossover claims for inpatient hospital services and crossover claims covered under Medicare Part B in the same manner that was in effect on January 1, 2008, unless specifically authorized by the Legislature to change this method. (40)  [Deleted] (41)  Services provided by the State Department of Rehabilitation Services for the care and rehabilitation of persons with spinal cord injuries or traumatic brain injuries, as allowed under waivers from the United States Department of Health and Human Services, using up to seventy-five percent (75%) of the funds that are appropriated to the Department of Rehabilitation Services from the Spinal Cord and Head Injury Trust Fund established under Section 37-33-261 and used to match federal funds under a cooperative agreement between the division and the department. (42)  [Deleted] (43)  The division shall provide reimbursement, according to a payment schedule developed by the division, for smoking cessation medications for pregnant women during their pregnancy and other Medicaid-eligible women who are of child-bearing age. (44)  Nursing facility services for the severely disabled. (a)  Severe disabilities include, but are not limited to, spinal cord injuries, closed-head injuries and ventilator-dependent patients. (b)  Those services must be provided in a long-term care nursing facility dedicated to the care and treatment of persons with severe disabilities. (45)  Physician assistant services.  Services furnished by a physician assistant who is licensed by the State Board of Medical Licensure and is practicing with physician supervision under regulations adopted by the board, under regulations adopted by the division.  Reimbursement for those services shall not exceed ninety percent (90%) of the reimbursement rate for comparable services rendered by a physician.  The division may provide for a reimbursement rate for physician assistant services of up to one hundred percent (100%) or the reimbursement rate for comparable services rendered by a physician for physician assistant services that are provided after the normal working hours of the physician assistant, as determined in accordance with regulations of the division. (46)  The division shall make application to the federal  Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) for a waiver to develop and provide services for children with serious emotional disturbances as defined in Section 43-14-1(1), which may include home- and community-based services, case management services or managed care services through mental health providers certified by the Department of Mental Health.  The division may implement and provide services under this waivered program only if funds for these services are specifically appropriated for this purpose by the Legislature, or if funds are voluntarily provided by affected agencies. (47)  (a)  The division may develop and implement disease management programs for individuals with high-cost chronic diseases and conditions, including the use of grants, waivers, demonstrations or other projects as necessary. (b)  Participation in any disease management program implemented under this paragraph (47) is optional with the individual.  An individual must affirmatively elect to participate in the disease management program in order to participate, and may elect to discontinue participation in the program at any time. (48)  Pediatric long-term acute care hospital services. (a)  Pediatric long-term acute care hospital services means services provided to eligible persons under twenty-one (21) years of age by a freestanding Medicare-certified hospital that has an average length of inpatient stay greater than twenty-five (25) days and that is primarily engaged in providing chronic or long-term medical care to persons under twenty-one (21) years of age. (b)  The services under this paragraph (48) shall be reimbursed as a separate category of hospital services. (49)  The division may establish copayments and/or coinsurance for any Medicaid services for which copayments and/or coinsurance are allowable under federal law or regulation. (50)  Services provided by the State Department of Rehabilitation Services for the care and rehabilitation of persons who are deaf and blind, as allowed under waivers from the United States Department of Health and Human Services to provide home- and community-based services using state funds that are provided from the appropriation to the State Department of Rehabilitation Services or if funds are voluntarily provided by another agency. (51)  Upon determination of Medicaid eligibility and in association with annual redetermination of Medicaid eligibility, beneficiaries shall be encouraged to undertake a physical examination that will establish a base-line level of health and identification of a usual and customary source of care (a medical home) to aid utilization of disease management tools.  This physical examination and utilization of these disease management tools shall be consistent with current United States Preventive Services Task Force or other recognized authority recommendations. For persons who are determined ineligible for Medicaid, the division will provide information and direction for accessing medical care and services in the area of their residence. (52)  Notwithstanding any provisions of this article, the division may pay enhanced reimbursement fees related to trauma care, as determined by the division in conjunction with the State Department of Health, using funds appropriated to the State Department of Health for trauma care and services and used to match federal funds under a cooperative agreement between the division and the State Department of Health.  The division, in conjunction with the State Department of Health, may use grants, waivers, demonstrations, enhanced reimbursements, Upper Payment Limits Programs, supplemental payments, or other projects as necessary in the development and implementation of this reimbursement program. (53)  Targeted case management services for high-cost beneficiaries may be developed by the division for all services under this section. (54)  [Deleted] (55)  Therapy services.  The plan of care for therapy services may be developed to cover a period of treatment for up to six (6) months, but in no event shall the plan of care exceed a six-month period of treatment.  The projected period of treatment must be indicated on the initial plan of care and must be updated with each subsequent revised plan of care.  Based on medical necessity, the division shall approve certification periods for less than or up to six (6) months, but in no event shall the certification period exceed the period of treatment indicated on the plan of care.  The appeal process for any reduction in therapy services shall be consistent with the appeal process in federal regulations. (56)  Prescribed pediatric extended care centers services for medically dependent or technologically dependent children with complex medical conditions that require continual care as prescribed by the child's attending physician, as determined by the division. (57)  No Medicaid benefit shall restrict coverage for medically appropriate treatment prescribed by a physician and agreed to by a fully informed individual, or if the individual lacks legal capacity to consent by a person who has legal authority to consent on his or her behalf, based on an individual's diagnosis with a terminal condition.  As used in this paragraph (57), "terminal condition" means any aggressive malignancy, chronic end-stage cardiovascular or cerebral vascular disease, or any other disease, illness or condition which a physician diagnoses as terminal. (58)  Treatment services for persons with opioid dependency or other highly addictive substance use disorders.  The division is authorized to reimburse eligible providers for treatment of opioid dependency and other highly addictive substance use disorders, as determined by the division.  Treatment related to these conditions shall not count against any physician visit limit imposed under this section. (59)  The division shall allow beneficiaries between the ages of ten (10) and eighteen (18) years to receive vaccines through a pharmacy venue.  The division and the State Department of Health shall coordinate and notify OB-GYN providers that the Vaccines for Children program is available to providers free of charge. (60)  Border city university-affiliated pediatric teaching hospital. (a)  Payments may only be made to a border city university-affiliated pediatric teaching hospital if the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) approve an increase in the annual request for the provider payment initiative authorized under 42 CFR Section 438.6(c) in an amount equal to or greater than the estimated annual payment to be made to the border city university-affiliated pediatric teaching hospital.  The estimate shall be based on the hospital's prior year Mississippi managed care utilization. (b)  As used in this paragraph (60), the term "border city university-affiliated pediatric teaching hospital" means an out-of-state hospital located within a city bordering the eastern bank of the Mississippi River and the State of Mississippi that submits to the division a copy of a current and effective affiliation agreement with an accredited university and other documentation establishing that the hospital is university-affiliated, is licensed and designated as a pediatric hospital or pediatric primary hospital within its home state, maintains at least five (5) different pediatric specialty training programs, and maintains at least one hundred (100) operated beds dedicated exclusively for the treatment of patients under the age of twenty-one (21) years. (c)  The cost of providing services to Mississippi Medicaid beneficiaries under the age of twenty-one (21) years who are treated by a border city university-affiliated pediatric teaching hospital shall not exceed the cost of providing the same services to individuals in hospitals in the state. (d)  It is the intent of the Legislature that payments shall not result in any in-state hospital receiving payments lower than they would otherwise receive if not for the payments made to any border city university-affiliated pediatric teaching hospital. (e)  This paragraph (60) shall stand repealed on July 1, 2024. (61)  Services described in Section 41-140-3 that are provided by certified community health workers employed and supervised by a Medicaid provider.  Reimbursement for these services shall be provided only if the division has received approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for a state plan amendment, waiver or alternative payment model for services delivered by certified community health workers. (B)  Planning and development districts participating in the home- and community-based services program for the elderly and disabled as case management providers shall be reimbursed for case management services at the maximum rate approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS). (C)  The division may pay to those providers who participate in and accept patient referrals from the division's emergency room redirection program a percentage, as determined by the division, of savings achieved according to the performance measures and reduction of costs required of that program.  Federally qualified health centers may participate in the emergency room redirection program, and the division may pay those centers a percentage of any savings to the Medicaid program achieved by the centers' accepting patient referrals through the program, as provided in this subsection (C). (D)  (1)  As used in this subsection (D), the following terms shall be defined as provided in this paragraph, except as otherwise provided in this subsection: (a)  "Committees" means the Medicaid Committees of the House of Representatives and the Senate, and "committee" means either one of those committees. (b)  "Rate change" means an increase, decrease or other change in the payments or rates of reimbursement, or a change in any payment methodology that results in an increase, decrease or other change in the payments or rates of reimbursement, to any Medicaid provider that renders any services authorized to be provided to Medicaid recipients under this article. (2)  Whenever the Division of Medicaid proposes a rate change, the division shall give notice to the chairmen of the committees at least thirty (30) calendar days before the proposed rate change is scheduled to take effect.  The division shall furnish the chairmen with a concise summary of each proposed rate change along with the notice, and shall furnish the chairmen with a copy of any proposed rate change upon request.  The division also shall provide a summary and copy of any proposed rate change to any other member of the Legislature upon request. (3)  If the chairman of either committee or both chairmen jointly object to the proposed rate change or any part thereof, the chairman or chairmen shall notify the division and provide the reasons for their objection in writing not later than seven (7) calendar days after receipt of the notice from the division.  The chairman or chairmen may make written recommendations to the division for changes to be made to a proposed rate change. (4)  (a)  The chairman of either committee or both chairmen jointly may hold a committee meeting to review a proposed rate change.  If either chairman or both chairmen decide to hold a meeting, they shall notify the division of their intention in writing within seven (7) calendar days after receipt of the notice from the division, and shall set the date and time for the meeting in their notice to the division, which shall not be later than fourteen (14) calendar days after receipt of the notice from the division. (b)  After the committee meeting, the committee or committees may object to the proposed rate change or any part thereof.  The committee or committees shall notify the division and the reasons for their objection in writing not later than seven (7) calendar days after the meeting.  The committee or committees may make written recommendations to the division for changes to be made to a proposed rate change. (5)  If both chairmen notify the division in writing within seven (7) calendar days after receipt of the notice from the division that they do not object to the proposed rate change and will not be holding a meeting to review the proposed rate change, the proposed rate change will take effect on the original date as scheduled by the division or on such other date as specified by the division. (6)  (a)  If there are any objections to a proposed rate change or any part thereof from either or both of the chairmen or the committees, the division may withdraw the proposed rate change, make any of the recommended changes to the proposed rate change, or not make any changes to the proposed rate change. (b)  If the division does not make any changes to the proposed rate change, it shall notify the chairmen of that fact in writing, and the proposed rate change shall take effect on the original date as scheduled by the division or on such other date as specified by the division. (c)  If the division makes any changes to the proposed rate change, the division shall notify the chairmen of its actions in writing, and the revised proposed rate change shall take effect on the date as specified by the division. (7)  Nothing in this subsection (D) shall be construed as giving the chairmen or the committees any authority to veto, nullify or revise any rate change proposed by the division. The authority of the chairmen or the committees under this subsection shall be limited to reviewing, making objections to and making recommendations for changes to rate changes proposed by the division. (E)  Notwithstanding any provision of this article, no new groups or categories of recipients and new types of care and services may be added without enabling legislation from the Mississippi Legislature, except that the division may authorize those changes without enabling legislation when the addition of recipients or services is ordered by a court of proper authority. (F)  The executive director shall keep the Governor advised on a timely basis of the funds available for expenditure and the projected expenditures.  Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, if current or projected expenditures of the division are reasonably anticipated to exceed the amount of funds appropriated to the division for any fiscal year, the Governor, after consultation with the executive director, shall take all appropriate measures to reduce costs, which may include, but are not limited to: (1)  Reducing or discontinuing any or all services that are deemed to be optional under Title XIX of the Social Security Act; (2)  Reducing reimbursement rates for any or all service types; (3)  Imposing additional assessments on health care providers; or (4)  Any additional cost-containment measures deemed appropriate by the Governor. To the extent allowed under federal law, any reduction to services or reimbursement rates under this subsection (F) shall be accompanied by a reduction, to the fullest allowable amount, to the profit margin and administrative fee portions of capitated payments to organizations described in paragraph (1) of subsection (H). Beginning in fiscal year 2010 and in fiscal years thereafter, when Medicaid expenditures are projected to exceed funds available for the fiscal year, the division shall submit the expected shortfall information to the PEER Committee not later than December 1 of the year in which the shortfall is projected to occur.  PEER shall review the computations of the division and report its findings to the Legislative Budget Office not later than January 7 in any year. (G)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, it shall be the duty of each provider participating in the Medicaid program to keep and maintain books, documents and other records as prescribed by the Division of Medicaid in accordance with federal laws and regulations. (H)  (1)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the division is authorized to implement (a) a managed care program, (b) a coordinated care program, (c) a coordinated care organization program, (d) a health maintenance organization program, (e) a patient-centered medical home program, (f) an accountable care organization program, (g) provider-sponsored health plan, or (h) any combination of the above programs.  As a condition for the approval of any program under this subsection (H)(1), the division shall require that no managed care program, coordinated care program, coordinated care organization program, health maintenance organization program, or provider-sponsored health plan may: (a)  Pay providers at a rate that is less than the Medicaid All Patient Refined Diagnosis Related Groups (APR-DRG) reimbursement rate; (b)  Override the medical decisions of hospital physicians or staff regarding patients admitted to a hospital for an emergency medical condition as defined by 42 US Code Section 1395dd.  This restriction (b) does not prohibit the retrospective review of the appropriateness of the determination that an emergency medical condition exists by chart review or coding algorithm, nor does it prohibit prior authorization for nonemergency hospital admissions; (c)  Pay providers at a rate that is less than the normal Medicaid reimbursement rate.  It is the intent of the Legislature that all managed care entities described in this subsection (H), in collaboration with the division, develop and implement innovative payment models that incentivize improvements in health care quality, outcomes, or value, as determined by the division.  Participation in the provider network of any managed care, coordinated care, provider-sponsored health plan, or similar contractor shall not be conditioned on the provider's agreement to accept such alternative payment models; (d)  Implement a prior authorization and utilization review program for medical services, transportation services and prescription drugs that is more stringent than the prior authorization processes used by the division in its administration of the Medicaid program.  Not later than December 2, 2021, the contractors that are receiving capitated payments under a managed care delivery system established under this subsection (H) shall submit a report to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Medicaid Committees on the status of the prior authorization and utilization review program for medical services, transportation services and prescription drugs that is required to be implemented under this subparagraph (d); (e)  [Deleted] (f)  Implement a preferred drug list that is more stringent than the mandatory preferred drug list established by the division under subsection (A)(9) of this section; (g)  Implement a policy which denies beneficiaries with hemophilia access to the federally funded hemophilia treatment centers as part of the Medicaid Managed Care network of providers. Each health maintenance organization, coordinated care organization, provider-sponsored health plan, or other organization paid for services on a capitated basis by the division under any managed care program or coordinated care program implemented by the division under this section shall use a clear set of level of care guidelines in the determination of medical necessity and in all utilization management practices, including the prior authorization process, concurrent reviews, retrospective reviews and payments, that are consistent with widely accepted professional standards of care.  Organizations participating in a managed care program or coordinated care program implemented by the division may not use any additional criteria that would result in denial of care that would be determined appropriate and, therefore, medically necessary under those levels of care guidelines. (2)  Notwithstanding any provision of this section, the recipients eligible for enrollment into a Medicaid Managed Care Program authorized under this subsection (H) may include only those categories of recipients eligible for participation in the Medicaid Managed Care Program as of January 1, 2021, the Children's Health Insurance Program (CHIP), and the CMS-approved Section 1115 demonstration waivers in operation as of January 1, 2021.  No expansion of Medicaid Managed Care Program contracts may be implemented by the division without enabling legislation from the Mississippi Legislature. (3)  (a)  Any contractors receiving capitated payments under a managed care delivery system established in this section shall provide to the Legislature and the division statistical data to be shared with provider groups in order to improve patient access, appropriate utilization, cost savings and health outcomes not later than October 1 of each year.  Additionally, each contractor shall disclose to the Chairmen of the Senate and House Medicaid Committees the administrative expenses costs for the prior calendar year, and the number of full-equivalent employees located in the State of Mississippi dedicated to the Medicaid and CHIP lines of business as of June 30 of the current year. (b)  The division and the contractors participating in the managed care program, a coordinated care program or a provider-sponsored health plan shall be subject to annual program reviews or audits performed by the Office of the State Auditor, the PEER Committee, the Department of Insurance and/or independent third parties. (c)  Those reviews shall include, but not be limited to, at least two (2) of the following items: (i)  The financial benefit to the State of Mississippi of the managed care program, (ii)  The difference between the premiums paid to the managed care contractors and the payments made by those contractors to health care providers, (iii) Compliance with performance measures required under the contracts, (iv) Administrative expense allocation methodologies, (v)  Whether nonprovider payments assigned as medical expenses are appropriate, (vi) Capitated arrangements with related party subcontractors, (vii) Reasonableness of corporate allocations, (viii)  Value-added benefits and the extent to which they are used, (ix)  The effectiveness of subcontractor oversight, including subcontractor review, (x)  Whether health care outcomes have been improved, and (xi)  The most common claim denial codes to determine the reasons for the denials. The audit reports shall be considered public documents and shall be posted in their entirety on the division's website. (4)  All health maintenance organizations, coordinated care organizations, provider-sponsored health plans, or other organizations paid for services on a capitated basis by the division under any managed care program or coordinated care program implemented by the division under this section shall reimburse all providers in those organizations at rates no lower than those provided under this section for beneficiaries who are not participating in those programs. (5)  No health maintenance organization, coordinated care organization, provider-sponsored health plan, or other organization paid for services on a capitated basis by the division under any managed care program or coordinated care program implemented by the division under this section shall require its providers or beneficiaries to use any pharmacy that ships, mails or delivers prescription drugs or legend drugs or devices. (6)  (a)  Not later than December 1, 2021, the contractors who are receiving capitated payments under a managed care delivery system established under this subsection (H) shall develop and implement a uniform credentialing process for providers. Under that uniform credentialing process, a provider who meets the criteria for credentialing will be credentialed with all of those contractors and no such provider will have to be separately credentialed by any individual contractor in order to receive reimbursement from the contractor.  Not later than December 2, 2021, those contractors shall submit a report to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Medicaid Committees on the status of the uniform credentialing process for providers that is required under this subparagraph (a). (b)  If those contractors have not implemented a uniform credentialing process as described in subparagraph (a) by December 1, 2021, the division shall develop and implement, not later than July 1, 2022, a single, consolidated credentialing process by which all providers will be credentialed.  Under the division's single, consolidated credentialing process, no such contractor shall require its providers to be separately credentialed by the contractor in order to receive reimbursement from the contractor, but those contractors shall recognize the credentialing of the providers by the division's credentialing process. (c)  The division shall require a uniform provider credentialing application that shall be used in the credentialing process that is established under subparagraph (a) or (b).  If the contractor or division, as applicable, has not approved or denied the provider credentialing application within sixty (60) days of receipt of the completed application that includes all required information necessary for credentialing, then the contractor or division, upon receipt of a written request from the applicant and within five (5) business days of its receipt, shall issue a temporary provider credential/enrollment to the applicant if the applicant has a valid Mississippi professional or occupational license to provide the health care services to which the credential/enrollment would apply.  The contractor or the division shall not issue a temporary credential/enrollment if the applicant has reported on the application a history of medical or other professional or occupational malpractice claims, a history of substance abuse or mental health issues, a criminal record, or a history of medical or other licensing board, state or federal disciplinary action, including any suspension from participation in a federal or state program.  The temporary credential/enrollment shall be effective upon issuance and shall remain in effect until the provider's credentialing/enrollment application is approved or denied by the contractor or division.  The contractor or division shall render a final decision regarding credentialing/enrollment of the provider within sixty (60) days from the date that the temporary provider credential/enrollment is issued to the applicant. (d)  If the contractor or division does not render a final decision regarding credentialing/enrollment of the provider within the time required in subparagraph (c), the provider shall be deemed to be credentialed by and enrolled with all of the contractors and eligible to receive reimbursement from the contractors. (7)  (a)  Each contractor that is receiving capitated payments under a managed care delivery system established under this subsection (H) shall provide to each provider for whom the contractor has denied the coverage of a procedure that was ordered or requested by the provider for or on behalf of a patient, a letter that provides a detailed explanation of the reasons for the denial of coverage of the procedure and the name and the credentials of the person who denied the coverage.  The letter shall be sent to the provider in electronic format. (b)  After a contractor that is receiving capitated payments under a managed care delivery system established under this subsection (H) has denied coverage for a claim submitted by a provider, the contractor shall issue to the provider within sixty (60) days a final ruling of denial of the claim that allows the provider to have a state fair hearing and/or agency appeal with the division.  If a contractor does not issue a final ruling of denial within sixty (60) days as required by this subparagraph (b), the provider's claim shall be deemed to be automatically approved and the contractor shall pay the amount of the claim to the provider. (c)  After a contractor has issued a final ruling of denial of a claim submitted by a provider, the division shall conduct a state fair hearing and/or agency appeal on the matter of the disputed claim between the contractor and the provider within sixty (60) days, and shall render a decision on the matter within thirty (30) days after the date of the hearing and/or appeal. (8)  It is the intention of the Legislature that the division evaluate the feasibility of using a single vendor to administer pharmacy benefits provided under a managed care delivery system established under this subsection (H).  Providers of pharmacy benefits shall cooperate with the division in any transition to a carve-out of pharmacy benefits under managed care. (9)  The division shall evaluate the feasibility of using a single vendor to administer dental benefits provided under a managed care delivery system established in this subsection (H).  Providers of dental benefits shall cooperate with the division in any transition to a carve-out of dental benefits under managed care. (10)  It is the intent of the Legislature that any contractor receiving capitated payments under a managed care delivery system established in this section shall implement innovative programs to improve the health and well-being of members diagnosed with prediabetes and diabetes. (11)  It is the intent of the Legislature that any contractors receiving capitated payments under a managed care delivery system established under this subsection (H) shall work with providers of Medicaid services to improve the utilization of long-acting reversible contraceptives (LARCs).  Not later than December 1, 2021, any contractors receiving capitated payments under a managed care delivery system established under this subsection (H) shall provide to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Medicaid Committees and House and Senate Public Health Committees a report of LARC utilization for State Fiscal Years 2018 through 2020 as well as any programs, initiatives, or efforts made by the contractors and providers to increase LARC utilization.  This report shall be updated annually to include information for subsequent state fiscal years. (12)  The division is authorized to make not more than one (1) emergency extension of the contracts that are in effect on July 1, 2021, with contractors who are receiving capitated payments under a managed care delivery system established under this subsection (H), as provided in this paragraph (12).  The maximum period of any such extension shall be one (1) year, and under any such extensions, the contractors shall be subject to all of the provisions of this subsection (H). The extended contracts shall be revised to incorporate any provisions of this subsection (H). (I)  [Deleted] (J)  There shall be no cuts in inpatient and outpatient hospital payments, or allowable days or volumes, as long as the hospital assessment provided in Section 43-13-145 is in effect. This subsection (J) shall not apply to decreases in payments that are a result of:  reduced hospital admissions, audits or payments under the APR-DRG or APC models, or a managed care program or similar model described in subsection (H) of this section. (K)  In the negotiation and execution of such contracts involving services performed by actuarial firms, the Executive Director of the Division of Medicaid may negotiate a limitation on liability to the state of prospective contractors. (L)  The Division of Medicaid shall reimburse for services  provided to eligible Medicaid beneficiaries by a licensed birthing center in a method and manner to be determined by the division in accordance with federal laws and federal regulations.  The division shall seek any necessary waivers, make any required amendments to its State Plan or revise any contracts authorized under subsection (H) of this section as necessary to provide the services authorized under this subsection.  As used in this subsection, the term "birthing centers" shall have the meaning as defined in Section 41-77-1(a), which is a publicly or privately owned facility, place or institution constructed, renovated, leased or otherwise established where nonemergency births are planned to occur away from the mother's usual residence following a documented period of prenatal care for a normal uncomplicated pregnancy which has been determined to be low risk through a formal risk-scoring examination. (M)  This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2028. SECTION 45.  Section 43-18-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-18-1.  The Governor, on behalf of this state, is * * * hereby authorized to execute a compact in substantially the following form with all other jurisdictions legally joining therein; and the Legislature * * *hereby signifies in advance its approval and ratification of such compact, which compact is as follows: INTERSTATE COMPACT ON THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN ARTICLE I. It is the purpose and policy of the party states to cooperate with each other in the interstate placement of children to the end that: (a)  Each child requiring placement shall receive the maximum opportunity to be placed in a suitable environment and with persons or institutions having appropriate qualifications and facilities to provide a necessary and desirable degree and type of care. (b)  The appropriate authorities in a state where a child is to be placed may have full opportunity to ascertain the circumstances of the proposed placement, thereby promoting full compliance with applicable requirements for the protection of the child. (c)  The proper authorities of the state from which the placement is made may obtain the most complete information on the basis on which to evaluate a projected placement before it is made. (d)  Appropriate jurisdictional arrangements for the care of children will be promoted. ARTICLE II. As used in this compact: (a)  "Child" means a person who, by reason of minority, is legally subject to parental, guardianship or similar control. (b)  "Sending agency" means a party state, officer or employee thereof; a subdivision of a party state, or officer or employee thereof; a court of a party state; a person, corporation, association, charitable agency or other entity which sends, brings or causes to be sent or brought any child to another party state. (c)  "Receiving state" means the state to which a child is sent, brought, or caused to be sent or brought, whether by public authorities or private persons or agencies and whether for placement with state or local public authorities or for placement with private agencies or persons. (d)  "Placement" means the arrangement for the care of a child in a family free or boarding home or in a child-caring agency or institution, but does not include any institution caring for * * *the mentally ill or mentally defective persons with mental illness or persons with an intellectual disability or any institution primarily educational in character, and any hospital or other medical facility. ARTICLE III. (a)  No sending agency shall send, bring or cause to be sent or brought into any other party state any child for placement in foster care or as a preliminary to a possible adoption unless the sending agency shall comply with each and every requirement set forth in this article and with the applicable laws of the receiving state governing the placement of children therein. (b)  Prior to sending, bringing or causing any child to be sent or brought into a receiving state for placement in foster care or as a preliminary to a possible adoption, the sending agency shall furnish the appropriate public authorities in the receiving state written notice of the intention to send, bring or place the child in the receiving state.  The notice shall contain: (1)  The name, date and place of birth of the child. (2)  The identity and address or addresses of the parents or legal guardian. (3)  The name and address of the person, agency or institution to or with which the sending agency proposes to send, bring or place the child. (4)  A full statement of the reasons for such proposed action and evidence of the authority pursuant to which the placement is proposed to be made. (c)  Any public officer or agency in a receiving state which is in receipt of a notice pursuant to paragraph (b) of this article may request of the sending agency, or any other appropriate officer or agency of or in the sending agency's state, and shall be entitled to receive therefrom, such supporting or additional information as it may deem necessary under the circumstances to carry out the purpose and policy of this compact. (d)  The child shall not be sent, brought or caused to be sent or brought into the receiving state until the appropriate public authorities in the receiving state shall notify the sending agency, in writing, to the effect that the proposed placement does not appear to be contrary to the interests of the child. ARTICLE IV. The sending, bringing or causing to be sent or brought into any receiving state of a child in violation of the terms of this compact shall constitute a violation of the laws respecting the placement of children of both the state in which the sending agency is located or from which it sends or brings the child and of the receiving state.  Such violation may be punished or subjected to penalty in either jurisdiction in accordance with its laws.  In addition to liability for any such punishment or penalty, any such violation shall constitute full and sufficient grounds for the suspension or revocation of any license, permit or other legal authorization held by the sending agency which empowers or allows it to place or care for children. ARTICLE V. (a)  The sending agency shall retain jurisdiction over the child sufficient to determine all matters in relation to the custody, supervision, care, treatment and disposition of the child which it would have had if the child had remained in the sending agency's state, until the child is adopted, reaches majority, becomes self-supporting or is discharged with the concurrence of the appropriate authority in the receiving state.  Such jurisdiction shall also include the power to effect or cause the return of the child or its transfer to another location and custody pursuant to law.  The sending agency shall continue to have financial responsibility for support and maintenance of the child during the period of the placement.  Nothing contained herein shall defeat a claim of jurisdiction by a receiving state sufficient to deal with an act of delinquency or crime committed therein. (b)  When the sending agency is a public agency, it may enter into an agreement with an authorized public or private agency in the receiving state providing for the performance of one or more services in respect of such case by the latter as agent for the sending agency. (c)  Nothing in this compact shall be construed to prevent a private charitable agency authorized to place children in the receiving state from performing services or acting as agent in that state for a private charitable agency of the sending state; nor to prevent the agency in the receiving state from discharging financial responsibility for the support and maintenance of a child who has been placed on behalf of the sending agency without relieving the responsibility set forth in paragraph (a) hereof. ARTICLE VI. A child adjudicated delinquent may be placed in an institution in another party jurisdiction pursuant to this compact, but no such placement shall be made unless the child is given a court hearing on notice to the parent or guardian with opportunity to be heard, prior to his being sent to such other party jurisdiction for institutional care and the court finds that: (1)  Equivalent facilities for the child are not available in the sending agency's jurisdiction; and (2)  Institutional care in the other jurisdiction is in the best interest of the child and will not produce undue hardship. ARTICLE VII. The executive head of each jurisdiction party to this compact shall designate an officer who shall be general coordinator of activities under this compact in his jurisdiction and who, acting jointly with like officers of other party jurisdictions, shall have power to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out more effectively the terms and provisions of this compact. ARTICLE VIII. This compact shall not apply to: (a)  The sending or bringing of a child into a receiving state by his parent, stepparent, grandparent, adult brother or sister, adult uncle or aunt, or his guardian and leaving the child with any such relative or nonagency guardian in the receiving state. (b)  Any placement, sending or bringing of a child into a receiving state pursuant to any other interstate compact to which both the state from which the child is sent or brought and the receiving state are party, or to any other agreement between * * *said those states which has the force of law. ARTICLE IX. This compact shall be open to joinder by any state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and, with the consent of Congress, the government of Canada or any province thereof.  It shall become effective with respect to any such jurisdiction when such jurisdiction has enacted the same into law.  Withdrawal from this compact shall be by the enactment of a statute repealing the same, but shall not take effect until written notice of the withdrawal has been given by the withdrawing state to the Governor of each other party jurisdiction.  Withdrawal of a party state shall not affect the rights, duties and obligations under this compact of any sending agency therein with respect to a placement made prior to the effective date of withdrawal. ARTICLE X. The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes thereof.  The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.  If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state party thereto, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters. SECTION 46.  Section 43-27-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-27-25.  No person shall be committed to an institution under the control of the Department of Youth Services who is seriously * * *handicapped disabled by having mental illness or an intellectual disability.  If after a person is referred to the training schools it is determined that he has mental illness or an intellectual disability to an extent that he could not be properly cared for in its custody, the director may institute necessary legal action to accomplish the transfer of such person to such other state institution as, in his judgment, is best qualified to care for him in accordance with the laws of this state.  The department shall establish standards with regard to the physical and mental health of persons which it can accept for commitment. SECTION 47.  Section 43-33-703, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-33-703.  For the purposes of this article, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Bonds" or "notes" means the bonds or notes, respectively, issued by the corporation pursuant to this article; (b)  "Corporation" means the Mississippi Home Corporation; (c)  "Energy conservation loan" means a mortgage loan made to a person of low or moderate income to finance improvements made or to be made to the residential housing owned and occupied by such person for the purposes of conserving energy and reducing the energy costs attributable to such residential housing, and containing such terms and conditions as the corporation may require; (d)  "Housing development mortgage loan" means a mortgage loan made to finance or refinance the acquisition, construction or substantial rehabilitation of a housing development, including both construction loans and permanent loans; (e)  "Housing development" means any specific work located within the state and made available to persons of low or moderate income for rental or residential housing purposes, including any building, land, equipment, facility or other real or personal property which may be necessary, convenient or desirable in connection therewith including streets, sewers, water and utility services; (f)  "Mortgage" means a mortgage, mortgage deed or deed of trust on a fee interest in residential housing or a rental housing development or, on real property in which the fee interest is owned without limitation by a unit of government or other entity created by statute, a leasehold on such a fee interest of a duration satisfactory to the corporation, which shall in all events exceed the term of the security interest created by the mortgagee; (g)  "Mortgage lender" means any bank, bank or trust company, trust company, mortgage company, mortgage banker, national banking association, savings bank, savings and loan association, building and loan association, and any other lending institution; * * *provided that such lender * * *is must be domiciled or qualified to do business in this state; (h)  "Mortgage loan" means a financial obligation secured by a mortgage, including any portion thereof or participation therein in any new or existing mortgage loan; (i)  "Municipality" means any county, city, town or village of the state; (j)  "Persons of low or moderate income" means persons or families, irrespective of race, color, national origin, sex, religion, age or * * *handicap disability, within the state, who are determined by the corporation to require such assistance as is made available pursuant to this article on account of insufficient personal or family income to reasonably afford decent, safe and sanitary residential or rental housing, taking into consideration, without limitation, such factors as the following:  (i) the amount of the total income of such persons and families available for housing needs; (ii) the size of the family; (iii) the cost and condition of residential or rental housing facilities in their locality or in an area reasonably accessible to such locality; (iv) the ability of such persons and families to compete successfully in the normal, private residential or rental housing market and to pay the amounts for which private enterprise is providing sanitary, decent and safe residential or rental housing in their locality or in an area reasonably accessible to such locality; (v) the standards established by various programs of the federal government for determining eligibility based on income of such persons and families and, in the case of projects with respect to which income limits have been established by any agency of the federal government having jurisdiction thereover for the purpose of defining eligibility of low and moderate income families, the corporation may determine that the limits so established shall govern; in all other cases income limits for the purpose of defining low or moderate income persons shall be established by the corporation in its rules and regulations; (k)  "Qualified sponsors" means any person, corporation, partnership or association, profit or nonprofit, public or private, which provides or develops residential or rental housing for low and moderate income families; (l)  "Residential housing" means a specific work or improvement undertaken to provide an owner-occupied residence within the state, which shall become the principal residence of the owner within a reasonable time after the financing is provided; (m)  "State" means the State of Mississippi; (n)  "State agency" means any board, authority, agency, department, commission, public corporation, body politic or instrumentality of the state; (o)  "Local housing authority" or "regional housing authority" means a public body corporate and politic organized and operating pursuant to this chapter, as amended, or a nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi and designated by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development as a public housing agency within the meaning of Section 3(6) of the United States Housing Act of 1937, as amended. SECTION 48.  Section 43-33-717, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-33-717.  (1)  The corporation shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this article, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power: (a)  To make and alter bylaws for its organization and internal management; (b)  To sue and be sued, have a seal and alter the same at pleasure, and maintain an office at such place or places in the state as it may determine; (c)  To appoint officers, agents and employees, prescribe their duties and qualifications, and fix their compensation; (d)  To acquire real or personal property, or any interest therein, by purchase, exchange, gift, assignment, transfer, foreclosure, lease, condemnation or otherwise, including rights or easements; to hold, manage, operate or improve real or personal property; to sell, assign, exchange, lease, encumber, mortgage or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property, or any interest therein, or deed of trust or mortgage lien interest owned by it or under its control, custody or in its possession and release or relinquish any right, title, claim, lien, interest, easement or demand however acquired, including any equity or right of redemption in property foreclosed by it and to do any of the foregoing by public sale; (e)  To make and execute agreements, contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers and functions of the corporation under this article; (f)  To employ or contract with architects, engineers, attorneys, accountants, financial experts and other advisors as may be necessary in its judgment and to fix and pay their compensation; (g)  To make and execute contracts for the administration, servicing or collection of any mortgage loan and pay the reasonable value of services rendered to the corporation pursuant to such contracts; (h)  To contract for the employment of a financial advisor, underwriting attorneys, trustees, paying agents, depositories or any consultants retained in connection with the issuance of any bonds or notes including refunding bonds or notes or dealing with the disposition of any proceeds thereof; (i)  To issue negotiable bonds and notes and to provide for the rights of the holders thereof; (j)  Subject to any agreement with bondholders or noteholders, to sell any mortgage loans at public or private sale at the fair market value for such a mortgage; and (k)  Subject to any agreement with bondholders and noteholders, to make, alter or repeal such rules and regulations with respect to the operations, properties and facilities of the corporation as are necessary to carry out its functions and duties in the administration of this article. (2)  The corporation shall also have the power: (a)  To make loans to mortgage lenders for the purpose of: (i)  Making housing development mortgage loans to qualified sponsors for low and moderate income rental or residential housing; (ii)  Making loans to low and moderate income purchasers of residential housing with preference to those who are displaced from adequate housing as a result of a major disaster, whether it be a man-made, technological or natural disaster, upon a declaration by the Governor that a major disaster exists in the state; (b)  To purchase from mortgage lenders any of the loans enumerated in subparagraphs (i) and (ii); (c)  To insure, reinsure or guarantee any of the types of loans enumerated in subparagraphs (i) and (ii); (d)  To make, in such amounts and upon such terms and conditions as the corporation shall approve, temporary loans, preconstruction loans, interim financing loans to any qualified sponsor and permanent financing to any qualified sponsor of multifamily housing. (3)  The corporation shall also have the power to make loans from funds not otherwise encumbered by pledge or indenture to low and moderate income persons for the following purposes: (a)  Purchasing, improving or rehabilitating existing residential housing and occupied by the owners; (b)  Making loans to qualified nonprofit sponsors, to local housing authorities and to owners of residential housing for the development, construction, purchase, rehabilitation, weatherization or maintenance of residential housing. (4)  Using funds not otherwise encumbered by pledge or indenture, the corporation may: (a)  Establish a rental assistance program; (b)  Provide such advisory consultation, training and educational services as will assist in the planning, construction, rehabilitation and operation of housing, including but not limited to, assistance in community development and organization, home management and advisory services for residents, and in promotion of community organizations and local governments to assist in developing housing; (c)  Encourage research and demonstration projects to develop new and better methods for increasing the supply, types and financing of housing and to receive and accept contributions, grants or aid from any source, public or private, including but not limited to the United States and this state, for carrying out this purpose; (d)  Encourage and stimulate cooperatives and other forms of housing with tenant participation; (e)  Promote innovative programs for home ownership, including but not limited to lease-purchase programs, employer-sponsored housing programs, tenant cooperatives and nonprofit associations; (f)  Design and support programs to address special needs groups including, but not limited to, * * *handicapped, disabled, elderly, homeless, HIV/AIDS carriers and families with children; (g)  Develop a comprehensive plan for, and engage in a yearly planning process for, addressing the housing needs of low and moderate income persons in Mississippi. (5)  The corporation also has the power: (a)  To procure, or require the procurement of, insurance against any loss in connection with its operations, including without limitation the repayment of any mortgage loan or loans, in such amounts and from such insurers, including the federal government, as it may deem necessary or desirable, and to pay any premiums therefor; (b)  Subject to any agreement with bondholders or noteholders:  (i) to renegotiate any loan in default; (ii) to waive any default or consent to the modification of the terms of any loan or agreement; (iii) to commence, prosecute and enforce a judgment in any action or proceeding, including without limitation a foreclosure proceeding, to protect or enforce any right conferred upon it by law, mortgage loan agreement, contract or other agreement; and (iv) in connection with any such proceeding, to bid for and purchase the property or acquire or take possession thereof and, in such event, complete, administer and pay the principal of and interest on any obligations incurred in connection with such property and dispose of and otherwise deal with such property in such manner as the corporation may deem advisable to protect its interest therein; (c)  To fix, revise, charge and collect fees and other charges in connection with the making of loans, the purchasing of mortgage loans, and any other services rendered by the corporation; (d)  To arrange for guarantees of its bonds, notes or other obligations by the federal government or by any private insurer and to pay any premiums therefor; (e)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, but subject to any agreement with bondholders or noteholders, to invest money of the corporation not required for immediate use, including proceeds from the sale of any bonds or notes * * *;: (i)  In obligations of any municipality or the state or the United States of America; (ii)  In obligations the principal and interest of which are guaranteed by the state or the United States of America; (iii)  In obligations of any corporation wholly owned by the United States of America; (iv)  In obligations of any corporation sponsored by the United States of America which are, or may become, eligible as collateral for advances to member banks as determined by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System; (v)  In obligations of insurance firms or other corporations whose investments are rated "A" or better by recognized rating companies; (vi)  In certificates of deposit or time deposits of qualified depositories of the state as approved by the State * * *Depository Commission Treasurer, secured in such manner, if any, as the corporation shall determine; (vii)  In contracts for the purchase and sale of obligations of the type specified in * * *items subparagraphs (i) through (v) above; (viii)  In repurchase agreements secured by obligations specified in * * *items subparagraphs (i) through (v) above; (ix)  In money market funds, the assets of which are required to be invested in obligations specified in * * *items subparagraphs (i) through (vi) above; (f)  Subject to any agreement with bondholders or noteholders, to purchase, and to agree to purchase, bonds or notes of the corporation at a price not exceeding:  (i) if the bonds or notes are then redeemable, the redemption price then applicable plus accrued interest to the date of purchase; or (ii) if the bonds or notes are not then redeemable, the redemption price applicable on the first date after such purchase upon which the notes or bonds become subject to redemption at the option of the corporation plus accrued interest to the date of purchase; (g)  Subject to the provisions of this article, to contract for and to accept any gifts, grants or loans of funds or property or financial or other aid in any form from federal, state or local governments, private or public entities, or individuals; (h)  To enter into agreements or other transactions with the federal or state government, any agency thereof or any municipality in furtherance of the purposes of this article; to operate and administer loan programs of the federal government, the State of Mississippi, or any governmental agency thereof; and to operate and administer any program of housing assistance for persons and families of low or moderate income, however funded; (i)  To establish a benevolent loan fund, housing development fund, or such additional and further funds as may be necessary and desirable to accomplish any corporate purpose or to comply with the provisions of any agreement made by the corporation or any resolution approved by the corporation.   The resolution establishing such a fund shall specify the source of monies from which it shall be funded and the purposes for which monies held in the fund shall be disbursed; (j)  In carrying out the provisions of this article, the corporation shall cooperate with the housing authorities created under Sections 43-33-1 through 43-33-69 and Sections 43-33-101 through 43-33-137 * * *, Mississippi Code of 1972; (k)  To accept letters of credit and other credit facilities necessary to make loans authorized herein to repay bonds or notes issued by the corporation; (l)  To do any and all things necessary or convenient to carry out its purposes and exercise the powers given and granted in this article. SECTION 49.  Section 43-33-723, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-33-723.  No person shall be discriminated against because of race, religious principles, color, sex, national origin, ancestry or * * *handicap disability by the corporation, any qualified sponsor, any lender, or any agent or employee thereof in connection with any housing development or eligible loan.  No person shall be discriminated against because of age, nor shall any family be discriminated against because of children, in admission to, or continuance of occupancy in, any housing project receiving assistance under this article except for any housing project constructed under a program restricting occupancy to persons sixty-two (62) years of age or older and any directors of their immediate households or their occupant surviving spouses. SECTION 50.  Section 45-1-2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-1-2.  (1)  The Executive Director of the Department of Public Safety shall be the Commissioner of Public Safety. (2)  The Commissioner of Public Safety shall establish the organizational structure of the Department of Public Safety, which shall include the creation of any units necessary to implement the duties assigned to the department and consistent with specific requirements of law including, but not limited to: (a)  Office of Public Safety Planning; (b)  Office of Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol; (c)  Office of Mississippi Bureau of Investigation (to be directed by a Lieutenant Colonel of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol); (d)  Office of Forensic Laboratories, which includes the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory and the Office of the State Medical Examiner; (e)  Office of Law Enforcement Officers' Training Academy; (f)  Office of Support Services; (g)  Office of Narcotics, which shall be known as the Bureau of Narcotics; (h)  Office of Homeland Security; (i)  Office of Capitol Police; (j)  Office of Driver Service Bureau; and (k)  Office of Commercial Transportation Enforcement Division. (3)  The department shall be headed by a commissioner, who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor.  The appointment of the commissioner shall be made with the advice and consent of the Senate.  The commissioner shall have, at a minimum, a bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university. (4)  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner shall appoint heads of offices, who shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner.  The commissioner shall have the authority to organize the offices established by subsection (2) of this section as deemed appropriate to carry out the responsibilities of the department.  The commissioner may assign to the appropriate offices such powers and duties as deemed appropriate to carry out the department's lawful functions.  The organization charts of the department shall be presented annually with the budget request of the Governor for review by the Legislature. (5)  The commissioner shall appoint, from within the Department of Public Safety, a statewide safety training officer who shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner and whose duty it shall be to perform public training for both law enforcement and private persons throughout the state concerning proper emergency response to * * *the mentally ill persons with mental illness, terroristic threats or acts, domestic conflict, other conflict resolution, and such other matters as the commissioner may direct. (6)  The commissioner, after consultation with the Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police and the Mississippi Sheriffs' Association, shall be responsible for establishing guidelines for response to active shooter situations and any related jurisdictional issues. (7)  The commissioner shall establish within the department the Mississippi Office of Homeland Security for the purpose of seeing that the laws are faithfully executed and for the purpose of investigating cyber-related crimes and suppressing crimes of violence and acts of intimidation and terror.  The commissioner is hereby authorized to employ within the Office of Homeland Security a director, investigators and other qualified personnel as he may deem necessary to make investigation of cyber-related crimes, crimes of violence and acts of terrorism or intimidation, to aid in the arrest and prosecution of persons charged with such cyber-related crimes, crimes of violence, acts of terrorism or intimidation, or threats of violence and to perform other duties as necessary to accomplish these purposes.  Investigators and other law enforcement personnel employed by the commissioner shall have full power to investigate, apprehend, and arrest persons committing cyber-related crimes, acts of violence, intimidation, or terrorism anywhere in the state, and shall be vested with the power of police officers in the performance of such duties as provided herein.  Such investigators and other personnel shall perform their duties under the direction of the commissioner, or his designee.  The commissioner shall be authorized to offer and pay suitable rewards to other persons for aiding in such investigation and in the apprehension and conviction of persons charged with cyber-related crimes, acts of violence, or threats of violence, or intimidation, or acts of terrorism. (8)  The commissioner shall establish within the Office of Homeland Security a Mississippi Analysis and Information Center (MSAIC Fusion Center) which shall be the highest priority for the allocation of available federal resources for statewide information sharing, including the deployment of personnel and connectivity with federal data systems.  Subject to appropriation therefor, the Mississippi Fusion Center shall employ three (3) regional analysts dedicated to analyzing and resolving potential threats identified by the agency's statewide social media intelligence platform and the dissemination of school safety information. SECTION 51.  Section 45-35-53, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-35-53.  (1)  The Department of Public Safety shall issue personal identification cards to persons with disabilities who make application to the department in accordance with rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner by filing with the Secretary of State under the Administrative Procedures Act.  The identification card for persons with disabilities shall prominently display the international * * *handicapped disabled symbol and, in addition to any other information required by this article, may contain a recent color photograph of the applicant and the following information: (a)  Full legal name; (b)  Address of residence; (c)  Birth date; (d)  Date identification card was issued; (e)  Date identification card expires; (f)  Sex; (g)  Height; (h)  Weight; (i)  Eye color; (j)  Location where the identification card was issued; (k)  Signature of person identified or facsimile thereof; and (l)  Such other information as required by the department. (2)  The identification card for persons with disabilities shall bear an identification card number which shall not be the same as the applicant's social security number.  The commissioner shall prescribe the form of identification cards issued pursuant to this article to persons who are not United States citizens.  The identification cards of such persons shall include a number and any other identifying information prescribed by the commissioner. SECTION 52.  Section 47-5-1351, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-5-1351.  The Governor, on behalf of this state, may execute the Interstate Corrections Compact, with any and all states legally joining therein, in substantially the following form and the Legislature signifies in advance its approval and ratification of such compact: INTERSTATE CORRECTIONS COMPACT Article I Purpose and Policy The party states, desiring by common action to fully utilize and improve their institutional facilities and provide adequate programs for the confinement, treatment and rehabilitation of various types of offenders, declare that it is the policy of each of the party states to provide such facilities and programs on a basis of cooperation with one another, thereby serving the best interests of such offenders and of society and effecting economies in capital expenditures and operational costs. The purpose of this compact is to provide for the mutual development and execution of such programs of cooperation for the confinement, treatment and rehabilitation of offenders with the most economical use of human and material resources. Article II Definitions As used in this compact, unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "State" means a state of the United States, the United States of America, a territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico; (b)  "Sending state" means a state party to this compact in which conviction or court commitment was had; (c)  "Receiving state" means a state party to this compact to which an inmate is sent for confinement other than a state in which conviction or court commitment was had; (d)  "Inmate" means a male or female offender who is committed, under sentence to or confined in, a penal or correctional institution; and (e)  "Institution" means any penal or correctional facility, including, but not limited to, a facility for * * * the mentally ill or mentally defective persons with mental illness or persons with an intellectual disability, in which inmates defined in (d) above may lawfully be confined. Article III Contracts (1)  Each party state may make one or more contracts with any one or more of the other party states for the confinement of inmates on behalf of a sending state in institutions situated within receiving states.  Any such contract shall provide for: (a)  Its duration; (b)  Payments to be made to the receiving state by the sending state for inmate maintenance, extraordinary medical and dental expenses, and any participation in or receipt by inmates of rehabilitative or correctional services, facilities, programs or treatment not reasonably included as part of normal maintenance. * * *; (c)  Participation in programs of inmate employment, if any; the disposition or crediting of any payments received by inmates on account thereof; and the crediting of proceeds from or disposal of any products resulting therefrom; (d)  Delivery and retaking of inmates; and (e)  Such other matters as may be necessary and appropriate to fix the obligations, responsibilities and rights of the sending and receiving states. (2)  The terms and provisions of this compact entered into by the authority of or pursuant thereto, and nothing in any such contract shall be inconsistent therewith. Article IV Procedures and Rights (1)  Whenever the duly constituted authorities in a state party to this compact, and which has entered into a contract pursuant to Article III, shall decide that confinement in, or transfer of an inmate to, an institution within the territory of another party state is necessary or desirable in order to provide adequate quarters and care or an appropriate program of rehabilitation or treatment, * * *said those officials may direct that the confinement be within an institution within the territory of * * *said the other party state, the receiving state to act in that regard solely as agent for the sending state. (2)  The appropriate officials of any state party to this compact shall have access, at all reasonable times, to any institution in which it has a contractual right to confine inmates for the purpose of inspecting the facilities thereof and visiting such of its inmates as may be confined in the institution. (3)  Inmates confined in an institution pursuant to the terms of this compact shall at all times be subject to the jurisdiction of the sending state and may at any time be removed therefrom for transfer to a prison or other institution within the sending state, for transfer to another institution in which the sending state may have a contractual or other right to confine inmates, for release on probation or parole, for discharge or for any other purpose permitted by the laws of the sending state, provided, that the sending state shall continue to be obligated to such payments as may be pursuant to the terms of any contract entered into under the terms of Article III. (4)  Each receiving state shall provide regular reports to each sending state on the inmates of that sending state in institutions pursuant to this compact including a conduct record of each inmate and certify * * *said the record to the official designated by the sending state, in order that each inmate may have official review of his or her record in determining and altering the disposition of * * *said the inmate in accordance with the law which may obtain in the sending state and in order that the same may be a source of information for the sending state. (5)  All inmates who may be confined in an institution pursuant to the provisions of this compact shall be treated in a reasonable and humane manner and shall be treated equally with such similar inmates of the receiving state as may be confined in the same institution.  The fact of confinement in a receiving state shall not deprive any inmate so confined of any legal rights which * * *said the inmate would have had if in an appropriate institution of the sending state. (6)  Any hearing or hearings to which an inmate confined pursuant to this compact may be entitled by the laws of the sending state may be had before the appropriate authorities of the sending state, or of the receiving state if authorized by the sending state. The receiving state shall provide adequate facilities for such hearings as may be conducted by the appropriate officials of a sending state.  In the event such hearing or hearings are had before officials of the receiving state, the governing law shall be that of the sending state and a record of the hearing or hearings as prescribed by the sending state shall be made.  * * *Said The record together with any recommendations of the hearing officials shall be transmitted forthwith to the official or officials before whom the hearing would have been had if it had taken place in the sending state.  In any and all proceedings had pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision, the officials of the receiving state shall act solely as agents of the sending state and no final determination shall be made in any matter except by the appropriate officials of the sending state. (7)  Any inmate confined pursuant to this compact shall be released within the territory of the sending state unless the inmate, and the sending and receiving states, shall agree upon release in some other place.  The sending state shall bear the cost of such return to its territory. (8)  Any inmate confined pursuant to the terms of this compact shall have any and all rights to participate in and derive any benefits or incur or be relieved of any obligations, or have such obligations modified or his status changed on account of any action or proceedings in which he could have participated if confined in any appropriate institution of the sending state located within such state. (9)  The parent, guardian, trustee or other person or persons entitled under the laws of the sending state to act for, advise or otherwise function with respect to any inmate shall not be deprived of or restricted in his exercise of any power in respect of any inmate confined pursuant to the terms of this compact. Article V Acts Not Reviewable in Receiving State:  Extradition (1)  Any decisions of the sending state in respect of any matter over which it retains jurisdiction pursuant to this compact shall be conclusive upon and not reviewable within the receiving state, but if at the time the sending state seeks to remove an inmate from an institution in the receiving state there is pending against the inmate within such state any criminal charge or if the inmate is formally accused of having committed within such state a criminal offense, the inmate shall not be returned without the consent of the receiving state until discharged from prosecution or other form of proceeding, imprisonment or detention for such offense.  The duly accredited officers of the sending state shall be permitted to transport inmates pursuant to this compact through any and all states party to this compact without interference. (2)  An inmate who escapes from an institution in which he is confined pursuant to this compact shall be deemed a fugitive from the sending state and from the state in which the institution is situated.  In the case of an escape to a jurisdiction other than the sending or receiving state, the responsibility for institution of extradition or rendition proceedings shall be that of the sending state, but nothing contained herein shall be construed to prevent or affect the activities of officers and agencies of any jurisdiction directed toward the apprehension and return of an escapee. Article VI Federal Aid Any state party to this compact may accept federal aid for use in connection with any institution or program, the use of which is or may be affected by this compact or any contract pursuant hereto and any inmate in a receiving state pursuant to this compact may participate in any such federally aided program or activity for which the sending or the receiving state have made contractual provision; * * *provided, that however, if such program or activity is not part of the customary correctional regimen, the express consent of the appropriate official of the sending state shall be required therefrom. Article VII Entry into Force This compact shall enter into force and become effective and binding upon the states so acting when it has been enacted into law by any two (2) states.  Thereafter, this compact shall enter into force and become effective and binding as to any other of * * *said those states upon similar action by such state. Article VIII Withdrawal and Termination This compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon a party state until it shall have enacted a statute repealing the same and providing for the sending of formal written notice of withdrawal from the compact to the appropriate officials of all other party states.  An actual withdrawal shall not take effect until one (1) year after the notices provided in * * *said that statute have been sent.  Such withdrawal shall not relieve the withdrawing state from its obligations assumed hereunder prior to the effective date of withdrawal.  Before the effective date of withdrawal, a withdrawing state shall remove to its territory, at its own expense, such inmates as it may have confined pursuant to the provisions of this compact. Article IX Other Arrangement Unaffected Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to abrogate or impair any agreement or other arrangement which a party state may have with a nonparty state for the confinement, rehabilitation or treatment of inmates nor to repeal any other laws of a party state authorizing the making of cooperative institutional arrangements. Article X Construction and Severability The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed and shall be severable.  If any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any participating state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.  If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state participating therein, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters. SECTION 53.  Section 49-7-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-7-39.  (1)  The commission shall establish a special hunting season for youth under the age of sixteen (16) and for * * *handicapped persons with disabilities in the Natchez State Park.  The commission shall also establish a primitive weapon season in the Natchez State Park.  The selection of participants in the primitive weapon season shall be by public drawing from all qualified applications.  The commission shall set the number of permits to be issued and the length of the special seasons. (2)  The commission may also establish a special hunting season for youth and * * * handicapped persons with disabilities or a primitive weapon season as provided in this section in any other state park under the jurisdiction of the department but shall only do so upon the recommendation of the staff of the department as approved by the commission. The commission shall select participants and set the number of permits to be issued and the length of the special seasons. (3)  The commission may establish and regulate special youth hunts for all nonmigratory game birds and animals outside of the open season on wildlife management areas and on private lands. (4)  The commission shall establish and regulate a special hunting season for youth under the age of sixteen (16) to run concurrently with the primitive weapons season on deer. SECTION 54.  Section 49-7-40, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-7-40.  The commission may adopt regulations to provide for a special hunt by * * *handicapped persons with disabilities in the natural area at Arkabutla Lake designated by the U.S. Corps of Engineers.  The hunt and any such regulations must be approved by the U.S. Corps of Engineers. The following restrictions apply to any such hunt: (a)  The hunt shall be open to * * *wheelchair‑bound physically disabled persons with physical disabilities who are wheelchair-bound; (b)  Selection of participants shall be by public drawing from all qualified applications received; (c)  No more than thirty (30) permits shall be issued; (d)  The hunt shall not exceed a total of six (6) days; (e)  A hunting license shall not be required of resident or nonresident applicants; (f)  Any other actions the commission and the U.S. Corps of Engineers deem necessary for a safe and productive hunt. SECTION 55.  Section 71-3-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 71-3-3.  Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions which follow govern the construction and meaning of the terms used in this chapter: (a)  "Person" includes an individual, firm, voluntary association or a corporation. (b)  "Injury" means accidental injury or accidental death arising out of and in the course of employment without regard to fault which results from an untoward event or events, if contributed to or aggravated or accelerated by the employment in a significant manner.  Untoward event includes events causing unexpected results.  An untoward event or events shall not be presumed to have arisen out of and in the course of employment, except in the case of an employee found dead in the course of employment.  This definition includes injuries to artificial members, and also includes an injury caused by the willful act of a third person directed against an employee because of his employment while so employed and working on the job, and disability or death due to exposure to ionizing radiation from any process in employment involving the use of or direct contact with radium or radioactive substances with the use of or direct exposure to roentgen (X-rays) or ionizing radiation.  In radiation cases only, the date of disablement shall be treated as the date of the accident.  Occupational diseases, or the aggravation thereof, are excluded from the term "injury," provided that, except as otherwise specified, all provisions of this chapter apply equally to occupational diseases as well as injury. (c)  "Death," when mentioned as a basis for the right to compensation, means only death resulting from such an injury. (d)  "Employee" means any person, including a minor whether lawfully or unlawfully employed, in the service of an employer under any contract of hire or apprenticeship, written or oral, express or implied, provided that there shall be excluded therefrom all independent contractors and especially any individual performing service in, and at the time of, the sale of newspapers or magazines to ultimate consumers under an arrangement under which the newspapers or magazines are to be sold by the individual at a fixed price, the individual's compensation being based on the retention of the excess of such price over the amount at which the newspapers or magazines are charged to the individual, whether or not the individual is guaranteed a minimum amount of compensation for such service or is entitled to be credited with the unsold newspapers or magazines returned.  A student of an educational institution who, as a part of such educational institution's curriculum, is receiving practical training at any facility, who is under the active and direct supervision of the personnel of the facility and/or an instructor of the educational institution, and who is not receiving wages as a consequence of participation in such practical training shall not be considered an employee of such facility on account of participation in such practical training. (e)  "Employer," except when otherwise expressly stated, includes a person, partnership, association, corporation and the legal representatives of a deceased employer, or the receiver or trustee of a person, partnership, association or corporation. (f)  "Carrier" means any person authorized in accordance with the provisions of this chapter to insure under this chapter and includes self-insurers. (g)  "Self-insurer" is an employer who has been authorized under the provisions of this chapter to carry his own liability on his covered employees without insuring in a stock or mutual carrier. (h)  "Commission" means the Workers' Compensation Commission. (i)  "Disability" means incapacity because of injury to earn the wages which the employee was receiving at the time of injury in the same or other employment, which incapacity and the extent thereof must be supported by medical findings. (j)  "Compensation" means the money allowance payable to an injured worker or his dependents as provided in this chapter, and includes funeral benefits provided therein. (k)  "Wages" includes the money rate at which the service rendered is recompensed under the contract of hiring in force at the time of injury, and also the reasonable value of board, rent, housing, lodging or similar advantage received from the employer and gratuities received in the course of employment from others than the employer.  The term "wages" shall not include practical training received by students of an educational institution as a part of such educational institution's curriculum. (l)  "Child" shall include a posthumous child, a child legally adopted prior to the injury of the employee, a child in relation to whom the deceased employee stood in the place of a parent for at least one (1) year prior to the time of injury and a stepchild or acknowledged illegitimate child dependent upon the deceased, but does not include married children unless wholly dependent on him.  "Grandchild" means a child as above defined of a child as above defined.  "Brother" and "sister" include stepbrothers and stepsisters, half brothers and half sisters, and brothers and sisters by adoption, but does not include married brothers nor married sisters unless wholly dependent on the employee.  "Child," "grandchild," "brother" and "sister" include only persons who are under eighteen (18) years of age, and also persons who, though eighteen (18) years of age or over, are wholly dependent upon the deceased employee and incapable of self-support by reason of mental or physical disability, and also a child eighteen (18) years of age or older, until his twenty-third birthday, who is dependent upon the deceased and is pursuing a full-time education. (m)  "Parent" includes stepparents and parents by adoption, parents-in-law or any person who for more than three (3) years prior to the death of the deceased employee stood in the place of a parent to him, or her, if dependent on the injured employee. (n)  The term "surviving spouse" includes the decedent's legal wife or husband, living with him or her or dependent for support upon him or her at the time of death or living apart for justifiable cause or by reason of desertion at such time, provided * * *, however, that such separation had not existed for more than three (3) years without an award for separate maintenance or alimony or the filing of a suit for separate maintenance or alimony in the proper court in this state.  The term "surviving spouse" shall likewise include * * *one a person who is not a legal wife or husband but who had entered into a ceremonial marriage with the decedent at least one (1) year prior to death and who, on the date of the decedent's death, stood in the relationship of a wife or husband, provided there was no living legal spouse who had protected her or his rights for support by affirmative action as hereinabove required.  The term "surviving spouse" as contemplated in this chapter shall not apply to any person who has, since his or her separation from decedent, entered into a ceremonial marriage or lived in open adultery with another. (o)  The term "adoption" or "adopted" means legal adoption prior to the time of the injury. (p)  The singular includes the plural and the masculine includes the feminine and neuter. (q)  It is expressly provided, agreed and understood in determining beneficiaries under this * * *section chapter that a surviving spouse suffering a mental or physical * * *handicap disability and children under the age of eighteen (18) years are presumed to be dependent. (r)  "Independent contractor" means any individual, firm or corporation who contracts to do a piece of work according to his own methods without being subject to the control of his employer except as to the results of the work, and who has the right to employ and direct the outcome of the workers independent of the employer and free from any superior authority in the employer to say how the specified work shall be done or what the laborers shall do as the work progresses, one who undertakes to produce a given result without being in any way controlled as to the methods by which he attains the result. (s)  "Average weekly wage for the state" means an amount determined by the commission as of October 1 of each year based upon wage and employment statistics reported to the commission by the Mississippi Employment Security Commission.  Such amount shall be based upon data for the preceding twelve-month period and shall be effective from and after January 1 of the following year. SECTION 56.  Section 71-3-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 71-3-7. (1)  Compensation shall be payable for disability or death of an employee from injury or occupational disease arising out of and in the course of employment, without regard to fault as to the cause of the injury or occupational disease. An occupational disease shall be deemed to arise out of and in the course of employment when there is evidence that there is a direct causal connection between the work performed and the occupational disease.  In all claims in which no benefits, including disability, death and medical benefits, have been paid, the claimant shall file medical records in support of his claim for benefits when filing a petition to controvert.  If the claimant is unable to file the medical records in support of his claim for benefits at the time of filing the petition to controvert because of a limitation of time established by Section 71-3-35 or Section 71-3-53, the claimant shall file medical records in support of his claim within sixty (60) days after filing the petition to controvert. (2)  Where a preexisting physical * * *handicap disability, disease, or lesion is shown by medical findings to be a material contributing factor in the results following injury, the compensation which, but for this subsection, would be payable shall be reduced by that proportion which such preexisting physical * * *handicap disability, disease, or lesion contributed to the production of the results following the injury.  The preexisting condition does not have to be occupationally disabling for this apportionment to apply. (3)  The following provisions shall apply to subsections (1) and (2) of this section: (a)  Apportionment shall not be applied until the claimant has reached maximum medical recovery. (b)  The employer or carrier does not have the power to determine the date of maximum medical recovery or percentage of apportionment.  This must be done by the attorney-referee, subject to review by the commission as the ultimate finder of fact. (c)  After the date the claimant reaches maximum medical recovery, weekly compensation benefits and maximum recovery shall be reduced by that proportion which the preexisting physical  * * *handicap disability, disease, or lesion contributes to the results following injury. (d)  If maximum medical recovery has occurred before the hearing and order of the attorney-referee, credit for excess payments shall be allowed in future payments.  Such allowances and method of accomplishment of the same shall be determined by the attorney-referee, subject to review by the commission.  However, no actual repayment of such excess shall be made to the employer or carrier. (4)  No compensation shall be payable if the use of drugs illegally, or the use of a valid prescription medication(s) taken contrary to the prescriber's instructions and/or contrary to label warnings, or the use of medical cannabis in accordance with the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act and rules and regulations adopted thereunder, or intoxication due to the use of alcohol of the employee was the proximate cause of the injury, or if it was the willful intention of the employee to injure or kill himself or another. (5)  Every employer to whom this chapter applies shall be liable for and shall secure the payment to his employees of the compensation payable under its provisions. (6)  In the case of an employer who is a subcontractor, the contractor shall be liable for and shall secure the payment of such compensation to employees of the subcontractor, unless the subcontractor has secured such payment. SECTION 57.  Section 71-3-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 71-3-105.  The commission shall cooperate with federal, state, and local agencies in the rehabilitation of * * *handicapped workers with disabilities, and shall promptly report to the proper authority industrial injury cases in which retraining or job placement may be needed. SECTION 58.  Section 71-7-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 71-7-13.  (1)  An employee or job applicant whose drug and alcohol test result is confirmed as positive in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall not, by virtue of the result alone, be defined as a person with a " * * *handicap disability." (2)  An employer who discharges or disciplines an employee on the basis of a positive confirmed drug and alcohol test in accordance with this chapter shall be considered to have discharged or disciplined the employee for cause. (3)  An employee discharged on the basis of a confirmed positive drug and alcohol test in accordance with this chapter shall be considered to have been discharged for willful misconduct. (4)  A physician-patient relationship is not created between an employee or job applicant, and an employer or any person performing or evaluating the drug and alcohol test, solely by the establishment or implementation of a drug and alcohol testing program. (5)  This chapter does not prevent an employer from establishing reasonable work rules related to employee possession, use, sale or solicitation of drugs, including convictions for drug-related offenses, and taking action based upon a violation of any of those rules. (6)  This chapter shall not be retroactive and shall not abrogate any right an employer may have to conduct drug and alcohol tests prior to July 1, 1991.  A drug and alcohol test conducted by an employer before July 1, 1991, shall not be subject to this chapter. (7)  If an employee refuses to submit to drug and alcohol testing administered in accordance with this chapter, the employer shall not be barred from discharging, or disciplining, or referring the employee to a drug abuse assessment, treatment and rehabilitation program at a site certified by the Department of Mental Health. (8)  An employer, in addition to any appropriate personnel actions, may refer any employee found to have violated the employer's policy on drug use to an employee assistance program for assessment, counseling and referral for treatment or rehabilitation as appropriate.  Such treatment or rehabilitation shall be at a site certified by the Department of Mental Health. (9)  This chapter does not prohibit an employer from conducting medical screening or other tests required by any statute, rule or regulation for the purpose of monitoring exposure of employees to toxic or other unhealthy substances in the workplace or in the performance of job responsibilities.  Such screenings or tests shall be limited to the specific substances expressly identified in the applicable statute, rule or regulation, unless prior written consent of the employee is obtained for other tests. (10)  An employer may temporarily suspend or transfer an employee to another position after obtaining the results of a positive on-site initial test.  An employer may discharge an employee after obtaining the results of a positive confirmed test. (11)  Nothing in this chapter shall affect any right of an employer to terminate the employment of any person for reasons not related to a drug and alcohol testing program implemented pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. SECTION 59.  Section 73-3-353, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-3-353.  In proceedings under Sections 73-3-347 through 73-3-365, the attorney shall be entitled to representation by counsel.  An attorney who has been declared mentally incompetent, judicially, or who has been committed, judicially, to an institution for the treatment of * * *the mentally ill persons with mental illness shall be defended by his legally appointed guardian or guardian ad litem, if any; if a guardian or guardian ad litem has not been appointed, the chief justice, on certification by the Board of Commissioners, shall appoint a guardian ad litem.  The same procedure shall apply to an attorney who has asserted his incompetence, or whose incompetence to defend becomes apparent during the proceedings.  In all cases, counsel previously selected by the attorney will be appointed guardian ad litem, absent clear and compelling reasons to the contrary. SECTION 60.  Section 75-74-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-74-9.  (1)  The State Board of Health shall have the authority and the duty to make and promulgate rules and regulations consistent with the policy and purpose of this chapter, and to amend any rule or regulation it makes.  In developing such rules and regulations, the board shall consult with appropriate public and private officials and organizations and parents and camp operators.  It shall be the duty of the board to advise all existing youth camps in this state of this chapter and any rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter. (2)  There is created within the State Board of Health the advisory council on youth camp safety to advise and consult on policy matters relating to youth camp safety.  The council consists of the health officer or his representative and a minimum of eight (8) members appointed by the State Health Officer, including the following groups: one (1) member representative each from a private nonsectarian camp, a church-related or sponsored camp, the Girl Scouts of America, the Boy Scouts of America, the Mississippi Camping Association, camps for * * *the handicapped persons with disabilities and civic organization camps; and a consumer, a parent or an older youth with prior camping experience.  A member is entitled to hold office for two (2) years or until his successor is appointed and qualifies.  The State Health Officer or his representative shall fill vacancies for unexpired terms. Council members serve without compensation, but are entitled to be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.  The State Health Officer may appoint special advisory or technical experts and consultants as are necessary to assist the council in carrying out its functions. (3)  No rule or regulation promulgated or amended by the board under this chapter shall be effective until a public hearing is held thereon.  Notice of a public hearing, including the time, date and location of the hearing and the substance of the proposed rule, regulation or amendment, shall be given by the board to each licensee of a youth camp and the general public not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days before the hearing.  Any interested person may appear at the hearing to present evidence or testimony concerning the proposed rule, regulation or amendment. SECTION 61.  Section 83-9-32, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-9-32.  Every hospital, health or medical expenses insurance policy, hospital or medical service contract, health maintenance organization and preferred provider organization that is delivered or issued for delivery in this state and otherwise provides anesthesia benefits shall offer benefits for anesthesia and for associated facility charges when the mental or physical condition of the child or * * *mentally handicapped adult with a mental disability requires dental treatment to be rendered under physician-supervised general anesthesia in a hospital setting, surgical center or dental office. This coverage shall be offered on an optional basis, and each primary insured must accept or reject such coverage in writing and accept responsibility for premium payment. An insurer may require prior authorization for the anesthesia and associated facility charges for dental care procedures in the same manner that prior authorization is required for treatment of other medical conditions under general anesthesia.  An insurer may require review for medical necessity and may limit payment of facility charges to certified facilities in the same manner that medical review is required and payment of facility charges is limited for other services.  The benefit provided by this coverage shall be subject to the same annual deductibles or coinsurance established for all other covered benefits within a given policy, plan or contract.  Private third-party payers may not reduce or eliminate coverage due to these requirements. A dentist shall consider the Indications for General Anesthesia as published in the reference manual of the American Academy of Pediatric Dentistry as utilization standards for determining whether performing dental procedures necessary to treat the particular condition or conditions of the patient under general anesthesia constitutes appropriate treatment. The provisions of this section shall apply to anesthesia services provided by oral and maxillofacial surgeons as permitted by the Mississippi State Board of Dental Examiners. The provisions of this section shall not apply to treatment rendered for temporal mandibular joint (TMJ) disorders. SECTION 62.  Section 93-7-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-7-3.  A marriage may be annulled for any one (1) of the following causes existing at the time of the marriage ceremony: (a)  Incurable impotency. (b)  Adjudicated to have a mental illness or adjudicated incompetence of either or both parties.  Action of a spouse who has been adjudicated * * *mentally ill to have a mental illness or adjudicated incompetent may be brought by guardian, or in the absence of a guardian, by next friend, provided that the suit is brought within six (6) months after marriage. (c)  Failure to comply with the provisions of Sections 93-1-5 through 93-1-9 when any marriage affected by that failure has not been followed by cohabitation. Or, in the absence of ratification: (d)  When either of the parties to a marriage is incapable, from want of age or understanding, of consenting to any marriage, or is incapable from physical causes of entering into the marriage state, or where the consent of either party has been obtained by force or fraud, the marriage shall be void from the time its nullity is declared by a court of competent jurisdiction. (e)  Pregnancy of the wife by another person, if the husband did not know of the pregnancy. Suits for annulment under paragraphs (d) and (e) shall be brought within six (6) months after the ground for annulment is or should be discovered, and not thereafter. The causes for annulment of marriage set forth in this section are intended to be new remedies and shall in no way affect the causes for divorce declared elsewhere to be the law of the State of Mississippi as they presently exist or as they may from time to time be amended. SECTION 63.  Section 97-3-4, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-3-4.  (1)  It shall be unlawful for any physician performing an abortion that results in the delivery of a living child to intentionally allow or cause the child to die. (2)  If the child is viable, such child shall be immediately provided appropriate medical care and comfort care necessary to sustain life.  If the child is not viable, such child shall be provided comfort care.  The provision of this section shall include, but not be limited to, a child born with physical or mental * * *handicapping disabling conditions which, in the opinion of the parent, the physician or other persons, diminishes the quality of the child's life, a child born alive during the course of an attempted abortion and a child not wanted by the parent. (3)  As used in this section, the term "child" includes every infant member of the species homo sapiens who is born alive at any stage of development. (4)  Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, be imprisoned for not less than one (1) year nor more than ten (10) years in the State Penitentiary and fined not more than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) but not less than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00). SECTION 64.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.